Are you talking about wealth (the total value of someone's assets) or income (the amount someone earns in a year)?

Most people in first-world countries are fantastically wealthy, in either sense, compared to their ancestors 200 or 300 years ago.  So extrapolating forward: yes, the world can function if everyone were rich by our current standards.  But that doesn't mean that *any possible means* of making the poor wealthier would have the same effects.  It depends partly on how you imagine the change happening.Core inflation is a monetary phenomenon, and is only indirectly related to actual supply and demand for one commodity versus another.  Prices for most goods will rise 1%-5%, or more, per year, just because that's how money works.  If prices are falling, *overall*, we are in a very serious depression and the central bank isn't doing it's job at all.

Gas prices (or the price of any other basic commodity traded on international markets, like gold, steel, OJ...) fluctuate independently of core inflation because of global supply and demand.  If Canada and Saudi Arabia are suddenly selling way more oil, the price of a barrel will fall.  The fact that oil was getting more expensive 10 years ago when there was low inflation and now is getting less expensive during a period of low-to-moderate inflation is typical; there is no general connection between fluctuations in commodity prices and the inflation rate in any one country, which is why we distinguish between price increases in general and *core* inflation (where the increase in one price is largely driven by increases in the other prices).

If you tell me your state I can look up the actual overall rate of inflation in 2015 and whatever earlier year you're thinking of.  Frequently people have strange ideas about inflation because they fixate on the prices that change most frequently, that have gone up recently, and that they have to re-purchase regularly (for example, they ignore changes in housing costs and car prices, but notice that milk is more expensive... but milk is a very small part of most family budgets).  There *are* systematic differences in the rate of inflation for different goods, called "cost disease" - that is why the price of health care rises much faster than inflation - which result from the fact that we are making some things much more efficiently than we did 50 years ago (like computers and phones) but other things are produced in exactly the same way (like healthcare and education).  You might assume this would result in healthcare costing the same and computers costing practically nothing, but for various reasons the efficient management of the monetary system has the effect that computers cost the same and healthcare costs way more.You vastly overestimate the corruption of the Chicago Police Department, the City of Chicago, and Cook County.  You seem to have bought into a sort of paranoid worldview where if bad things happen (say, a cop shoots a fleeing suspect) it must be because that cop is evil, his patrol partner is evil, his boss his evil, the police chief is evil, and the mayor is evil.  Now, Rahm Emmanuel may *actually* be evil, but he's not stupid or sadistic, and the rest of those people are probably not evil at all.  So you are thinking "gosh, all these evil people could have protected themselves from the consequences of their misdeeds very easily with a few more misdeeds!", but the fact that they *haven't* behaved the way your worldview predicts they will behave suggests that maybe you should adjust your faith in that worldview.There are two issues going on here.  One is that clearly there is some link between male femininity/female masculinity and homosexuality; the other is a group culture effect.

Adult homosexuals generally do not conform to gender stereotypes as children *long* before they go through puberty, experience romantic attraction, or even know what homosexuality is.  This is supposed to be one of the best predictors of adult homosexuality; 2/3 of adult homosexuals reported not liking gender-typical activities as kids, but only 1/10 of adult heterosexuals. (Note, though, that because of the very low rate of homosexuality, this does not mean that, say, a boy who likes dancing is likely to be homosexual.)  The obvious explanation is that this is linked with evidence for a biological cause of homosexuality: something genetic or environmental causes brain developments more typical of the opposite sex, which cause a person to express interests typical of that sex as a child and then romantic preferences typical of that sex as an adult.  However, some people take the *opposite* approach, and think that people develop attraction to whichever gender they don't share hobbies with; I think this is unlikely, but whichever explanation is correct, the fact is that there is a high correlation between male femininity/female masculinity and homosexuality.

Now, this explains *part* of it.  But part of it is just in-group dynamics.  People want to fit in with their friends; and, even more important, they want to make it clear to their friends that they are "team players", and when they meet someone in their extended friend-group whom they don't know personally, they want their membership in the group to be clear. 

So - if we look away from homosexuals for a moment - even if you believe straight men have some biological inclination to like sports, it's clear there is no biological inclination to like baseball versus football or basketball, much less a biological inclination to root for the Red Sox versus the Yankees.  Clearly when a non-baseball fan moves to an area where the sports fans are baseball fans, he starts following baseball to fit in better; if he can stand it, he might even become more enthusiastic than the "old school" fans, because it's new and exciting to him.  If a Marlins fan moves to Boston and all his friends who follow baseball follow the Red Sox closely, he's going to end up knowing more about the Red Sox and following the Red Sox more closely, and in the end he's likely to develop a new loyalty to fit in.  This happens with hobbies, fashion, accent, mannerism, and a thousand other aspects of human behavior.  The nail that sticks out gets hammered back in.

So what goes on with homosexuals? Say that gay men, in a given generation, have a very-slightly-higher interest in prettifying themselves than straight men do.  So rings and earrings and necklaces are taken as a sign of homosexuality.  So gay guys who before weren't really thinking about jewelry (maybe because "men don't wear jewelry") start to re-consider, because they are friends with jewelry-wearing men, they have romantic flings with bejeweled men, because they want other gay guys to realize that they, too, are gay.  Furthermore, if jewelry was uncommon for both gay and straight men before, then even fairly discreet jewelry, like a small earring or ring, might seem outr\u00e9 and very feminine; but as discreet jewelry becomes normal and acceptable among gay men, someone who wants to look feminine will feel free to try more and more ostentatious ideas.  (Conversely, what to straight men do? If they realize jewelry is taken as a sign of homosexuality, they stop wearing jewelry if they don't want to give the wrong impression, and then since fewer straight men are wearing jewelry, that reinforces the "men don't wear jewelry" expectation.)  That fad might decline or break down, for one reason or another, but if there are a whole host of feminine behaviors that gay men naturally adopt at higher rates, then imitation of other members of the gay in-group will entrench the prevalence of all of the behaviors taken together, as well as making them more extreme.Can you give an example of what you mean?  I think it goes both ways: public employees have stronger speech protections (as well as stronger workers' rights in other ways as well) in some positions, and almost zero speech protection in other positions.  And additionally, you generally can't be fired from a private position for what you do outside of work, whereas public employees are always "on stage".  But it really depends on the kind of remark you mean.Don't apologize for saying "gender".  Both sex and gender have been used to mean "type" (in the context of both humans and inanimate objects, like nouns) for a very long time.  In English, "sex" was the main word for gender until the post-war period when, because sexual mores were loosening up and it became possible to have discussions about "making love" which were previously taboo, it started to become confusing whether "sex" was referring to the biological classification or the activity.  So people started saying "gender" to be polite and unambiguous, while scientists continued to talk about sex in technical publications.  Thirty years later, radical theorists started to claim that the English words obeyed a distinction they claimed existed between social roles and physical biology.  They chose to call the former "gender" and the latter "sex", but they could just as easily have called the social part sex and the physical part gender, or called them both gender (like gender^1 and gender^2 ), or a million other things.  Usage among people who haven't been indoctrinated matches your use - to switch between gender and sex based on connotation, clarity, and what "sounds right".  Anyone who tells you that you have to change is being pretension; anyone who claims that you're using the words "wrong" is ignorant.You can just go to bls.gov and you can choose "Ohio" and "Inflation, Prices" from the two drop-down menus to see what the total price level was in each year, and even how it breaks down into components.  (Like, how much did the price of chicken go up, how much did the price of chicken breasts go up compared to drumsticks...)How useful a language is to you depends on how often you are going to speak your own language versus another language.  In most of the US, you have to travel a long way to get somewhere where English isn't the primary language, and even further to get somewhere where English isn't the main secondary language. But the Scandinavians can't even communicate to *one another* in their own language, so they need to learn some language, and whatever language they had to learn they would learn much more carefully than American high school students study foreign languages.  On top of that, if an American high school student wants to watch a French movie in a theater, he would actually have a perplexing problem on his hand; but the native English-speaking audience for music and movies is so large, that Hollywood puts out far more entertainment in a given year (and of a higher quality) than Sweden, Norway, or Denmark possibly could.

On top of that, if you compare Scandinavians to people from other parts of the world who might reasonably expect they will be speaking English later in life: (a) schools are very good, academic achievement is high in all measures, not just foreign languages; (b) these are already Germanic languages, so few of the sounds, patterns, and words are truly exotic to them; (c) because these are first world countries, any economic or academic exchange they hope to have in the US, the UK, or even in other European countries where English is a common language will require a high level of proficiency, and would fail if they could only communicate in a pidgin.

Once there is a high level of fluency established in a country, the standards for "good" and "bad" get adjusted accordingly, and it gets fairly easy to become as fluent as everyone else, and a bit shameful to reach a level that would be considered praiseworthy for an American learning Swedish.Think of the Roman Empire! When the last iteration of the Holy Roman Empire was finally dissolved in 1805, its capital hadn't been in Rome for approximately 1,500 years.Take a deck of cards and carefully put all the cards in order.  (all four 2s, then all four 3s, then all four 4s...) Now shuffle it five or six times and look at the new order.  The cards aren't in order anymore.  Now shuffle five more times and check again to see if the cards are in order.  Keep shuffling five times and then checking the order.  Do you ever shuffle the deck and have it randomly come back to numerical order?

Continue to do this until either you randomly shuffle the cards back into perfect order, or you understand that when you have the "resources" to make them, it's easy to get them from one random configuration to another random configuration, but organizing into a *specific* configuration that is useful to you requires more effort.You're absolutely right, but similar sorts of logic apply (in a weaker form) to the other two points he has made: low salaries don't really make politicians into proletarians (they just force them to suck up to private sector interests who will give them jobs when they leave office so they can recoup their losses), and it's not clear that, among qualified possibilities, 200k would attract "the wrong kind of person" while 67k attracts selfless public servants.

The point is rather that these are the reasons higher salaries seem a little distasteful to people, so given that the politics of awarding a raise to yourself while cutting money for illiterate mothers or retarded toddlers or unionized shipyards is so toxic, politicians would prefer not to bother supporting a pay raise that they might not even benefit from."Planck"Moreover note that on scales where the Planck lengths matter, it would be impossible to measure the position and velocity of the clock's hands at the same time.  So you would never actually know what time it is and you'd be late for all your t^p parties.

(But on a scale of distances that can be compared using normal human perception, yes, we can get a clock to be exactly accurate.)Well, the problem is that politicians have almost unlimited scope for corruption, and we don't need to look very far to see societies (historical and actual) where political corruption is well-entrenched.  So money-driven assholes actually lead to pretty shitty governments.  But within the context of a well-functioning polity, I don't think a salary change of this sort would change the motivations of people who are deciding "Politics or finance? Politics or law?" for the worse.Oh, that's an interesting point, but it's kind of complicated.  Which wage gap is he talking about, specifically?

1.  Do there have to be starving people? No, of course not.  In fact, there *isn't* starvation in the US.  Obesity is actually *more* prevalent among the poor.  When we talk about "hunger" in the US we are talking about something more complicated... it appears insensitive to people who *do* have trouble paying for food to say that hunger isn't a problem in the US, which is why no one puts it that way, but it would be crazy to compare "food security" issues in the US to the actual death-from-starvation that was a universal feature of human history until very recent times.  And just like we know there doesn't *have to* be starvation in the US (there isn't), there doesn't have to be hunger/malnutrition/whatever, either.

2. Does there *have* to be inflation to increase the welfare of the poor? Yes, pretty much.  The backbone of the economy is the staple goods that everyone needs - housing, clothing, cars, food, etc.  A more equal income distribution implies the poor and middle classes buy more housing, clothing, cars, which implies we need to *produce more of it*, and why would anyone produce more of it than they do now? Because prices would go up for the in-demand staple goods, of course.  And when prices for all the staple goods all across the economy are rising at the same time, you get inflation. -- A look at the same issue from the other side: there is no way for ordinary people to buy more goods unless they can afford more goods, and they can't afford more goods unless they earn more, and they can't earn more unless they are in high demand.  But ordinary workers are interchangeable; high demand for ordinary workers means low unemployment, which means that the central bank needs to keep a loose money supply in the face of strong economic growth and rising prices. 

3.  Do you *have to* keep society unequal to avoid inflation? No. Inflation is irritating and occasionally harmful, but it's a price that's easy to pay if you care about the incomes of the poor and middle classes.

4. Is the reason why people want more money because they want the goods for their own sake, or because they envy people who are richer than they are and feel superior to the poor? Yes, certainly. That has been well-established; at first-world income levels, being richer doesn't make you happier in itself, but being richer than your neighbors and fellow citizens *does* make you happier.  But that doesn't necessarily mean that eliminating poverty will make the rich less happy! Most people envy their betters more than they feel superior to their inferiors.  So if you make 1 million per year, and I tax away an extra 10% of that to give to the poor, but I tax away an extra *50%* of the income of the guy at your golf club who makes 5 million a year, you end up much happier as a result.

5.  Is it impossible to eliminate the condition we currently call "poverty"? No, certainly not: what people called poverty in the 19th century is already eliminated in the US, so there is no reason we can't repeat it with our poverty.  After we eliminate poverty, will there be a new group of people whose lifestyles (luxurious by the standards of 2015, but nonetheless) seem unfortunate who will be identified as "the poor"? Yes, certainly.1.  Marxism is a school of social thought stemming from the economic insights of Karl Marx.  Which insight is important depends on what you are studying.  For some thinkers, the key Marxian idea is "technology determines economic structure and, through economic structure, everything else about society, culture, and politics". For others, the key idea is "politics is a struggle between different classes which have different economic interests".  For still others, the key idea is "capitalism can only survive because it pays workers less than they are worth".  Or "ideas about right and wrong only reflect the interests of social classes which spread those ideas to increase their power."  These are only a few of the more common Marxian insights.  Political parties, social parties, etc. inspired by this kind of thinking are also called Marxist.

2.  Communism is the idea, first of all, that states should be run for the common good, or the good of all society; and in this sense, communism was originally interchangeable with *socialism*. Because the main goal the communists had in mind for advancing the common good was to improve the lot of the poor (industrial workers and peasants), communism became associated with their interests, as well.  Because the most unique *policy idea* the communists had was to abolish private property in factories, farms, and things like that, state-run economies are also considered "communist". (Other communist ideas like free universal education, universal suffrage, etc. are now accepted by everyone so aren't "communist".)  The first communist party to rule a state was the Russian Communist party, who are also called Bolsheviks (unimportant reason), Marxists (because they followed Marx's ideas), Leninists (because Lenin was their leader), or Stalinists (because after Lenin's death, Stalin ruled for decades and gave the world's first communist state its characteristic shape).  After that all the parties that aligned themselves with Russia (which meant, almost all pro-worker, pro-peasant, pro-revolution parties in the world) were called communist.  States/societies modeled on Russia were called communist as well, although sometimes people make the distinction that communism was the *goal* that the communist countries were trying to achieve.

3.  Fascism takes its name from the *fasces*, a bundle of rods around an axe which was a symbol of political authority in emergencies in the Roman Republic, and gave the holder power over life and death.  After World War I, people who considered the old-fashioned conservatives out of touch, the moderate centrists/liberals to be weak-spined bumblers who were leading society into economic disaster and moral chaos, and the communists to be evil incarnate tended to support a *different* kind of right-wing party, generically called *Fascist*.  Unlike conservatives, they were not interested in protecting traditional rights, limits on government power, or safe-guarding the interests of the old aristocracy.  Unlike liberals, they were in favor of traditional values, belligerent solutions to foreign policy disputes, and state intervention in the economy; they also didn't put any value on the cultural or political procedures of liberal society.  Unlike left-wing parties, they were in favor of private property, order, and stability. 

4. Socialism, as I've said above, started out meaning more or less the same thing as communism, at least in terms of *political movements*.  "Labor party", "Workers' party", and "Socialist party" tend to mean the same thing.  Some people identified socialism as any policy that advanced socialist/communist goals, and communism with the final goal.  Over time, due to constant splits within leftwing movements and parties being re-formed and re-named, a convention began that Marxist- and later Leninist-leaning parties called themselves "communist" and other leftwing parties called themselves "socialist".  Unlike the communist parties, which typically came to power through revolution or military conquest, many socialist parties not associated with communism have won elections, and then had to form a government, pass a budget, administer policies, just like any other political party; this experience moderated them very quickly, tot he point that the biggest socialist parties are nearly always center-left, replacing the old liberal parties in the party spectrum.

5. Conservatism just means "keeping things the way they are."  It's meaning depends on what the status quo is.  In 1825, free trade was radical; in 1925, free trade was conservative.  Because different countries have different status quos, they have different political parties.  They have a general orientation towards the interests of the wealthy and powerful, family values, "law and order", and respect for authority.

6. Capitalism is the system of free enterprise as it exists throughout the world today.  For some people the key thing is *free exchange*, that businesses and their customers can buy and sell as much as they like at whatever prices they agree on.  For others the key thing is wage labor, or private ownership of economic assets, or mass production, or something else entirely: modern economies are complex.  A "capitalist" can either be someone who *supports* capitalism or, more commonly, someone who *owns capital*, e.g. an industrialist or financier.When you are lending money to someone, you have a choice of who you are going to lend it to, or if you are going to lend it at all.  You could lend it to a hobo you just met on the street, you could lend it to a friend of a friend who just started a new business, you could lend it to a multinational corporation, or you could lend it to your national government.  Choices, choices! Obviously, one feature of these choices is that they offer different levels of *risk*.  If you "lend" $100 to the bum, you will probably never see the money again (or him either, for that matter).  If you lend it to the friend of the friend, you're playing with fire.  If you lend it to a multinational corporation, you are probably making a safer bet; if you lend it to the UK or the US, even safer.

*If a stable government offered rates on its loans that were the same as a corporation*, no one would lend money to the corporation.  You could get the same rate, much more safely, from the government.  If the corporation wants to borrow *any* money at all, they need to offer to pay more interest to lenders, right? If the government just offered rates that were a *bit* higher than before, they wouldn't attract *all* the money loaned to the corporations, but some people who were on the fence about risk versus reward will say, "I've changed my mind, I'm calling in my loan to the corporation and lending the money to the government instead." So the corp. won't lose *all* of its loans, but if it wants to borrow as much money as before it needs to offer higher rates on its loans.

This basic logic trickles all up and down the spectrum of borrowing-and-lending, including people like your friend's friend who wants to borrow money for his small business.  The rates charged on loans are determined, at bottom, by the money available to loan out; the different rates for all the many different kinds of loans are just corrections to account for the extra risk involved in each loan. When central banks play with rates, what they are doing is sucking money out of the money supply, or pumping it into the money supply.Sure, that's good enough.  The one wrinkle is that you *could* have a reflection from photons bouncing off that is a much darker hue (like the deep blues and greens in water) or tinted various colors (like gold).  The reason metals are silvery is because it's much harder for photons to be absorbed by the very high-energy electrons that the large metallic atoms have in their outer "layers".  So the reflected light is barely affected by any special absorption properties of the metal (unlike, say, water) and changes depending on the angle between you and the point of reflection (unlike, say, limestone, which is just white), so it looks silvery.Let's say you run a hamburger stand.  You're selling, oh, say 100 hamburgers every day at lunch time.  Now, what happens if you realize that there is a long line building up at your stand, and you can't make enough hamburgers (or make them fast enough) for all the people who want them.  So you have two choices for how to cope with the demand: you can raise the price of each hamburger until only 100 people want them again, or you can hire an assistant and expand your stand and try to sell twice as many hamburgers.  Or you can do a mix of both: and in practice, that's actually what businesses normally do when they have a lot of demand.  That is how good companies stay in business and serve more customers, and bad companies drop out of the marketplace.

The wrinkle is that... when there is a big line outside your hamburger stand, you have no idea whether people think your hamburgers are a could deal because *your hamburger is better than other lunch options*, or because *they all earn a lot of money relative to the prices you set*.  Sometimes, while you are thinking about expanding your hamburger stand because of high demand, the sandwich stand is shutting down because you're stealing all his customers.  But other times, *all* the food carts are facing more demand than they can meet at the same time.... that could be because the food cart owners are all really efficient at what they do, and the restaurant owners are losing business.  But sometimes not just food cart owners, but also restaurant owners, and owners of *all other kinds of business* are seeing increased demand at the same time.  They don't know why, they respond the same way to high demand no matter what causes it.  But if they are all raising prices at the same time, the result is that they all need to raise the prices they pay to their suppliers and employees, because of high labor demand; and then because the employees are getting paid more, they demand more goods; and the price increases keep feeding into one another.No, we say Dutch in English. Flemish is normally the Dutch-speaking ethnic group in Belgium*Before* the communist revolutions, people thought communism was bad because (a) they were proposing economic schemes that economists (correctly, it turns out) couldn't possibly work better than capitalism, although in the end they worked better than anyone expected; (b) they were proposing to take away the wealth of the rich to improve the lot of the poor, which the rich found undesirable, the middle class found frightening (where does redistribution stop?), and even some of the poor felt was unfair (on the grounds that you deserve what you earn); (c) they loudly denied the validity of religion (at a time when religion was still a serious part of Western culture), all ethical ideals (justice, morality, liberty, etc.), and most social customs (like marriage), which made them seem bizarre and wicked; (d) as a consequence of -c-, they very explicitly denied the legitimacy of elections, parliaments, and so on, and believed that political power would come down to protests, strikes, and violent rebellion; (e) people still remembered, and had bad associations with, the out-of-control radical phases of the French Revolution.

Now, that was all hypothetical, pre-1917.  After the Communist takeover in Russia, opinions on -a- (do Communist economic ideas work?) became more diverse, but fear about all the other issues became much more intense, because the Communist party conducted itself in a questionable way from the very beginning: gaining power in a coup against a liberal republic (as they had said they planned to all along), fomenting political violence in other European countries, collectivizing property and controlling the economy in a very violent way that lead, among other things, to the starvation of millions, militarism, intriguing for power amongst themselves using torture, assassination, and political show-trials... it was just all very ugly. Not to mention the lack of anything like freedom of expression or other liberal values. 

Then, after WWII, when the USSR occupied Eastern Europe and half of Germany their behavior of the Red Army towards both the people and the societies was incredibly disgusting; they set up puppet regimes in all of the areas they occupied, and in the 1950s and 1960s used their military power to control the countries (first Hungary, then Czechoslovakia) that tried to escape; and funded armed revolutions and civil wars all over the globe, starting with Mao in China.Think of it this way: they could charge you a 40% income tax. Or a 40% sales tax.  Or a 30% income tax and a 10% sales tax.  The amount of money they raise from the three options might be very similar, but the effects might be different in other ways.  (For example, income taxes discourage work, but sales taxes discourage consumerism.  Income taxes get higher and higher as you add more and more additional income, but sales taxes are the same rate for everyone.  Income taxes aren't affected by what you spend the money on, but we can make "necessities" exempt from sales tax, or tax them at a different rate.)Basically they have an oral tradition about *exactly* how a sentence should translate into the modern language, or *exactly* what context it's supposed to understood in.  So you say: "Look here, it says *Kill all the unbelievers, hack at their necks until they are dead and make those who surrender your slaves*, that doesn't sound very peaceful..." and the Moderate Muslim(tm) will have some answer like "This chapter is implicitly about the war between X and Y, although it's in allusive language, so when he talks about the *unbeliever* he's really only talking about this particular city and this particular war" or they'll say "*Hack at their necks until they are dead* is really just a figure of speech, it only means to defend yourself against aggression" or something like that.

People are saying that all major religions have this problem, but I don't think that's *really* True, or at least it's a different problem.  Every religion has problems with two things:

1. Translation problems: for example, when Jesus says "blessed are the peace-makers", the Greek word he uses is really talking about "ambassadors" or "mediators", but many people assume it means something like what we would call "pacifists"... and indeed pacifism really started with this line from the Sermon on the Mount.  However, it's not really possible to say that Jesus is or isn't commending pacifists, because no such thing existed.

2. Rigor problems: most serious religions make moral demands that most moral people don't live up... and in fact show little interest in living up to.  Figuring out whether to interpret some messages metaphorically to relax the demand, or just repeat the same demands louder to try to convince people to change their ways, is a basic challenge that can be dealt with in many ways, most of which seem hypocritical to an atheist.

But in most religions, what is apparently being recommended in the religious text is good or at least neutral; the need to reinterpret it arises because people don't want to follow it, but *not* because they think it's evil.Fascism was a right-wing political movement that showed little regard for democracy, liberty, or personal choice.  Sometimes fascism is used as a generic insult for any right-wing policy or party, or for a society/political-system that is too right-wing for the tastes of the speaker.  Sometimes fascism is used to criticize political tactics, campaigns, or ideals that seem to put little weight on democracy, the marketplace of ideas, or political compromise, and instead are focused on "winning" at any cost.

It's not unusual to see political arguments these days where *both sides* are calling each other fascist, because radical leftist movements tend to believe (1) modern American society is really as bad as fascism, and (2) intimidating, shouting down, disrupting, bullying, or mobbing their opponents is justified by the ultimate goal of ending social injustice.I'm describing reasons why many people *didn't* like it.  There were still many people who did like it (including because it was atheistic and materialist, because it wasn't based on any moral concepts, because it planned to redistribute wealth, or because they *didn't* believe property-owners deserved their property).  Communism lasted for 69 years in the USSR because it was a totalitarian state, and any dissent (even something we would find quite innocent) could get you murdered or sent to prison camps in Siberia.  As soon as the Soviet leaders relaxed their coercive control, the USSR fell apart.  (Likewise for all the Eastern European countries.) Communism is *not* popular in China as a political/social system; the *Communist Party* is relatively popular because they deliver on capitalist economic growth, but they still don't permit dissent. If they permitted political competition, they would face serious problems.

But there definitely was support.  In many rural countries communists killed the landlords and redivided their land among the peasants, which improved their quality of life; in other cases, the communist party was primarily nationalist or anti-imperialist.  Sometimes it wasn't even an ideological commitment, but just hatred for a corrupt/cruel dictator.  Experiments with state-run industry in WWI and WWII, and the longer experiment in the USSR, showed that centrally planned economies worked better than many people had predicted.  In other countries, leftists thought that the ruling establishment in their country would always be able to prevent reform and supported violent struggle for its own sake.Trump is a private person, right now.  If he did, as president, order Customs to ask visitors whether or not they were Muslim, he might be reined in by the Supreme Court (which would probably slap him down for violating religious freedom, freedom of expression, and unenumerated liberties), but if the Supreme Court found it constitutional, Presidents can do those kinds of things.  Muslims aren't a race, by the way; you may be thinking of "Arabs".Oh, yes... they especially dislike the Dutch word for "Dutch", *diets*, because they don't want to be associated with Germany.  But in English there is no other word for the language.Common theories include the relationship between the speed at which you can write and the speed at which you think; the ability to delete computer text easily; and all the other things we do with computers, that are both psychologically and visually distracting.  

&gt; when I had a notepad and paper the ideas were just coming out almost as fast as I could write them down.

I take this to be the main factor.  If you can't type, you are focused on finding the key you want; if you can type, you finish writing the sentence before the thought has matured and moved into something new.The cost to develop new drugs is about $10 billion per drug.  (If you take into account the fact that money that is poured into R&amp;D for years trying dead-ends and figuring out how to make promising therapies work *could have* gone into some other industry that would have a product to sell and earn a profit after the first year.) If we don't want to pay to develop new drugs, we can just tell insurance companies (and Medicare, and Medicaid, and hospitals) that they don't have to cover treatments that are still under patent.  Then those costs will disappear, as if by magic.

In 2013 the *total* spending on pharma in the US was $320 billion, which was an inflation-adjusted decline of 1%. US healthcare spending is $3.8 *trillion*.  Pharma is 8%.  That can't explain why we spend 50% more (as a percentage of GDP) than Sweden, the Netherlands, and Switzerland. 

(Additionally, a market with at least 15 major players can't possibly be considered an oligopoly.  The math just doesn't check out.  The only drugs they have market power are the ones under patent, and that is how they are supposed to earn back the R&amp;D costs.)The problem with the product is that you can free-ride on other people's contributions.  It's like if it was illegal to prevent homeless people from squatting in your basement -- well, *duh*, no one is going to want to buy "the product" if you can get the essentials for free.  Or if it were illegal to prevent people who were in a hurry from borrowing your car.  Or if it were illegal to prevent someone who really *loves* Game of Thrones from dropping by to watch it on your HBO.

These are silly examples, but it's clear why people wouldn't "buy" the product, even though it was pretty "good".  The difference is that in health care it is *actually* illegal to not give medical care to people with terrible, expensive medical emergency.  You may think the real risk you are taking with dropping medical coverage is something like, your daughter gets strep throat and you need to pay for the appointment and the antibiotics out-of-pocket. Oh no! Actually, the real risk is your daughter gets in a car crash and needs millions of dollars of surgery and reconstruction, which everyone else will end up paying for because you thought your insurance was too pricy.Okay.  I am told the opposite by Scandinavians, that e.g. Swedes can't understand Norwegian or Danish, and that companies and non-profits with Swedish/N'gian/Danish teams speak English because they can't communicate effectively without learning the others as foreign languages.Right.  The gold is interesting because it reflects that color because it can absorb blue wavelengths (unlike silver) due to the incredible speeds at which its electrons are traveling.When you build new apartment units, you are increasing supply and pushing down prices.  If units that used to cost $2.5/mo now cost $2k/mo, lots of people who would have thought $2.5/mo was impossibly expensive and moved into $1.8k/mo or $1.5k/mo apartments will be interested in them.  Now there is slack demand for the existing housing units in the $1.5k-$1.8k range, and even though no new units in that range were constructed they need to cut rents down to $1.2k to stay competitive, and suddenly they are pushing on the landlords who rent out apartments at $900/mo.  

This is an oversimplified explanation of how real estate prices work (among other things, a lot of the price adjustment will take place through steady prices while wages rise rather than the other way around) and also neglects obvious factors like "luxury" 2-bdr or 3-bdr apartments that are much cheaper for roommates to share than each guy having his own 1-bdr or studio.  But the bottom line is this: you can't lower housing costs without building more units, and when you build more units, you lower housing costs.  If prices are still "too high" after a new building goes up, that only means the city needs even more construction.Well, one of the Swedes who mentioned this to me was a lawyer who is near retirement age.  So I don't think it's exclusively the millennials, although it may be more drastic in the younger generations.Well if you know a way to develop a new drug more cheaply than that, you could do a lot of good for the world and become fabulously wealthy, all at the same time.Almost none.  The effect it had, back in the day, was similar to China's currency manipulations.  Same mechanism: country exports goods, hoards foreign exchange in dollars instead of buying imports.Okay, but typically "low end" apartments come from apartments that used to be high-end but now don't meet contemporary standards and so become a low-end apartment as-is, or are remodeled into smaller units.  The only people who make a business out of building huge new towers stuffed with crappy apartments are the public housing authorities, and people generally don't like how that turns out.

BTW, according to the BLS, people in San Diego only spend 37% of income on rent on average... higher than the US average of 34%, but not much higher.  Do you mean SF? "San Diego and San Jose" is a strange grouping...Ah, okay, there you go! I have spoken to Dutch people who really did not like the word "Dutch" and weren't aware it was the only word until the 19th century when *Nederlands* began to supplant *Diets*.  My understanding was that there was a big taboo on *Diets* after WWII because the Dutch fascist puppet government liked to use the older name for the nation and language.  Would you say that your view is the normal view and the other view is unusual/uneducated?

(I just find it interesting as an example of the connection between language and nationalism - obviously in the 1600s, their international neighbors didn't know that the language people spoke in Hamburg "belonged with" the language spoken in Munich rather the language spoken in Amsterdam.)If they can lose money on the project and still recoup some percentage of that through perfectly sensible laws on how you tax a "profit", that only encourages them to build more than they would have if they needed to realize a profit on each individual real estate project to see any overall profit.  Which drives prices down further.

(Think it through.  A tax write-off for depreciation and operating expenses isn't any good to a small corporation running one building, because if they are net-negative on that building, they don't have any profits to tax.  And it's not much use for a profitable building of any stripe, because the additional tax liabilities from that building's revenue exceeds the deductions.  It's only an independent source of profit when a company with many ventures own an building whose expenses and depreciation are higher than revenue; so that makes those companies more willing to take a risk on potentially unprofitable buildings.) I think you mean "You, ignorance, are amazing!"

The Tufts study is averaging the prices of drugs developed in 1995 with the prices of drugs developed in 2005.  That's cool if you're interested in the cost to develop a new drug during Bill Clinton's first term, but less interesting if you are interested in the cost to develop a new drug during, say, Hillary's first term.  The cost of research has been going up - first, in nominal terms because of inflation, second because of cost disease, third because researchers find the easiest things first.  A century ago, Alexander Fleming just happened to notice a mold had contaminated one of his petri dishes of staphylococcus and bam, penicillin. The best things in life are free: for everything else there is fabulously expensive industrialized research complexes.

&gt; A 2012 article in [Nature Reviews Drug Discovery](https://www.nature.com/nrd) says the number of drugs invented per billion dollars of R&amp;D invested has been cut in half every nine years for half a century.

The current estimate is that pharma spends $4-$5 billion directly per drug that reaches the market, and when you include interest (like if they invested their R&amp;D budget in stocks and bonds instead), due the long time lapse between the years when the spending occurs and the years when the revenue arrives, you get a total of $10 billion per new drug.

&gt; And drug companies spend more on advertising than R&amp;D.

Well, I don't think that when Johnson and Johnson spends hundreds of millions of dollars advertising Listerine(tm!) that is coming out of the national health budget.  The amount that they spend on Rx advertising for drugs that are still under patent is still mind-boggling to you or me, but only because so much money is at stake (remember, $10 billion per drug is break-even) and they need to make the relevant physicians aware of the drug's benefits ASAP.  Comparing their total marketing budget for all their products directly to their R&amp;D budget (which, by the way, doesn't even include the R&amp;D budgets of smaller biotech firms who do a lot of the research and will get bought if they develop a marketable product, but do not sell Q-tips and band-aids) is, um.... polite word polite word... obfuscatory?
Okay.  To be clear, it's not so much that they thought the word "Dutch" was inherently offensive, but they didn't know the history of the word in English, and were incredulous-to-the-point-of-anger when they heard the etymology.There are two different questions:

1. Where does a corporation operate?

2. Where does a corporation claim that it has its headquarters?

Historically, it was impossible for a corporation to have its headquarters very far from where it actually operated, and the rules for corporations doing business, owning assets, etc. in foreign countries were too complex for them to set up a headquarters in a foreign country even if they wanted to.  We've cut back on those sort of limitations with cheaper transportation and communication, and as a result we made all sorts of legal barriers to multinational corporations go away, in order to make it easier for corporations to *operate* in as many countries as they want.

If a company decided US taxes were too high so it wanted to *stop operating* in the US and move its operations to Indonesia or Vietnam or whatever, that would be one thing.  What people find irritating is when corporations set up a perfectly legal series of corporations which are connected to each other in such a way that the corporation *operates* in the US, has all of its *headquarters* in the US, sells most of its *product* in the US, is *owned* mainly by Americans, *trades its stock* on the US stock exchanges, but nonetheless claims to be a company incorporated in the Bahamas or Ireland or Curacao *only* for the purposes of deciding how their corporate profits should be taxed.

Currently existing tax laws are all designed with the convenience of these corporations in mind.  We don't want to make it difficult for foreign corporations to do business in the US and vice versa.  We don't want to tax legitimate foreign corporations on their earnings in other countries.  And we don't want to tax US corporations directly on their capital investments, their operating expenses, or their revenues, but only on their profits.  But when you combine these three privileges, there end up being loopholes for US companies to pretend to be foreign, which isn't the intention of the laws.  The simple solution is to pass laws specifically targeting the loopholes; but a more fundamental solution would be to revoke those privileges, which the corporations would like even less.First, the maximum you can burn from fat is something like 30 calories per pound per day.  If you try to burn more than that your body starts to eat away at muscle, too.

Second, the disadvantage to starving yourself is not only lack of vitamins but also lack of protein (to repair muscles), lack of complex carbs (for energy), lack of fiber, and general extreme hunger.  A very moderate diet will give you all the protein you need, fix 95% of the energy and hunger problem, plus fiber and vitamins, all without slowing down your weight loss goals by much.Hopefully these people were just weird exceptions.If Chipotle could figure it out, they would have stopped the problem after the first outbreak.  Some people are claiming that *because* Chipotle is getting a lot of ingredients from small-scale, casual-hour local farmers, they have too many local suppliers to properly test produce and screen out bad sources, and they can't hold all of them to the same standards that you could hold a single large agribusiness that has huge amounts of money riding on the Chipotle contract. Then when on top of that they decided to stop using certain kinds of crops that weren't sufficiently "organic", they set themselves up for trouble.

Another issue is that Chipotle started as high-concept fast-food, and because the product they've offered has been so good, they've been expanding rapidly.  But as they've expanded, the quality of their employees has fallen; when they were basically an artisanal burrito company in 2008 or whenever they started, their staff were notably more competent than they are now.  I suspect they are using production techniques that are only sanitary when implemented precisely by high-quality employees.Britain is where English developed.  It is still where there is the *most* accent-diversity packed into the smallest geographic area, but a century ago (before TV and radio made the "BBC announcer"-voice the final word in British English) there was *even more* diversity.  All features of existing, mainstream American accents ("Standard", New England, Mid-Atlantic, both Southern varieties) can be found here and there in the accents of the British Isles.  When the colonies were settled, the immigrants were speaking *exactly* like the inhabitants of the regions they came from.  In the intervening 200-400 years, those accents have become very rare in Britain, and even the survivors have changed a lot.  

For example, one of the most notable differences between Standard American and "Received Pronunciation" is the *R*.  Americans pronounce R's at the end of syllables, and Brits generally don't.  But before 1650 this was exactly the opposite: almost all British accents pronounced the final R, and most of the colonists came from one of the small regions where the final R had already dropped.  In the next century, continuing immigration from R-pronouncing regions (the majority of Britain) made R-pronouncing the dominant position in America, and as they spread out over the Midwest it became even more dominant.  But at the same time, R-dropping was spreading in Britain! By the 1800s it was the majority accent and also the way the ruling class liked to speak, and after the introduction of radio it began to press the remaining R-accents out of existence. 

That is just one example.  Some sounds that were very common in Britain in 1600 have changed in the US and stayed the same in the UK, and others have changed in the UK and stayed the same in the US, but the general pattern is that the US and the UK both had multiple accents at the time of colonization and the appearance of difference is based on (1) a slight bias in what regions American colonists came from, (2) exaggerated by some accents becoming more dominant and others being eliminated in each country, (3) plus both accents drifting in new directions without communicating with each other.Right, the bookie has to give odds to whoever is making a bet that would make that bet *more unreasonable* that it really is. If the bookie thinks a guy has a 75% chance to win and he gives you odds that will break even (over many bets) if he actually has a 75% chance, the bookie doesn't make money.  So there *is* a spread between the odds you get for taking one position, and the odds you get for taking the opposite position.  But there are lots of bookies; they're all competing for your business.  So the odds that bookies post are the combination of *two* sources of information:

1.  The many, many gamblers who are placing bets with the bookies all like the odds the bookies are offering.  The bookies want their position hedged so that the are not, themselves, making a big bet on one side or the other; ideally they want to make money *no matter who wins*.  If too much money is being placed on A, they keep the same spread and change the odds to make B more attractive and A less attractive.  So the odds express the collective opinions of many, many bookies and gamblers.

2. Meanwhile, the spread itself is kept tight by competition between bookies.  The True probability is presumably somewhere in the spread.  If there is a big spread, then it's hard to know what bookies think the truth is - but also, if there is a big spread, then a bookie can get more business by offering a narrower spread and stealing customers from his rivals, plus getting more bets from people who thought the odds were too much of a rip-off before.

You can calculate the odds of a certain hand in cards or of rolling a certain number on two dice by starting with the assumption that a certain number of outcomes are all equally likely; that is one way to "quantify odds".  But it's not the only way to quantify odds, and all odds are ultimately quantified and verified in the same way: with statistical analysis.  That is how you would tell whether someone's predictions in boxing matches were accurate, and *also* how you would tell whether someone's predictions about the odds from dealing cards or rolling dice are accurate.  There are trick decks and loaded dice, you know!It's not that you "change it" in the sense that, say, in order to observe particle A you might need to hit it with particle B, and the collision (which tells you where A is) whacks A onto a different trajectory than it was on before.

Rather, things like photons behave in a way that isn't similar to any objects we see in every day life.  For example, we are familiar with how ripples in water work and we can see the same mechanism at work in waves on the ocean, earthquakes in the earth's crust, vibrations in a violin's strings, and our conversations with one another.  And we are familiar with how billiard balls work on a pool table, and we see the same mechanism at work in car crashes, dominos, baseball, riding a bike, and so on.

What is neat about photons is that we can describe their behavior sort of like a ripple in the water and sort of like a billiard ball.  Neither description is completely correct.  It's hard for people to think about something that is sort of like a ripple and sort of like a billiard ball.  It's like saying... I don't know, I saw something that was sort of like a rhinoceros and sort of like a sonata.  Huh?  

Specifically, when we shoot particle/waves through two slits, we know that the *probability* of the particle/wave being at a given point is given as though were were looking at two ripples diffracting through the slits.  But anything we can provide that will *interact* with the particle/wave will show the particle/wave arriving at exactly one point, as though it were hit with a billiard ball.  We only observe the weird, wave-like pattern by observing many different interaction with many different particles, which reveals the wave-like probability distribution.

People don't like the idea that a billiard ball passes through two slits at once and then crashes into itself on the other side, or that a ripple only exists at one point, so people will often think about particle/waves and talk about particle/waves *as though* it were a ripple right up until the point where we observe it, and then when we observe it, it becomes a billiard ball.  But really it's a particle/wave the whole time, and what's fascinating about it is that it has two properties, each of which are very familiar from the everyday world, but which don't coexist in everyday experience.It's a little more complicated then that.  The ELI5 answer is "yes, basically".

The ELI15 answer is that buying the *exact* same basket of things you consumed in 1971 would probably cost more than 5 times as much in 2015-dollars, and the *exact* same basket of things you consumed in 2015 would have cost more than 1/5 as much 1971-dollars.  This is because people substitute from less efficient to more efficient goods over time.  I think Agatha Christie's biography illustrates this best: "I never thought I would ever be wealthy enough to own a car \u2013 nor so poor that I wouldn\u2019t have servants."  In her childhood, even a wealthy family might not be able to afford a car and even a middling family might be able to afford a servant.  Likewise for the 1970s - there were millionaires who couldn't afford a desktop computer, but other things that were much cheaper, like education, secretarial help, housing, etc.

Edit: I forgot to add the final point, that inflation rates aren't calculated to directly calculate cost of living increases, but to measure "core inflation", the increase in the price level that is purely driven by supply and demand for money rather than the efficiency of production, scarcity of different natural resources, and so on.  That is why inflation isn't always the same as the change in the foreign exchange rate or in the cost of living, and why we go to the trouble to calculate inflation rates even when direct comparisons between baskets of goods 40 years apart don't make much sense in principle.I'm sympathetic to your plight. I've spent half my income on a 1-bdr with roaches before, but an anecdote isn't the basis for social policy.  In my case I was in a neighborhood where many students (including me) were over-spending because they expected their incomes to be significantly higher later on.  Some people in my situation took roommates, some moved to less desirable neighborhoods where apartments were better value, some took additional jobs - I spent $40 on roach traps at Home Depot. (Protip: centipedes are a warning sign of roaches, buy the traps and start harassing your landlord when you see them.)

Bottom line is that 33% of income on housing is the historical rule of thumb, some areas of the country are having housing crunches and that is spiraling out of control, but San Diego is not unusual in this regard and is in line with historical averages.  Could SD housing get even cheaper with a more permissive building regime? Probably, but it's not *as* clear that the cost and benefits come out in favor of aggressive construction when you look at cities like SD.  Are the poor spending vastly more of their income on housing than the rich? Probably not; in the last decade the US average was 40% for the lowest 10% of incomes, 30% for the highest 10%.  Somewhat lower, but most of the higher income just goes to purchasing higher-quality housing.  The 34% average doesn't come from people with below-average incomes spending 50% of their incomes and people with above-average incomes spending 20% of their incomes on housing.First, in real life people don't trumpet opinions they suspect will be unpopular. Atheism is *extremely* unpopular with religious fundamentalists in most of the US (which I suspect is where you are from), and even people who were raised Christian but are non-observant are suspicious.

Second, atheism is even more common in Europe than in the US, and so you will encounter more atheists on an international site than in your daily life.

Third, atheism is even more common among the young than among the elderly, so any technology that is primarily adapted by the young will be used disproportionately by atheists.

Fourth, the people who were early adopters of Reddit tended to be technically inclined, internet-savvy, and generally fit the demographic profile for atheists rather than the profile for, say, evangelical Christians.Well, the problem is that the goods they are selling don't necessarily cross international boundaries! Like if they are legally "headquartered" in the Bahamas, there is never a good or service produced in the Bahamas that comes to the US to slap a tax on.  But yes, broadly speaking you have the right idea... punish them for evading corporate income taxes by revoking privileges that American corporations expect to have.

(Alternately, you could *do away with* corporate income taxes so that where a company is headquartered doesn't matter anymore, and raise some other tax to compensate, which would be just as sensible.)It's an endemic problem.  Many government programs are *legally obliged* to always accept the lowest bid.  This is a holdover from a time when government officials typically awarded contracts to their friends and relatives, or sold the contracts in exchange for kickbacks.  But if you only give contracts to the lowest bid, then *even if everyone is 100% honest*, and all the companies are equally accurate, then on *every project* the lowest bid will be from the company that mistakenly underestimated the cost of the project by the greatest amount.

Because of this requirement, cost overruns in government contracts are common, and projects that come in under-budget are vanishingly rare.  If we simply stopped funding projects when the money ran out, we would waste huge amounts of money on highways, bridges, schools, etc. that were abandoned before completion.  If we threw contractors who couldn't afford to finish projects on budget in jail, there would be no bids.  Some sort of major reform to the system would probably be good, but it's not clear what - incremental reforms requiring more and more precise justifications of the submitted bids haven't really helped.How did you measure the slipperiness that you became convinced that the shower was "less slippery" with more water?

I think typically people are less likely to slip in deep water than on damp, solid surfaces because they know to wade carefully through standing water, but treat damp surfaces exactly like dry surfaces.  More broadly, damp surfaces tend to be packed solid whereas the bottoms of bodies of water (streams, oceans, whatever) are not.The distinction between "anything that could be" outsources and the things that can't be outsourced is called "tradables" vs. "non-tradables".  Many tradables *are* outsourced.  Those that aren't are produced domestically because we produce them, not just more efficiently than other countries, but more efficiently even when you adjust for higher American standards of living.

You seem to be thinking of "jobs that require intelligence" as distinguishing blue-collar jobs from white-collar jobs.  But Americans who work in sock factories, on automotive assembly lines, etc. are *all* more productive than their third-world counterparts using the same machines.  "Higher" and "lower", no matter what the numbers stand for, will be relative to what you are measuring.*I* think so. The basic issue is this: the corporate tax rate is flat (because it is taxed per corporation, not per individual, so we don't know exactly how rich the individual who ultimately pockets the profits is) whereas the income tax is progressive. The richest people pay more, as it should be.  If we raised what we wanted from the income tax instead, we could take most of it from the rich and super-rich and corporations would stop playing games.  The wrinkle is that the people who earn money from taxable income and the people who earn money from corporate profits aren't *exactly* the same people... the latter group are earning money off of their investments and they pay capital gains taxes.  Rates for capital gains are both lower and less progressive, because how much people invest is very sensitive to the rate at which you tax them on the investment.  But overall I don't see that as a problem.  Raise the income tax a moderate amount, the capital gains tax a little, and call it a day.

&gt; but you get taxed big when you make huge amounts of money off of it.

First, it sounds like you are talking about small businesses, which typically don't incorporate and don't pay corporate taxes.  Second, when you make huge amounts of money off a business you are running/investing it, you are typically going to end up paying a capital gains tax, not an income tax.

&gt; I'm not suggesting cutting taxes. ... Just collecting them in another place. What are the advantages to collecting them at the corporate level instead of the income level?

This is something that I've wondered for a while.  So far what I've come up with is: (a) It was probably easier to collect, a long time ago, (b) like sales taxes and VAT, *because* it is less progressive it is easier to raise a large amount of money, (c) it encourages corporations to reinvest their revenue rather than recording a profit, and (d) it makes it harder for the owners to make their capital gains burden disappear with creative accounting (timing their losses and profits just right to pay the minimum possible tax burden).  But I really don't know and I've been meaning to ask someone who understands tax policy for a while.I love "brutally exacerbated" :)Haha, you wouldn't expect *Ireland* to pass laws to end this (unless the countries that are victims of this start making threats that damage other Irish interests).  Most proposals target the corporations, not the tax havens.Just like you can buy a house or a patent, you can buy and sell the right to drive a car which is legally considered a "taxi" in a certain municipal area.  The origins of this system are irrelevant and silly.  The important thing to understand is that just like people who invest in expensive homes get worried when someone wants to build new homes in the same expensive area (because it will make homes less scarce, thus cheaper) and people who invest in patents get worried when someone applies for a patent that would accomplish the same basic function (because it makes the invention they are selling less scare, thus cheaper), taxi drivers worry when someone wants to buy the right to drive a new taxi. 

Taxi drivers (and especially the banks that finance taxi companies) have been leaning on city governments and local politicians to keep the number of taxi medallions low for a long, long time.  Over the course of a century, this has led to a situation where cabs are scarce and cab rides are expensive *purely* for historical reasons, not because of the costs of operating a cab and paying the driver.  A taxi company needs to clear three expenses to make a profit - they need to pay a wage to their drivers, they need to maintain the taxi fleet, *and* they need to earn interest on their expensive taxi medallions.

Uber discovered that legally, there are very few restrictions on running a *limousine* service, where you agree to rent a car in advance.  The legal restrictions are only on running a *taxi* service, where you hail a cab in the street. Historically, it was impossible to hire a limousine service if, say, you were running late after lunch and needed a ride within a few minutes, which is why limos were only pre-booked for special occasions (or fancy people who like to be chauffeured everywhere), and why these services historically used *limousines* instead of cheaper, more practical cars.  But now technology makes it easy.

It is really *taxi medallion owners* (sometimes the same people as the drivers, sometimes not) who have an interest in these disputes, not the drivers.I mean, I'm sympathetic to your "ugh reddit echo chamber" view (you can look through my lowest-rated comments if you imagine I'm some sort of crazed SJW), but I don't think what you are saying has any basis in reality.  The issue isn't competition between regions where a corporation decides that *on balance*, considering all factors including tax policies, it is planning to scale back on operations in high-tax regions and increase operations in low-tax regions.  The corporations are keeping their operations *exactly where they always were* and using the provisions in tax law that are designed to make it easy for corporations to operate in multiple countries to pretend they are operating out of the Bahamas or Ireland.  Apple didn't "leave" Cupertino, CA when they announced the legal fiction that their global headquarters was in Ireland.  The software engineers didn't leave.  The executives didn't leave.  The actual Apple campus is still where it always was.  Their supply chains for manufacturing run all through the US and SE Asia.  *You could destroy the Republic of Ireland, down to the last square inch, with nuclear weapons, and this would not change any aspect of Apple's global operations.* Whether a company that operates like this is allowed to claim to be an Irish company is purely a legal question and the fact that laws exist to permit Irish companies to conveniently operate in the United States and vice versa is only a convenience to these companies, including the *exact* wording of the law that makes Apple's situation possible.  If the US tax code changed to revoke this possibility for all corporations, that would be *less* favorable to corporations and would simultaneously remove any incentive to claim fictional headquarters in tax havens.Well, picture these three possibilities:

1. I make a million, um, chairs, and I sell them all to a Chinese company that picks them up in LA and takes them back to China.

2. I make a million chairs, ship them over to HK on my own boat, and sell them to a Chinese company there.

3. I make a million chairs and sell them to an import/export company that is going to ship them to China and take care of finding a Chinese buyer when the chairs arrive.

Most people would say that if you are going to tax (a) capital gains and/or (b) corporate profits, then it doesn't really matter whether my chair-factory made money from 1, 2, or 3.  What good could you possibly accomplish by taxing them at different rates?If that were True, that should only mean that liability insurance would be very, very cheap.  Like death-and-dismemberment insurance.Partly because people interpret Second Amendment rights extremely broadly, and partly because any sort of gun regulations (even obvious things like licensing) are opposed by a powerful gun lobby.It's quite likely that humans *tried* to domesticate all sorts of animals, but not all of them were possible to domesticate.

They were *useful* because in prehistoric societies food storage and waste disposal were both huge problems.  Large amounts of organic waste would attract vermin, and in particular rodents, and rodents spread diseases and eat/spoil/foul stored food, as well as clothe, rope, etc.  That made cats hugely useful in prehistoric agricultural villages, and in particular cities, purely for the purpose of eating rats and mice.  Even today, if you live in a rural area you will almost certainly get mice in your house if you don't have a cat to hunt them.

(They also hunt rodents that typically don't get inside but can ruin gardens, like chipmunks. But I don't know how important this was historically.)And not just *funding*, but also mandating specific types of care.  Dangerous schizophrenics are dangerous schizophrenics.  They're not happy-go-lucky free spirits who are oppressed by the man and forced into narrow social conventions by pills.  *They are insane, and a danger to themselves and others when roaming free, and a danger to nurses and wardens when roaming free in a health center.*Those statistics are both misleading.  First, most people who are in jail *with* a drugs conviction are not in jail *for* a drugs conviction.  Just like when you investigate a mob boss for racketeering, extortion, and murder you're likely to find some tax evasion as well, when you investigate a garden-variety violent crime you're likely to find the criminal is in possession of drugs, too. They may end up serving concurrent sentences, but it's not like they're "just" drug users anymore than Al Capone was "just" a tax-cheat.&gt; All this griping about the modern mental health system seems to always move towards removing the rights of the mentally ill and to involuntarily confine them.

And it should.  Just because "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest" hit you in the feels doesn't mean that insane people are all misunderstood angels.  It would be just as logical to watch "The Shining" and decide that all ski resorts should be shut down.And moreover, the reason for de-institutionalization is largely that over-optimistic standards for the treatment of the insane made the big old "insane asylums" excessively expensive and dangerous.  We don't need to lock them in damp dungeons and let them foster with tuberculosis, but severe mental illness is not pretty, and there probably isn't any way to make an institutions designed to confine severely mentally ill people a pretty place.They're more likely to be the victim of crimes, they're more likely to commit crimes; the disproportion is greatest for murder... for example: http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2564680

But note the many different definitions of "mental illness".  People like to play fast and loose with definitions.  Dishonest people will talk about people with severe personality disorders in one sentence, and then in another talk about broader categories of mental illness like depression and anxiety.The issue is that voter support for *freedom to own firearms* is very high but voter support for specific gun control measures, when you poll them on specific proposals, is also very high.  The gun lobby might get its high profile and its money from the large number of people who support Second Amendment rights, but they go on to campaign against measures that are only opposed by small minorities of voters.Haha, right that's his question! Why don't we require it? Just like it's a risk when a legally owned car collides with someone else, it's a risk when a legally owned gun is used to commit a crime.&gt; when there are too many immigrants from one country

I think this is the important factor that has been overlooked too often.  When every small immigrant group is pushing in a different direction (a) none of them can become worlds-unto-themselves, a society inside society, (b) none of them has the power or number to drive changes favoring their group, and (c) all of them realize that changing to accommodate the weirdness of *every other tiny ethnic group* would be aggravating.  Actual ethnic diversity among minorities promotes tolerant, liberal mindsets among the immigrants and helps them see that, objectively, the common national culture is more appealing to more people than different parochial cultures.  Ethnic homogeneity promotes clannishness and "us versus them".
&gt; Christ, even when people had years of experience in those countries, they still lacked the fundamental skills. 

This goes up and down the line.  Many multinationals who try expanding their operations from Western countries to the third world do the math, look at the wage for unskilled labor and say "Oh, we'll make so much more money in the third world" and then when they arrive, realize that the "unskilled" workers in their new country are vastly less productive than the "unskilled" workers in the West.  Even what counts as "unskilled" and "uneducated" in Western countries includes a very extensive education and a number of basic skills, plus the ability to acquire new ones with some training.  This is what people who worry about outsourcing don't understand: they think that businesses will keep moving overseas *so long as wages are lower in foreign countries*, but the actual limiting factor is the *low productivity* of foreign workers, not their low wages.I'm not trying to second-guess you on the question of language competence versus software competence, but I've frequently found that the *confidence* of Indians that they are fluent in English exceeds their actual language abilities.You're not going to do too well with an American medical degree in a hospital where every biological, anatomical, pharmaceutical and pathological term is different from what you studied in med school.That's what's saddest about the immigration crises of the last five years.  The radioactive fallout from the previous mistakes with immigration policy, which turned out to have much longer half-lives than imagined, were finally starting to die down without too much permanent damage or any aggressive solutions...If what you mean is "Sweden probably doesn't literally have the 6th highest rape rate in the world", you are probably right. A few of the countries right underneath it may have a higher rate of underreporting, and some of the countries that don't report a rape rate might be above it as well. 

If what you mean is "Sweden probably doesn't have a very high rape rate for a wealthy Western country", you are probably wrong, but certainly it's a hypothesis that needs to be explored. 

If what you mean is "The spike in Swedish rape rate in the last generation is actually just a spike *reporting*, not in *sexual assault*", then you're delusional.  And it would really be better if you specifically disavowed this interpretation, since people who spread "SWEDEN UNDERREPORTS RAPE" canard are typically using it to pretend Sweden doesn't have a rape problem."Sweden has competent central bank" is not a terribly interesting story, because no one every denied that Sweden has a competent central bank, and even if they had it isn't a politically salient issue. It's normal for unemployment to decline from close-to-10% in downturns to close-to-5% in recoveries.  "Sweden's immigration policies were terribly misguided" *is* interesting, because people do deny it and pro-immigration views have become important not only to leftists but even to the center-right.

&gt; Also, this is a failure of the Swedish government to some extent. Government should have a plan for integrating new people. Hungary, Austria, Germany, Norway, Czech Republic and the UK all have rates half this number.

Exactly so.  You can't blame people from the third world for wanting to live on welfare in the first world, if a first-world country extends that offer to them.I don't think that's really True.  I'm liberal and you'll never find me being sentimental about immigration statistics.  It's just that anti-anti-immigrant fervor has reached a point that you're assuming every single person who agrees with you about immigration is a far-right extremist.  But that's what the SJWs want you to think!I think you may be confusing two different stats - the issue with the so-called "Syrian refugees" is that most of them aren't Syrian, as demonstrated by the fact that they can't read, write, or understand Syrian Arabic. I've seen stats that 60%-80% of people claiming to be Syrian are Arabic-illiterate, but that's different from saying that the Syrians themselves are illiterate at that rate.It's not so much that it's harder as that it's forbidden. Japan makes immigration difficult, naturalization harder, and doesn't take refugees (and good for them).I don't think "colonialism" is a great explanation.  There have always been empires and conquered peoples.  There were empires in the Americas, Africa, the Middle East, Central Asia, East Asia, and Oceania from time immemorial.  What about the Seljuks and the Ottomans? What about the Mughals? What about the Chinese, from the Zhou dynasty onwards? What about the *Mongols*, for heaven's sake? If conquering foreign lands, treating them brutally, enslaving them, taking their resources, borrowing their cultures, and setting up vast trade empires contributed to civilization, then Mongolia would be the most developed country on earth.  

I'm not trying to say modernization could have happened exactly the same way without global oceanic trade networks, but "colonialism" and "imperialism" don't actually have much explanatory power.  It's just a common feature of human psychology - preemptively announcing that you know you are likely to be targeted with insult X makes the insult hurt less.&gt; Not that the UK/Europe's anti-racisim/hate speech is part of this, but imagine if a group got so big they demanded that it be illegal to depict Mohamed or criticize/bash the Quran?

Wait... they don't? I'm pretty sure that European muslims make exactly this claim.  My memory may be failing but I'm pretty sure that as far back as 20 years ago, when the *Satanic Verses* came out, *British* Muslims wanted it banned for blasphemy.Pretty sure Chinese doctors don't study Latin roots.  I'd be interested to know how it goes in the Middle East, Central Asia, and India.  From what I've seen of how Slavic languages write latin-derived words, I doubt an American doctor would recognize any of those.  But even having medical conversations with people speaking a *Romance* language isn't easy.

&gt; Further, if Medical School was soley about learning vocabulary it would take about six months.

You have never even thought about how medicine works.Yes: so you need the medical training, fluency (or at least high proficiency) in the foreign language, plus you need to memorize a large number of terms that you would normally never encounter in a foreign language class, and in fact, most native speakers never learn unless they have medical training. And *then* you would be qualified to practice in a foreign hospital.Rules on which peripheral features guns can be manufactured and sold with, rules on waiting periods, rules on special exemptions for gun shows, that sort of thing.That's not actually True.  Your insurance will cover accidental consequences of illegal acts and also your liability to others for criminal negligence.  An example of the former would be health insurance paying the bill after you jump off your roof while tripping on acid; the acid is illegal but the damage you suffer as a result is covered.  An example of the latter would be damage you do to another car while drunk-driving or driving recklessly.

At any rate, liability and insurability are questions of civil law.  You can always change the law.("pidgin")I'm not sure what you could be doing if you've never had a patient who doesn't speak English and needed the medical interpreter.Well, mandatory insurance for guns would be more like the bastard insurance baby no one likes to talk about, but that doesn't mean it couldn't be done.http://www.people-press.org/2015/08/13/continued-bipartisan-support-for-expanded-background-checks-on-gun-sales/

This set of polls didn't track waiting period question, but honestly - I'm not your research monkey. I understand that being a gun nut must be grueling work, but if you doubt someone's word when they make a claim you should either know how to research both sides of the question yourself, or you should be comfortable admitting you are ignorant of certain topics.

edit: "gun show" s.b. "waiting period"Your question is a little unclear.  By "Caucasian" do you mean "living in the Caucasus mountains?" Then it's a trick question because there *are* tribal groups still living in the Caucasus mountains.  Is "Caucasian" a euphemism for "genetically a descendant of white Europeans"? Then the answer is still that it's a still a trick question, because being white is no objection to belonging to an autonomous tribal group in the US or Canada, most of which are allowed to set their own standards for tribal affiliation.  

If what you mean by "Caucasian indigenous tribes" is "European tribes, still living in Europe" then the answer is that tribal organization tends to arise prior to civilization and, after the tribe is incorporated into a literate, urban culture, tends to persist only among nomads.  Parts of Europe started to transition from tribal organization to civic and political organization as long as 2800 years ago; most of the rest of Europe was de-tribalized by around 800 AD, 1200 years ago. The remaining nomads in Europe are the Romani and, in the Arctic, the Saami; they are sometimes describes as living in tribes.First, chromosome count is not a measure of how many genes you have, which seems to be the motivation for your question.  It's just a matter of how the genes are grouped.  Chimps and humans have different numbers of chromosomes but two of the chimp chromosomes have basically the exact same genes as one of the human ones: obviously either the ancestor chromosome broke apart in chimps, or two ancestor chromosomes fused in humans.

Second, the number of genes is correlated with morphological complexity, but only for bacteria and simple creatures -- past a certain level, complexity arises more out of how the genes interact with one another than the raw number of them.  The simplest bacteria have 2,000 genes, fungi have 6,000, humans have 20,000, trees have like tens of thousands.  But those genes are all of different length, and interact with one another in different ways.  And in fact, most of the DNA we have doesn't code for anything at all!  So it's hard to get any clear measure either of which creatures have the "most" genetic material, or for that matter which are most "complex."The lowest is 57%... the other ones are even higher.

Well, I should have asked you to guess what *you* thought the numbers were before running errands for you.  I should have expected that you if you weren't willing to find the information yourself, you didn't particularly want someone else to find it for you.Ah okay, from your comments history I see you are from Singapore. :)  Not much in the way of electoral competition there...

Basically the way it works is this.  In the vast majority of countries which don't have the good fortune to be ruled by the Lee family, if you do poorly in an election it doesn't matter much *how* poorly you do.  The details different from election to election.  Some examples:

1.  US elections tend to be winner-take-all.  Whoever gets the most votes is elected, and the 2nd, 3rd, 4th and lower-ranked candidates get nothing all.

2. In many countries with parliamentary systems, while the 3rd ranked party will still get more seats than the 4th ranked party (for example), the 1st ranked party will get the Prime Minister's seat and the chance to form a government, and potentially a big bump in their number of seats as well. (So for example, they could potentially win 35% of the votes and get 50% of the seats.)

3. In still other parliamentary systems, there is a threshold for receiving seats - parties that pass some threshold, like 5% of the vote, will get more than 5% of the seats in parliament, while parties that receive 4% or lower will receive no seats.

4. Some countries, notably France, have run-off elections.  Here the threshold is *second* place: the first and second place candidates go into the second round of voting as equals, and the third-place candidate doesn't get to compete at all.

So in the US you might say "I prefer Kasich to anyone else, but Kasich is polling around 1%, so he'll lose; it doesn't matter whether he comes in 6th or 7th place.  I don't really like Cruz, but Cruz is the only one who is competitive with Trump, and it really matters whether Cruz comes in 1st and Trump 2nd, or vice-versa. So I'll vote for Cruz because I prefer that he beat Trump."

Or in a French presidential election you might say, "I would really prefer one of the Communist candidates over Hollande, but if *any* leftist politician gets 1st or 2nd place and goes into the run-off, it will be Hollande; whether the Communist candidate gets 5th or 6th place, but I would really *hate* to see a run-off where Sarkozy is facing off against Le Pen and there is no leftist candidate at all.  So I'll support Hollande."

Make sense?It's called the "central limit theorem", and you really have to take a statistics class to understand it.  Basically you can prove mathematically that if you have some huge set of things (people, plants, pints of ice cream, whatever) and randomly select a few hundred items from that set, it's *extremely* unlikely that the random sample you selected will be very different from the total makeup of the entire set of things.

The difficulty is making the selection truly random.  We know how to make a random selection out of a deck of cards by shuffling the deck, but ... let's say you wanted to find 500 random Americans for a poll, and you got out of a plane in Philadelphia and said, "Okay, I'll just ask the first 500 people I run into on the streets of Philly, completely at random, that will be my sample." Well, no, that's not a random sample: they're all from Philadelphia, because that's where you happened to land, and Philadelphia has very different demographics than other cities, not to mention suburbs and rural counties.

So the challenge with the poll numbers isn't so much getting a sufficiently large number of people, but making sure you chose them randomly.  And you do that by comparing the people you chose to the actual characteristics of all American voters, to see whether your sample randomly came up with the exact same demographic characteristics that America has overall.  If it's not a match, you need to rejigger your numbers.No, the Romans wouldn't have "olive skin and black hair".  You're thinking of Italian-Americans, whose grandparents disproportionately came Sicily, the poorest, most agricultural region of Italy... and also a region that was exposed to Arabic raids, invasions, and conquests from 650 AD and was only reconquered by Christians in 1060 AD.

Anyway, to answer your question about accents... at the time of the first "talkies", standard national accents weren't so well established as they are today.  Most Americans would speak with an instantly recognizable regional accent.  Think JFK's New England accent, Richard Feynman's New York accent, Faulkner's Southern accent.  (The situation was broadly similar in Britain, although I can't name the major accents that well.) Most actors would have grown up speaking in a way that was instantly recognizable as the speech of a particular place - just like it would be weird to have Al Jolson sing minstrel songs in a Yiddish accent.  And even the accent we now instantly accept as "standard" might have sounded pretty Midwestern.  The solution movie studios had to this problem was to teach many of the stars to speak in an accent that resembled a number of accents but wasn't actually the same as any... called the "Mid-Atlantic" accent because it is half British, half American.  That way it never seemed exactly wrong, no matter who they were supposed to be playing.

Over time they stopped teaching the "Mid Atlantic" accent because actors got into learning a new accent for every single role, if the part called for it.  But it persisted in big historical epics, whether set in medieval England, colonial America, or the ancient world, because it was accepted that it would be weird to have people speaking in anachronistic accents, so it would be better to give them the timeless, placeless accent.  It was also used for the strange Hollywood convention of English-speaking foreigners, \u00e0 la the Von Trapp family.  But as American speech became more and more standardized, these intermediate accents didn't really sound unplaceable to Americans, they just sounded *British*.  So the convention became that when you hear actors speaking with a British-sounding accent for no clear reason, we know we've moved to a different time and place.I think there is some uncertainty about this.  If it really only dates back to Middle English and is a construction based on other *-standen* verbs, it probably was a metaphor with the same meaning as the contemporary "to stand behind" -- if you stand behind a statement or claim you have a firm grasp of it, but if you have a shaky grasp of it you don't feel that you can stand behind it.

But on the other hand... if *understand* goes back to Old English then *under* would actually mean "between" (and *understanding* would be an almost exact cognate for Latin *interstices*), and *stand* might mean "step".  Since the other common word in German languages with this meaning is *verstand*, also present in Middle English as *forstand*, with the ver-/for- meaning "across, through", it seems likely that what they had in mind was something like "to get across", as we say today.  The idea "steps across" or "steps between" if it's getting across to you.This is great and I don't want to contradict you, but you make it sound like as soon as the Romans showed up anywhere, the tribes just melted away.  Instead I would say there's no clear point where the tribes stopped existing; they just became fossilized remnants frozen in a more complicated social system.  Technically, Rome was governed by a tribal confederation (*comitia tribunata*, the Tribal Committees, or Tribal Assembly), and its tribunes (i.e., tribal leaders or representatives) held incredible power throughout the Republic, after which the official status of the Roman emperors (starting with Caesar and Augustus) was simply "tribune".  Can we identify a year when Rome stopped being a tribal society? I think that would be pointless, and likewise for the Franks and all the rest.Or maybe not. :) But if the question interests you, you can spend the next decade in the library trying to understand different philosophers trying to understand understanding without using the word "understand".Is what you're looking for a link to a proof or some sort of intuitive "feel" for why the rule makes sense?Yes, and *stare* is a cognate for *stand* from PIE *steh*.  Amusingly, superstition and understanding are opposites both via meaning and etymology.  (Interestingly, even though per+stare and inter+stare didn't end up getting put to the epistemological use like *forstand* and *understand*, con+stare did, as in French *constater*. And speaking of *episteme*... yes, that is the Hellenic equivalent to *abstehen*)The purpose of the debt isn't really to borrow money but to control the amount of money in circulation.  If the Fed so chose, it could slash interest rates down to zero, or below zero, to try to convince everyone to sell their bonds back to the government.  Instead they're likely to raise rates, causing people to buy more bonds that the government currently owns.  Why? Because they want to get money out of the economy to head off inflation.

If we told the debt holders to piss off, then - besides impoverishing people who having essential savings invested in US bonds and crippling the international financial system, which uses bonds as petty cash the way we use $20 bills - the Fed wouldn't have this marvelously simply tool for controlling economic growth, and managing the business cycle would get a lot trickier.Because people don't want the same schedule every week.  Generally the issue is that the business is open 40 hours a week or longer, and the part-time employees strongly prefer one shift over another, but the shift they prefer is the one that the business doesn't particularly need more staff for. In theory you could solve this by paying people more for working the unpopular shifts, but more frequently it turns into a sort of tacit contract where you take shifts that you hate but your boss really needs in exchange for also getting some shifts that you like but the boss could easily fill.  

Also, in many cases people want part-time jobs *specifically* for the scheduling flexibility.  That way if they have their own small business, family responsibilities, auditions, or whatever else, they can let the boss know when they're free and he has to try to fit in everyone's preferences.Minke whales are not hyperintelligent, or even sort of intelligent.The myth that they can't sell the whale meat is something spread by Greenpeace.In this thread you are needed as a: racist oppressor.  Congratulations on becoming white.  Your instructions on how to microaggress will arrive in the mail.No, not really... the most prominent candidates are generally prominent *because* they are getting a lot of support from voters, not vice-versa.  Okay, think of it this way.  The functions both approach some number that is impossible to do division with: let's say 0 for clarity. f(c)=0, g(c)=0, (f/g)(c) is undefined.  The one other condition for the rule to work is that the *first derivative* of each function is "continuous" at that point, in other words it approaches some number, and for g'(c) the number *isn't* zero: that means that for any number close to c to choose (call it c'), f'(c') is defined, g'(c') is defined, (f'/g')(c') is defined, and also (f'/g')(x) is approaching some number as x approaches c (in most cases, the same number as (f'/g')(c), although that isn't necessary).  Let's say in our case, (f'/g')(c)=4.

What "approaches" means here is that you can get arbitrarily close to the number you're approaching if you get close enough.  So if you get close enough to c, then (f'/g') will always be very, very close to 4.  Since f(x) and g(x) are both approaching the same number (zero) but they aren't approaching it at the same rate (the value of f(x) is falling four times faster), the only way for f(c) to be equal to g(c) is if, for numbers very, very close to c, f(c') is always four times farther from zero than g(c') (because unless f(c') has four times as far to go, f(x) will hit zero *before* g(x) does).  That means once you get close enough, even though all the values of f(x) and g(x) are impossibly tiny numbers, f(x) is always *almost* exactly 4 times g(x).  If f(c')/g(c') isn't close enough to 4 for your tastes, you can choose some smaller margin of error, and there will be a c'' such that (f/g)(c'') matches that.  From that point on you can keep choosing numbers closer to c such that for (f/g)(x) is almost exactly 4 for c''', for c'''', for c''''', and so on infinitely.  And that is just what it *means* to say that (f/g)(x) approaches 4 as x approaches c.If you need financial issues explained to you on ELI5, you just *shouldn't* be following the financial news.  Your stocks will rise in value over time if you invest them in a diversified, passively managed index fund.  Your job as a responsible investor is to only put in money you don't need right now, and not check the balance of your brokerage account for another decade.  

Flooey's answer isn't *wrong* - in general, higher oil prices can be seen either as a sign of rising costs of production *or* as a sign of strong global demand.  Which side of the equation is more important for assessing future economic growth is a complicated analytical question.  But more importantly, *the financial sector has tried to predict both of these effects long before you even thought about them*, and changes in the market reflect a difference between recent information and pre-existing predictions, not between recent information and older information.  A price of oil that is lower than last year's price could be either higher or lower than *what analysts were predicting for this year's price*, and that difference is what is likely to move markets.  But it gets even more complex than that - the market is anticipating rate hikes from the Fed, which will cut economic production.  Good news for the economy tends to push the Fed towards rate hikes, which are (in the short term) bad news for the economy.  So current faster-than-expected economic growth can be good evidence that economic growth will slow within a few months.  And there are even stranger interconnections between stock prices.  Famously, when Russia defaulted on its ruble-denominated debt, the difference between the price of Royal Dutch and Shell (which are the same company, but listed separately as a British and a Dutch stock) spiked.  Why? Because a huge hedge fund that was betting Russia would never default on ruble-denominated debt without also defaulting on dollar-denominated debt was *also* betting that Royal Dutch Shell would never pay a dividend to the Dutch stock without paying a profit to the British stock, and when they lost money on the default they had to unwind their position in Royal Dutch Shell, too, selling Shell and buying Royal Dutch.  

If it's not your job you shouldn't waste time thinking about it.  Stay diversified, don't pick stocks, invest for the long term, keep money you need in the near future out of risky assets.Securing the nomination? A chance, yes.  Hard to say how much of a chance.  If it is still a 6-way race in the first few states and he wins massively more early delegates than the other candidates, I'd say he has a very good chance.  He's been the front-runner for six months now and hasn't disintegrated from the spotlight, the GOP establishment is already hostile to him and trying to push Cruz, so it's hard to see what could change between now and then.

Historically the incumbent party wins during economic recoveries and the challenger wins during recessions.  We're due for a short little recession from the Federal Reserve, so Trump has a good chance.  But the historical data *also* show that central bankers appear to favor Republican candidates with their decisions about interest rates - which actually isn't good news for Trump unless he runs against Sanders, because the financial elite simply are not happy with Trump. -- However, Trump has fantastically high negative ratings (60%), has never held any political office, and quite frankly isn't much of a success as a businessman, so if we will ever see an exception to the "challengers win in recessions" rule, Trump might be it.So you know how when you read a newspaper, people might say something like "She was looking very elegant in her evening dress," but someone with less formal education might say "She look fleek in dat dress she wearin'"?  You can see how across time and space, speakers who don't communicate which *each other* adapt to new ways of talking that have features other people can't express.  This includes grammar (some people might not use constructions like "was looking", or even "looked", to talk about the past), vocabulary (to be honest, I don't even know what "fleek" means, maybe it's a compliment?), and phonology (for example, some English speakers can't make a "th" sound and say "dat" for that, and they make sounds I have trouble with, like the "mr" in "mrusic").  At a certain point, it gets tougher for people who speak in different ways to understand one another, and that just encourages them to speak only to their neighbors.  Finally, they can barely make out what people from other areas are saying.

Now, why did Latin become a *living* language? Because a bunch of herders and horse-traders who lived north of the Black Sea (Ukraine, southern Russia), who all spoke the same language, spread out from India and Tibet in the east to Britain and Spain in the west.  At a certain point, the people who had gone from Ukraine to Central Europe just had no way to talk to the people who had gone from Ukraine to Centra Asia anymore, so when European members of this big family started speaking in a different way, the fad didn't reach the Asian branch, and vice-versa.  And that extended down to the different branches of the European family, as well.  The people who migrated to Italy went a long, long time without ever hearing a single word spoken by distant cousins who migrated to Spain, Denmark, or Greece.  So after a thousand years of relative isolation, the people who lived on the hills around the Tiber weren't speaking Indo-European, or even Western Indo-European; they shared some features with Sanskit and Persian, and many more features with Celtic, Germanic, and maybe Greek (complicated), but mostly the people living on each hill spoke the same language as people living on the *next* hill, and they couldn't understand distant cousins living beyond the Alps anymore.  That language was Latin.

But the language didn't stop changing when it became different enough that the Celts couldn't understand it.  It continued to change; and it's quite likely "Latin" speakers alive in 700 BC would have had a hell of a hard time understanding most Latin speakers in 1 BC.  The only reason we call them all "Latin" speakers is because they never left Rome, so the speakers of, say, three languages - call them Archaic Latin, Classical Latin, and Vulgar Latin - all lived in the exact same place, so even when the way Romans spoke changed, all Romans changed at the same time.

Well, almost all.  We can see how fast Latin was changing by looking at the writing of Cicero, Horace, Seneca, and so on, and comparing it to how Romans actually spoke.  These educated Romans went to school specifically to be able to preserve a literary way of speaking and writing... that allowed them to read old Roman annals, poems, and plays, and also communicate ideas to other Romans using the same language.  But their servants, slaves, and soldiers were *not* speaking that way.  By the time classical Latin literature appears, the vocabulary had changed (for example, they started calling a head a "pot" as slang, and then stopped calling the head anything *but* a pot), some of the phonology changed (they stopped making distinctions between certain vowels), the grammar had changed (they used the case system less, and syntax more).  

That was how people were speaking when the Romans conquered the Western world.  Colonists brought Latin to Gaul, Hispania, Africa, Dacia, and Illyria, and the natives started learning Latin to cooperate with their new neighbors.  But Latin *kept changing*, and now the Hispania-colonists were rarely seeing the Gaul-colonists, neither of them got back to Rome very often, and Dacia was just way out there on the frontier of the empire.  So the languages changed in different ways.  For a long time everyone thought they were still speaking Latin, but just that those "other guys" were speaking it in a really weird way.  It started with the Sardinians -- very early on, the other Latin-speakers said "we have no idea what these guys on Sardinia are saying".  It started to be an issue because (Christianity was big by now) no one could read the old classical Latin Bible anymore; so St. Jerome translated into into the vulgar (recent) Latin.  But then a few hundred years later, no one could read *that*, and the Church had parishes everywhere where the priest didn't understand what he was reading and the congregation didn't understand what they were hearing.  By this point writers realized two things: (i) Latin wasn't just a fancy, formal version of their own language (like how we write English in newspapers and books), it was a different language. So they started to write books in Italian, French, and Spanish. (ii) No one really understood how to speak Latin anymore! But people still wanted to read the accumulated wisdom written in Latin, and communicated with people from other countries in Latin, so they had to first, study how Latin actually worked, and then teach it to people as a foreign language.

That's the point at which Latin was recognized as "dead".  There were still people who were fluent in classical Latin and wrote amazing books in Latin, had deep debates in Latin, but they had to learn it as a foreign language from *other* people who had learned it as a foreign language.  And all of the daughter languages were recognized to be connected to Latin, but different from both the mother-language, and each other.

It's interesting to compare this to Greek!  The Greeks also established a big empire, and a vulgar form of Greek was spoken from Egypt to Crimea.  But just like there is no Latin-descended language in Britain, Hungary, or Yugoslavia because the Latin colonies in these areas where overrun and extirpated by barbarians, there is no Greek-descended language *anywhere* outside of Greece because all of the Greek-speakers in Egypt, Palestine, Syria, and Anatolia were overrun and either killed, forced to flee, or forced to start speaking Arabic/Turkish; and likewise for the northern parts of the Greek cultural zone, where were invaded first by Iranian-speaking peoples, and then by Slavs.  So even thought modern ("demotic") Greek is quite different from Ancient Greek, no one says that Greek "died".  Languages only die when there are daughter languages.Two aspects: the New Deal, and cost-disease.

The New Deal: During the 19th century, and especially during the so-called "Gilded Age", western economies had a gold standard which led to random slumps, stagnant recoveries, and, thus, persistent unemployment. :( They also has a policy of not interfering in the business world ("laissez-faire")... you could sell cocaine-flavored soda as a medicine, you could ask workers to work for 16 hours a day, whatever you want. 

This was terrible for workers, WWI made it worse, and the post-war peace settlement after WWI made it *much much* worse. In some places workers abandoned the mainstream political parties (which basically embraced the two dogmas) for extremist parties like the Fascists, the NSDAP, and the Communists.  In other places, mainstream parties realize this wasn't working and (i) replaced the gold standard with active central bank policies that encouraged business activity and employment, which meant workers were in demand and the working class started to share equally in economic growth, plus (ii) replaced laissez-faire with a network of social safety nets to protect people in difficult situations, economic regulations to prevent businesses from following selfish, destructive polices, and labor laws that allowed unions and permitted all workers to negotiate with one voice, just as corporations allowed all the investors and managers to speak with one voice.  After WWII, a political elite that was grateful to the veterans and wary of proving the USSR right about the inequality of capitalism further strengthened these programs.

However, some parts of the social elite were never very happy with this and thirty years later they had built up a political coalition that started chipping away at the New Deal.  Like any big program, some of the protections it put in place were miscalculations; others were suited only to a certain time and place; for some, their value was only apparent in an emergency (like 2008), so there was no clear sign that something dangerous had happened.  But by 2005, most of the New Deal had been rolled back.  Your grandfather could get college paid for by the government, a union job, a cheap mortgage, a defined-benefit pension, etc.  You can't, because the people who were born right after the New Deal took it for granted.

Cost-disease: as human beings get more tools, they get more productive.  As they get more productive, they can demand higher wages.  But they don't get more productive in every field at the same time, which means that old-fashioned industries that haven't improved much get vastly more expensive.  Look at it this way: in the year of the lord 1300, if you are rich and powerful a commoner might have the choice between scratching mud with a stick, and being your servant.  In 1850, he might have the choice between driving a mechanical plow or reaper over dozens of acres, and being your servant. In 1950 he might have the choice between building a car on an assembly line, and being your servant.  Since he has better choices in 1950 than 1300, as time goes on you have to pay more and more for servants, even though servants do the same thing: that's cost-disease.  A long time ago, it was normal for "middle class" people to have a servant, but no longer; now, ironically, most people have to do a lot of menial tasks themselves.  More recently, it was normal to: have a house with a big lawn in the suburbs, give your children a good education, possibly up through college if they were interested, pay for full and complete health care, own one or two cars.  All these were considered basic necessities of life, and attainable for anyone who was willing to work... not even work hard, just work.  But they have all suffered horribly from cost-disease, such that now many people can't sleep at night because they don't know how they'll pay the mortgage (or even get together a downpayment to *get* a mortgage), educate their kids (or pay the loans for an education their parents couldn't pay for), pay the dentist or the surgeon, make a car payment, find childcare... these are sources of major anxiety for a huge percentage of the populations, partly because until very recently these were staples of life, like getting enough food and having a warm place to sleep. People were raised to expect they *must* have these things (and they are very important), so it's hard to give them up, and even harder to pay for them.

But on the other hand, in 2015 12 year-old welfare babies carry around cellphones in their pockets with more computing power than the US Government could afford for the Manhattan project in 1945. People routinely travel to exotic destinations, hundreds of miles away for the cost of a nice dinner. There are lots of perks to being alive in 2015, because cost disease is *caused by* increased productivity in newer industries, but cost disease in sectors that are vital to human life are tough to deal with.Let's say that I get you into a hypnotic state.  We're in a crowded room.  I tell you that the room is empty, and because of the hypnotic suggestion you believe me.  I tell you to walk from one side of the room together.  You will (this has been tested repeatedly) carefully walk from one side of the room to the other, avoiding all the furniture and junk; and when I ask you *why* you walked that way, you will give any number of sincere, convincing explanations for the meandering path you took, all of which are clearly False since the only even vaguely probable reason to take that path would be to avoid crashing into the furniture that you don't believe exists.

Likewise, we know that people with neurological vision problem -- for example, people who do not see anything to their left, or in the lower part of their field of vision -- will avoid obstacles and respond to dangers in their blindspot, but will be unable to explain why they acted as they did, and in fact will be completely unable even to guess at what they saw.

There is another phenomenon called subception where experimenters shock healthy people when they say/do certain triggers.  The test subjects will learn to avoid the triggers, but they won't realize *that* they are avoiding the triggers, or what the triggers are, and will not believe that they way they word certain statements or performed certain actions are at all affected by shock-avoidance -- they will have a different theory for why they do what they do. (BTW, I have read *about* these experiments, but haven't read the articles themselves, so I can't answer questions about it - it seems rather extraordinary to me.)

There are a huge number of these phenomena where people have the experience of making a choice for reason X, when it is really, due to some special circumstance, glaringly obvious that the choice was made for reason Y.  That implies that the experience of "making a decision" is not actually causal: it is something we do after our neurons have already set an action in motion.  Sometimes we might have access to the real reason for the action (either because it would be obvious to everyone, or because we are somehow tuned into the brain-processes that *do* decide), but clearly we don't *always* have access, and we have no reason to be sure that we *usually* have access.  The only evidence we have that we make a decision to do X because Y is that it certainly *feels* like we are doing X because Y, but because these feeling is equally strong and equally convincing in the cases where it is 100% wrong, that feeling doesn't count as evidence at all. And that is why people would call that feeling an illusion.

(Note that this idea  - that the decisions we think we are making are an *illusion* - is very different from a different idea that many people are talking about here, that our decisions are forced on us by antecedent causes, and so our will is "determined" by physical causes in the same way as the movement of molecules is determined.  Here, you might say that the will is not free, or you might say that the sense in which will is free is different than and compatible with the sense in which it is forced by physical causes, but we wouldn't say in any case that the will and the decision-making process are *illusions*.)Eh, I don't think the major factors have been covered explicitly enough.

Other than being a healthy organism in general (not sick, not weak, not crippled, not dumb) what you want more than anything else in a partner is *fertility*.  Fertility is caused by different pathways in men and women, since their bodies do different things in reproduction; male fertility is roughly related to having a lot of testosterone and other chemicals that regulate the male developmental pathway, and female fertility by estrogen, estradiol, and female chemicals.  These chemicals have *accidental affects on human growth that affect human appearance*.  These are called secondary sex characteristics.  These include especially bone structure, but also the distribution of fat and muscle.  A skinny man and a skinny woman look distinctly different, due to the different way they store what little fat they have on their bodies, the hip-to-shoulder ratio of their skeleton, the greater prominence of the man's muscles, and especially the unmistakably male and female facial structure.  The more fat you add to this basic set up, the more of these hormonally-caused differences in human body size disappear.  As a human being adds fat, the shape of the human body approximates a perfect sphere, which is sexless and therefore unattractive.  The structure of the hips, shoulders, skull, musculature, and sex-linked fatty deposits are buried under a mountain of lard.  Also, fat screws with metabolism and causes breakdown in hormone regulation for both sexes.  Men lose body hair where they should have it, women grow attractive mustaches.

Second, you say that "fat people are better suited for survival", but this is False in two ways.  At what point in human history would human beings have learned to associated obesity with better food storage?  You can only evolve to be attracted to something under circumstances where the trait exists.  People probably did *not* get obese in our ancestral environment, because there just wasn't enough food to go around.  Hunter-gatherer societies rarely have people who are so much as overweight, because they fight a daily battle for calories.  Farmers tended to suffer terrible malnutrition, as their populations expanded to fill up all fertile land.  That's sort of like saying "you should be attracted to people who are good at calculus, because they'll get good jobs and help you raise a lot of children."  That may be True in theory, but was there anyone who was studying calculus around when humans evolved to be attracted to secondary sex traits?

But further, survival was much more physical in our ancestral environment.  People who are obese are often 50-100 lbs overweight.  Yes, they could survive a famine better than I could, but what about a lion? What about a rival tribe?  Pack 100 lbs of books into a big hiking pack and ... well, first, just try to stand up.  Then run up a flight of stairs.  Jump.  Practice your alternating lunge.  Pick up a piece of paper off the floor.  How does it feel to be obese? Do you think your chances of surviving in the wild are good?Stretching is good for you because doing any kind of work (using your muscles) damages the muscle to some degree, which means the filaments that make up the muscles are no longer in alignment.  Pulling them all to their maximum length gets them all straight again, which allows repairs to begin, and gets them ready for use.  (Think of a tangled box of wires - you need to start by pulling them all to their full length, untangling them from each other before you can use them all.)

*Because* it is good for you, your body rewards you with a little hit of dopamine for stretching, especially for stretching sore muscles. Dopamine is basically human-heroin; the body's way of getting you addicted to healthy behavior.  This is actually why stretching too much before exercise is dangerous - ideally as soon as you hurt a muscle, you'll wince and stop exercising.  Stretched muscles are less prone to injury in an absolute sense, but that dopamine makes exercise feel great even when you're in the process of tearing something.Western accounting/financial conventions mostly go back to the Renaissance and the late Middle Ages, at which point many financial records were kept in Latin.  It was pretty common in Latin to put adjectives *after* the noun (still common in the languages descended from Latin): think of some common Latin phrases you know.  Like *annus mirabilis*, "year wonderful".  So of course if you wanted to say "six pounds (of silver)", you wouldn't say put the adjective first like us, you would say "librae sex", adjective second.  So those medieval scribes, if they were doing a lot of financial records, would naturally abbreviate it "L VI" or "L 6", putting the first letter of "pounds" (librae) first, the way they would naturally say it.  Once these things get established as habits, they are very hard to change; and obviously it has uses, as people are describing in other comments, although I don't think any of them actually get at *why* so many currency symbols are written in front of the number.Something is literary when it is writing for writing's sake.  If you are writing a message, say, offering to meet someone for lunch next Tuesday, your message *uses letters*, but that alone doesn't make it literature, in the same way that banging your hands on a piano doesn't make you a musician. The reason is that you can accomplish your goal without necessarily writing *well*.  Absolutely anything that accomplishes that goal would make it an effective message, even if it were an ugly one; it just depends on what the person you are writing to will understand. The same goes for writing threats, demands, business offers, statistical analyses, and so on; there are millions of ways to write where the bare minimum of mutual comprehension gets the message across, and so you can write out words, sentences, and even books that are *effective* but still *terrible writing*.

Now, you might assume that any work of poetry or fiction that someone reads for enjoyment would be "writing for writing's sake", because if the experience of reading it is your reason for reading it, then the book can't be good in any other way than, good as literature.  But this isn't quite True.  First of all, it goes without saying that many people have written stories for the sorts of reasons I mentioned above, to convey warnings or threats (like fables with heavy-handed morals), to indoctrinate others in their beliefs, to teach key vocabulary words, even to give hidden geography lessons.  I'm sure you'll admit that a story could be a very, very good geography lesson, but still a mediocre *story*; the writer would probably consider the quality of the story as something *extra*, a distraction from the main purpose of the book, that he needs to add to get the kids to keep reading the book.

But beyond even those works of fiction that are written with an ulterior motive, there are works of fiction that are written to provide great experiences, but *still aren't good books*.  How is that possible? Well, there is a difference between experiencing the book itself, and using the book as an experience-creation machine.  For example, imagine someone who is just *obsessed* with guns.  He loves guns.  He goes to gun shows to see guns.  He subscribes to gun magazines.  He searches for images of guns only. If there is an /r/guns, he probably browses it.  Now, if he reads a novel in which the characters own, and carry, and fire a lot of guns, and there are paragraphs and paragraphs of descriptions of guns and gun-manufacturers and shooting, will he like it? Sure.  But the reason he likes it is because it gives him the same sort of gun-immersion experience that gun shows or gun magazines give him.  The gun-porn novel isn't a good book any more than the gun show is a good book.  You could write a story that was a fantastic experience-generation machine for a gun fanatic, but which most people would agree was really, really terrible.  

An especially important version of the experience-generation machine for fiction is *escapism*.  Escapism is what you get when the experience that someone really craves is to abandon his own sad little life, and exchange it for something better.  First-best would be to *actually* make the switch and be a new person, but second-best would be to feel like you had made the switch, at least for a few hours.  For that, you need an experience-generation machine.  Some people like movies, some like music, others like drugs, some like books. Some people want to forget that they're poor and imagine being rich, or forget that they're anonymous and imagine being a world leader, or forget that they're indecisive and unimportant and imagine being a dashing spy, or... on and on and on. A book that makes you feel like you are powerful might be fun to read, but it's a tool to get the same result as doing lines of cocaine.  If the cocaine isn't a good book, the escapist book about powerful people isn't a good book (at least, not because of the experience it creates).

Here are some tell-tale signs of great literature:

1.  Mediocre books tend to get worse when you read them again, and again, and again.  They also tend to seem much worse than you remember if you look at them again after a decade of heavy reading.  Great books are better the second time, and better still the third time. If you come across them again a decade later, you will often feel like you are reading a different book, because there is so much going on that you missed the first time.

2.  Great literature has staying power.  The experience-machines that people want, and how they create them, is very faddish and changes rapidly. One decade's best seller can easily be considered unreadably bad in the next decade.  (This is partly because if you want an experience machine, *reading* is really an inconvenience, and you want it to be smooth and effortless so you forget you are reading as soon as possible.  How do you write in order to get that effect?) What makes a well-written book valuable in 1900, on the other hand, will still speak to a reader in 2000.

3.  Mediocre books tend to appeal especially to certain people and repel others, like different kinds of foods.  Many people can do a reasonable job of predicting whether they will have fun reading a mediocre book just from looking at the cover, because the marketing execs know that the dragon will draw all the people who like books with dragons, so they'll get lots of happy customers.  Bookstores squeeze all these books together on one bookshelf, believing that people who like one dragon book will be sucked in by a whole shelf of 'em.  But someone who likes Moby Dick will not generally conclude from that he wants to read more books about whales or more books about the fishing industry.  Someone who likes Infinite Jest is probably not going to decide he wants to read another novel about tennis, or about alcoholism.  (Also, great writers sometimes dwell on one topic, but more frequently they branch out.  Henry James, for example, wrote one of the best horror stories ever... but only that one. I don't think he ever wrote anything else we would call horror.)

4.  When you make a convincing, blatant copy of the style of a mediocre book, people will love the parody in a mean-spirited way, because they love to see the mediocre author humiliated.  When you make a convincing, blatant copy of the style of a great book, people will love your book *because they think it's good*, although it will constantly remind them of how much better the great book is, and they will call your work derivative.

Does that clarify it?Refrigerator is a word based on Latin roots. It means something like cold-maker, I guess? Same root as *frigid*.  That's how it's spelled.  Anyway, in Latin the *frige* part of that word would sound something like "free-gay" (long I, hard G), but hundreds of years ago English speakers started pronouncing most words which were originally spelled with the letter I with a short I (like tin, instead of teen), and pronouncing G's as soft before E and I.  

So far so good.  The pronunciation is now, in the international phonetic alphabet, something like /\u0279\u026a\u02c8f\u0279\u026ad\u0292\u0259\u02cc\u0279e\u026a\u027e\u025a/.  We need to use IPA to make a specific point about /f\u0279\u026ad\u0292/, which is the most unique part of the word. The "re-" prefix occurs in thousands of words, the "-ator" suffix occurs in thousands of words, but /f\u0279\u026ad\u0292/ is nearly unique, so if you shorten refrigerator to a slang word, it will be /f\u0279\u026ad\u0292/.  But you see the cluster of consonants /d\u0292/ -- most J (or soft G, same thing) sounds in English are /d\u0292/.  Joe, jam, geriatric, gender.  In English, /\u0292/ by itself it pretty rare - that is the symbol for the sound that you hear in *vision* (note vision doesn't rhyme with *region*), *delusion*, and also in how some people pronounce *beige* and *oblige*.

And right there in *oblige* you can see the problem.  The way English spelling works, all people who see *frige* would assume it was pronounced with the same work as *fry*, and many people would assume it was a /\u0292/ with no /d/ (just like oblige).  But we aren't spelling a Latin word here any more; we are spelling modern slang, and we can spell it exactly as it is pronounced.  By adding the "d", we get exactly what we want, a word that rhymes with bridge. ("frid" and "brid" have the same short i as bid, hid, kid, lid. "-idge" has the same /d\u0292/ cluster as hedge, sedge, ledge.)The British "Empire" in India was a hodge-podge of peace treaties, commercial agreements, alliances, and protectorates.  Some areas they controlled more or less directly, other areas they barely controlled at all.  At the point where the British consolidated their control over (nearly) all of India, there were still a number of semi-independent Indian kingdoms who had recognized their allegiance to Britain's Victoria as Empress of India, but who still considered themselves rulers in their own right.  The British had signed agreements guaranteeing the sovereignty of these allied Indian rulers, and they were extremely reluctant to betray them and break their treaties by stripping away their sovereignty when they granted the rest of the subcontinent independence.  The least they could do, they felt, was give these "princely states" the choice of whether they wanted to join Pakistan or India.  Kashmir was one of these semi-independent states, and its ruler vacillated and then went with India, but he ruled a mostly Muslim population.  This was difficult because for India to rule this majority-muslim region would go against the guiding principle for the partition, but for Pakistan to seize it would violate the ground rules for how everyone's rights would be adjudicated that both parties had agreed to.

That was the cause of the first war.  After you've fought three wars over a region, it becomes a question of pride and national security.  No one wants to offend the people who died over the conflict by saying "Eh, we didn't really want it anyway." No one wants to be accused of treason.  No one wants to let the other side take a mile, and then use that advantage to seize another ten miles.Can you imagine that if you were addicted to cigarettes or heroin or something, someone could describe to you what it means to not be addicted, and you could understand that description? And then you could even memorize the description and repeat the description. But you would still be addicted.  You would know what you would have to do to no longer be classified as an addict, but that knowledge doesn't bring you any closer to beating your addiction. Some knowledge is like that... knowing what something is, isn't the same as knowing how to be it.

Or thing of a geometric proof.  You can read the premises. You can read the conclusions.  You can even memorize them.  Know you know what the proof is -- you know what it's a proof of.  You still don't know or understand the proof, though; you can't explain why the conclusion has to follow from the premises, even if you have memorized *that* it does.

Or think of an optical illusion.  Someone can tell you "this is an optical illusion where you can see two faces or a vase". Or "this is an optical illusion where you can see a rabbit or a duck." So you can know what kind of optical illusion you are looking at... even if you can only see the vase and can't see the faces, yourself.  In one sense you know what kind of optical illusion it is, but in another sense you don't.

Buddhists are asked to believe some things about reality and human life that not only most people don't believe, they *can't* believe, or at least they can't start to believe it simply because they aren't actively doubting or denying it.  So you start by learning what the Buddha taught... and then you spend years trying to learn what he taught. And when you know, that's enlightenment.Centuries ago, the elected politicians in the US federal government were much more actively involved in the logistical side of running the government.  Like they were supposed to spend Mondays reading letters from their constituents on the floor of the House, and if someone wanted a government job he would just go straight into the White House, introduce himself, and the president would conduct a job interview.  

One artifact of this is that, in the 1790s, if you wanted to borrow money that was actually kind of a labor-intensive thing.  So if the US needed a temporary loans for some project, the Congressfolk would vote on a resolution telling the Secretary of the Treasury to saddle up and ride to Philadelphia to talk to some bankers about borrowing some money.  And then he would ride up and if he got the loan issue he wanted, he would go back to Washington and then they could go to war or buy Louisiana or whatever. (Actually, Jefferson didn't seek Congressional approval for the huge loan to buy Louisiana, which was controversial, but it wasn't like anyone wanted to give it back.)  

Now things are different.  Debt issues are streamlined. There is a global banking system.  The Treasury Dept. has bazillions of underlings to arrange things thing, and there are more at the Federal Reserve.  The US can borrow huge amounts without changing the interest rate that much.  Figuring out whether the US Gov't can borrow money is no longer a separate logistical hurdle that it once was, but Congress still believe the US Treasury doesn't have *permission* to borrow money until they say so.

The problem with this? Congress already determines the amount America will borrow by passing a tax bill and spending bills.  Whatever the gap is between the spending at the taxation, that is the annual deficit, and we borrow to cover that.  So they think they get two bites at the apple - first they pass bills instructing the Treasury to borrow X dollars, and then they pass a separate bill forbidding the Treasury to borrow X dollars.  It's insane, useless, and dangerous, and they shouldn't have that power anymore.

Why are they using it like this? Because if the US had a legal obligation to spend on certain things, but couldn't legally raise the taxes or borrow money to pay for them, we would default on our financial obligations, which would be a huge catastrophe.  Republicans currently would like to pass a budget which Obama would certainly veto.  That means that they need to either pass a budget acceptable to the president, or one that's acceptable to 2/3 of Congressfolk.  They don't want to compromise, though, so instead they are threatening to plunge us into a national disaster (which Congress can do with a simple majority of votes, by forbidding the Treasury to borrow the funds it ordered the Treasury to spend) unless Obama does what they say.Emotions are complicated, so it's hard to know exactly what you are talking about.  One common feature of emotional distress (both sadness and stress) is "ruminating".  It's basically like if the brain were stuck on repeat, thinking about something sad.  They've done brain scan studies that show that when they let healthy people and depressed people just sit with nothing to do, both are in the thinking/daydreaming mode.  But when you present them with a task to do, healthy people switch out of the ruminating mode and into a action-oriented mode, with activity in different sections of the brain. Depressed people just stay in ruminating mode... in other words, presenting them with something to do doesn't get any mental response from them, or create any motivation, because they can't switch brain activity over to the area that would permit that.

So when we are so sad we can't exercise, or eat, or visit friends, it is generally because we lack strong motivation to do *anything*.  People can generally force themselves to go to work or shower because there would be consequences, but it's really hard to force yourself to eat if you're not enjoying eating.If you mean "why are there so many more murders in Chicago and Detroit than in American cities of similar size", the answer is because they have a very high black population; for some reason black people are disproportionately likely to commit murders, so cities with very high black populations have very high murder rates. No one really knows exactly why this is.

If you mean why are so many people *shot* in Chicago/Detroit, but not in equally large cities in Europe, the answer is that it's easy to get guns in America so most criminals use guns to commit murder, rather than, say, knives.

If you mean why are so many people shot in *big* cities, well... you can't have a murder without a murderer.  If you have twice as many people then you have twice as many potential murderers, so all else equal you will get twice as many murders.  Atlanta has a murder *rate* that is 33% higher than Chicago's (20 per 100,000 vs 15 per 100,000), but it's a smaller city so you still end up with fewer murders.First, not all people believe that the gender/sex distinction really makes sense.  It's a very recent division.  Gender just means "type" (like *genre*) and sex (derived from the same word as *section*) also means "type"; it was only in the last few decades that gender theorists began insisting that they were two different things.  If there *is no such thing* as gender that is a completely separate concept from sex, then of course it couldn't be a social construct.

Now, here are some more points to consider:

1.  Many animal species have behavioral differences and differentiated roles that are (a) sex-linked, and (b) clearly learned or performative.  In fact, almost *all* of the behaviors that could be called performative in the animal kingdom are sex-linked. Animals perform because they want to get laid.  Are you going to tell me that the courtship dance of the bower bird is a social construct? Are you going to tell me that elaborate jousts between male deer in the springtime are caused by the perpetuation of masculinity stereotypes in the media? 

2.  The content of a specific gender-linked behavior can be somewhat or completely arbitrary, even while the existence of gender-linked behaviors is biologically driven.  For example, men have much more interest in the kinematics of projectiles flying through the air than women do.  This may be a hunting skill, or it may be some weird spandrel.  Regardless, whether this is expressed as an interest in soccer, or baseball, basketball, discus, lacrosse, etc. it 100% arbitrary.  You can't have a society where young men are obsessed with soccer without teaching them the rules of soccer, which no one in the world knew before the 19th century.  But that doesn't mean that they wouldn't have been interested in *some other ball game*.

3.  Males and females differ by one whole chromosome. This gives them, not only different reproductive organs, but a whole different suite of neurochemicals, which in itself would be enough to drive a huge number of behavioral differences.  But that difference also means that men express genes in a much more extreme way, because it is more frequent that they have only one copy of a gene for a protein encoded on the X-chromosome.  That's why men are much more likely to be bald, or colorblind.  Men are also more than twice as likely to develop impulsivity-linked mental health conditions like alcohol dependence, and three times as likely to have anti-social personality disorder; we see the same risk-taking and proclivity for violence in male chimps, our closest relatives. Conversely women the world over, in societies on every culture and at every level of economic develop, are about twice as likely to develop a depression or anxiety disorder. This could be a distant relative to the passive, listless behavior female chimps at the bottom of the social hierarchy experience.

That's a great analogy.Thank you :)Burma/Myanmar is right next to Bangladesh (formerly East Pakistan).  During the civil war in which Bangladesh gained independence from Pakistan the country became a basket case, and things have only slowly gotten better, with multiple natural and social disasters coming in between.

During that chain of disaster, lots of Bangladeshis fled Bangladesh... and the obvious places to flee are the neighboring countries, Myanmar and India.  Myanmar let the refugees come in during the first set of crises.  Then, afterwards, Bangladesh explained that it was still barely keeping things together, and asked if the refugees could stay in Myanmar for the time being.  That was the 1980s.  At a certain point, Bangladesh decided it just didn't want to deal with the problem, and started to question whether the refugees were actually Bangladeshi at all.  

Now you have the classic problems with large, long-term refugee populations.  The refugees had children (a lot of children), and they don't really want to leave, but they don't really want to assimilate to Burmese society, either.  So that leads to huge social tensions.  And Myanmar only recognizes citizenship by descent, so no, they can't vote.There are a number of things things that spark extremism:

1. Multiparty systems that reward people who pass some threshold like 3% of the vote with more than 3% of the seats in parliament.  Not only does this magnify the power of crazies, it gives crazies hope that they can pass the threshold if they keep trying.  Many multiparty systems also give some sort of bonus (like fifty seats) to the top vote-getting party, so you can have 30ish% of the votes and 51% of the seats in some parliaments. In the USA, if you don't work with one of the two parties, you have no say in federal politics.

2. Stagnant political systems.  The US has fairly frequent alternation between the two parties.  When one party is out of power for a long time, it tends to get nuttier and nuttier (because only nuts would stay in a party that has never won an election... people who are willing to compromise hold their nose and join the dominant party).  

3. Small countries.  US states sometimes enacts truly weird policies in either the left-wing or the right-wing direction, but a big country is made up of many small populations, and even if some lurch left and some lurch right, the middle is going to be right were it started out. In Europe you can have communists in government in one country and fascists in another, even thought there is no chance of the EU getting a majority of either fascists or communists.

4. Weak protections for freedom of speech and assembly.  In the US you can say whatever you want, and the most extreme people get right out there and wave banners.  In Europe, you can get arrested for speech that is judged hateful, anti-democratic, revisionist, hostile, anti-constitutional, etc. etc. etc., so people with extremist positions tend to meet secretly, react off one another, and become more and more poisonous.  Meanwhile, the extremists on the other side *know* that their rivals are muttering in secret, and both sides worry that the other secretly control/is plotting to control the government.  (This is a pattern that goes back hundreds of years in Europe, by the way.)

5.  High levels of elite solidarity.  The number of things that are politically popular but that European politicians refuse to do is just *crazy*.  The social elite in other countries is so insular and in-bred that on a huge number of policies, the main socialist party and the main conservative party agree on controversial issues and won't back down, even to win elections.  The reason this is a problem is that the safety valve on democratic policies is for Government A to put in place policy X, X turns out to be a disaster, the voters get angry and replace A with B, who repeals X.  Disaster averted!  So long as politicians are opportunistic, you can have two mainstream parties who switch back and forth and solve problems.  But if *neither* party will tamper with the problematic policies, then voters will be willing to turn to extremist parties.

6. Finally, gridlock and sectionalism.  There are tons of veto-points in Washington DC, and since so many different groups can have a veto, a lot of legislation is negotiated between the two parties.  That means that it never pays to alienate the opposition, since even if you have majority today, you might not tomorrow. This has traditionally been deepened by the existence of large areas of the country which were Democratic or Republican for historical reasons, but which had interests more aligned with the platform of the opposite party; there, too, it was easy to pass a bill by hammering out a deal with the Southern Democrats or the Northeastern Republicans.Right. Part of what you should remember, though, is that the term "Rohingya" is three years old.  Before 2012, there was only one mention of a people called "Rohingya", and that was from two hundred years earlier, referring to a small group that does not appear in any records in the 1800s and almost certainly bears no relation to the people currently called "Rohingya".  There are almost certainly some ethnic Bengalis who were brought into Burma by the British during British rule, who have been living there since before independence, but there are also a huge number of recent refugees who are adopting the "Rohingya" label and claiming to have been living there from time immemorial.  The growth of the refugee population (the Bengalis now make up more than 40% of Rakhine province) create the perception that the Bengalis expect to take control of the province away from the natives. This leads to high tensions, which can easily be ignited -- you may know that the 2012 riots were triggered by the gang rape of a Burmese woman, a little spark which led to violence which caused more than 100,000 people to flee from their homes.  So being "left alone" is all well and good, but you can see why the citizens take a dim view of them.To give people a sense of what you're talking about:

&gt; [Dr. McHugh] also reported on a new study showing that the suicide rate among transgendered people who had reassignment surgery is 20 times higher than the suicide rate among non-transgender people. Dr. McHugh further noted studies from Vanderbilt University and London\u2019s Portman Clinic of children who had expressed transgender feelings but for whom, over time, 70%-80% \u201cspontaneously lost those feelings.\u201d

People are saying something like Johns Hopkins is conservative (what?) and that it must be right-wing because  right-wing *brain surgeon* worked there (you must be really ideological if you think deans should be firing professors of neurosurgery for radical politics...), but in fact Hopkins was one of the first academic hospitals to openly concentrate on sexual research, and one of the pioneers in sex-reassignment surgery in the US.  They started performing sex-reassignment surgeries in 1960; two decades later they had 20 years of data on how their patients fared after the surgery, and the results put sex-reassignment in such a bad light that they actually shut down their sex-reassignment surgery program.That's exactly right. TV shows are in production all year long.  The last episodes for the 2014-2015 season were filmed probably around May, and the first episodes for the 2015-2016 season were filmed around August.  The exact filming time for each episode probably depends on the quality of the show.  But remember that you don't need to wait to finish post-production on episode 1 to start on pre-production for episode 2, or even episode 5.  They have huge teams of people working on everything at once.Kingdoms are generally considered to be  *form* of government.

Primitive tribes generally have rules that are partly based on tradition, partly on common sense, and partly on the commands of respected/senior members of the community.  People who break the rules are punished in different ways... sometimes just by social exclusion (what we would call "bullying"), sometimes by physical violence, sometimes by expulsion from the group.

The most primitive tribes tend to be very small and have a non-hierarchical structure. Experts in one area of tribal life will get respect when the group is acting on a related question; overall older people tend to get some deference, especially as stores of knowledge accumulated over a long time and authorities on tribal tradition.  However, as small groups grow, it is hard to maintain group cooperation *and* maintain hierarchy.  Past a certain size, a primitive group while either split into two groups and occupy neighboring territories, or start to accept the authority of one particular "big man" who acts to judge disputes between people who aren't close apply rules fairly.  The agreements between neighboring villages on how to cooperate (for example, for defense against foreigners, or for intermarriage) and the domination of larger villages by chiefs is the start of something like "government".  In general the chief was chosen by popular consensus, but obviously chiefs would like to see their children be equally powerful, so they tried to put them in a position to succeed them.

The earliest recorded city-states had signs of all three ideas (group consensus, agreements between neighboring clans, and rule by chiefs).  On the one hand there were some decisions for which the whole male population of the city would meet together, hear speeches, and vote on some topic (like whether to execute someone, or whether to go to war).  There were other questions which would be decided by a council just of elderly men.  On the other hand, the citizens were divided into different clans or families, and there were rules about when each clan would have responsibility for some public function.  And finally, there were hereditary priest-kings who had the power to decide some questions themselves; although frequently the city would become unhappy with the kings and kick them out, but keep a position with the same duties which might be occupied by a different man every year, chosen by election. There were a variety of different systems, some putting almost all power in the hands of the people, or the kings, or the elders.  These kinds of cities began writing about themselves around 600 BC, but they probably existed in a similar form as far back as 1500 BC.

Conflicts within and between cities led to further developments in the government.  Most of these cities had slaves or servants, and above that a class of poor farmers, and above that a class of rich landowners.  The rich landowners were always using their wealth to lend money to the poor, who would fall deeper and deeper into debt and then lose their family land and/or be sold into slavery.  The result was a constant struggle between the poor (who wanted debt forgiveness, land redistribution, and other policies that would help them) and the rich (who did not).  This basic struggle would then turn into a secondary struggle about which institutions in the city would be more powerful, and how much power the rich and the poor would have in each institution.  These shaped those institutions into complicated forms, and also gave the world some of its earliest written fundamental laws/constitutions (which were basically peace treaties between the rich and poor).  

Then there were conflicts *between* neighboring cities, as well.  Cities would fight, and a city that could convince or force its neighbors to obey it could then use its neighbors' citizens and resources to expand its army and navy, which would allow it to win wars with even more powerful neighbors.  These agreements between cities, for a weaker city to accept a stronger city as its master/protector, formed the basis for various empires.  The basic idea with ancient empires was that the ruler of the empire would let his subjects govern themselves with their traditional local system, but they would pay him tribute and fight for him.  However, rebellious subjects would be punished with harsher, more direct rule.  Over time, successful empires took most autonomy away from local regions and made them follow the same laws to make cooperation between different regions of the empire smooth and profitable.

Does this mostly answer your question?Britain was the earliest nation to industrialize.  They industrialized before trucks, before refrigeration, before modern food science, before supermarkets.  They practically industrialized before canning.  As a result, displaced British peasants were coming to live in a city where they had zero access to the cheap, fresh ingredients of their traditional cuisine, no ability to buy or prepare expensive foods, and no modern scientific substitutes available.  As a result their food had to either be preserved (like with salted, smoking, or pickling), processed (like canned or ground foods), or else boiled and over-seasoned to hide the fact that it was rotting.  This isn't going to give you any ability to make a cuisine that is palatable, and as a result the diet of the British poor became gross, and they lost both the ability and the desire to prepare delicious food.

Compare that to today, when a peasant from the most remote country in the world can come to any big American or European city and find, not just a huge number of fresh fruits, vegetables, meats, milk, etc., but also special groceries catering specifically to peculiar foods and spices that are found only in his own region.  Urbanization hasn't had anything like the same negative impact on cuisine in the countries that industrialized late.Yes, although to be clear to others (you probably know this) all Bangladeshis (nationality) are Bengali (ethnicity/language), whereas some Bengali families never lived in Bangladesh (either because they are from the Indian parts of Bengal, or because they emigrated before East Pakistan became independent).All the Abrahamic religions (Jewish, Christian, Muslim) recognize that God commands his followers not to lend money at interest, but (traditionally) they disagree on how exactly to interpret this.  The Christians and Muslims said, no lending money at interest, *ever*: that's a sin.  But Jewish rabbis said that many moral commandments don't apply to "foreigners", so it was only a sin to lend money at interest *to other Jews*.  That meant that all the money-lending in Europe (and I believe some parts of the Middle East) *either* had to go through complicated procedures that made it "not really money-lending" in the eyes of the church, or it had to be done by Jews. That gave the Jews a market niche in money-lending and other financial services.  In particular, when rulers needed to make big loans, they might need to turn to the Jews, and if their Jewish bankers did an especially good job financing their wars and palaces, they might give them aristocratic titles or other valuable privileges.  (This was one of the reasons the Rothschilds became powerful, as bankers to the Holy Roman Empire).  Furthermore, there were Jewish communities scattered all over Europe which had the same customs, the same language (basically ghetto German), educational ties, family ties; so frequently the Jews in one part of Europe were closer to the Jews in another part of Europe than to their neighbors, so they were in a good position to set up international ventures - especially, international trading ventures.

It has been a very, very long time since there were any legal or religious limits on Christians running banks, but once a community builds up a niche in one line of business, it tends to stay there.  People tend to go into the same line of work as their parents and their cousins.  And due to migration to the New World, Jews from rural communities that were never involved in medieval banking could end up living in a neighborhood in New York City and attending a synagogue where all the community leaders *are* involved in banking.

I don't know of which sectors have large numbers of CEOs besides banking and entertainment.  Entertainment, like banking, was an Old World Jewish speciality.  "Vaudeville" shows were possible for Jews who were sort of on the outskirts of mainstream society and didn't have to worry about being shunned from mainstream society (since they already were excluded!).  Also, parallel to banking, many Christians believed that plays and performances were sinful, and (especially) that *being an actor/performer* was sinful.  Those entertainment shows were a huge hit when Jewish immigrants brought them to America, which meant that lots of Jews involved in vaudeville were leading American entertainers or entertainment producers when radio, cinema, and then TV were invented.  That meant they had the best position to jump in and take advantage of the new media.The British and Portuguese were actively trading in India long before they *controlled* any part of India, let alone before the raj.  Is that what you mean? However the superstition is not "ancient", in the sense that it does not go back past the discovery of the New World.  Superstitions are False beliefs, and often part of the False belief is how universal or how long-established the superstition is.  People who think the number "13" is unlucky say that it is because the 13th apostle at the Last Supper betrayed Jesus Christ; but it's clear no early Christians ever thought that, and there is no evidence of that superstition every having existed until the 1800s.  Broadly, supply and demand, just like anything else.  If a ton of people want to buy pizza from your neighborhood pizzeria, and the guys starts to run out of pizza, he'll do two things: first, raise prices, and second, hire more staff so he can make more pizza, faster.  So he'll end up selling slightly more pizza at slightly higher prices. Currency works exactly the same way.  If a huge number of people suddenly want to buy Euros, there might not be anyone who is willing to sell 1,000 EUR for a price of $1,100 (the current exchange rate). So I might offer $1,120 instead, and then someone who wasn't really interested in selling before will step up to the plate and sell me the currency I want.

But... there are complications.  First of all, over the long-term the "natural" supply and demand for currency is set by trade between two countries.  The basic question is, what are the goods that you can just as easily buy at home or import from abroad?  Let's say that Americans buy European cars and Europeans buy American cars.  If that's the case, the relative price of the two goods has to be comparable in the two countries.  That sets the "terms of trade".  For example, if a European car that costs 30,000 EUR is very similar to an American car that costs $33,000, and the two currency zones trade cars back and forth, the exchange rate *has* to be 1 EUR = $1.10, or close to it, for that kind of trade to make sense.  That also means that if American car companies found some breakthrough invention that pushed the price of American cars down to $30,000, that would put pressure on the exchange rate... either the exchange rate would move towards 1:1, or Europeans would stop buying American cars and the flow of cars between the regions would become one-way.  This is called the "terms of trade".

Once the exchange rate is set by the terms of trade, that determines the prices for all imports and exports.  When your exchange rate gets "stronger", you can afford to buy more imports, but you also have more trouble selling exports abroad.  That means that a stronger currency is bad for employment and growth, but good for the quality of life of people who already have secure jobs.  A weaker currency, conversely, makes it harder to afford imports but easier to sell exports, so it is bad for quality of life but good for employment and growth.  For this reason, often "supply and demand" are not the ultimate explanation of exchange rates, because governments can create unlimited supply of, or demand for, their own currency in order to create the desired exchange rate, if they are willing to deal with the consequences.  So governments that are trying to preserve their national standard of living may create demand/cut supply for their own currency to reach the desired goal; government that are trying to create economic growth may cut demand/create supply for currency, until they reach their goal; or they may change supply/demand to accomplish other goals (like controlling inflation or stimulating the economy), with changes in the exchange rate being an indirect consequence of that.In general when you start a new currency you would start with it pegged to another currency.  This effectively limits the supply of the new currency, the gloober, to the new governments reserves of dollars (or their ability to rely on the US, the IMF, etc for emergency loans of dollars), so you would probably get the exact problem you highlight; a tight money supply, constricting economic growth.  Once people are used to the gloober and you have a steady balance-of-payments situation (like, you know you aren't hemorrhaging dollars from your foreign reserves every month), you would put the currency on a managed peg or something (that is, defend a peg, but change the peg every so often so that you stay close to a market equilibrium).  Once you have a starting point, you can start to react to your economic indicators.  It's like steering a boat.  If you are getting too much inflation and unemployment is already very low, you stop printing quite so much currency.  If you are getting too much unemployment and inflation is already very low, you print more currency.  Once you have gotten through the birth pangs of the new currency (when, as I mentioned, a peg would be best), you don't need to worry about screwing up and making the currency worthless from inflation, or "destroying" the economy, overnight from one mistake.  If you go too far in one directions, you read those signs and switch course.Cold air tends to also be dry, and cold, dry air cracks the lining of your respiratory tract and provides invasion points for microbes.Let's say I show you an optical illusion called the "duckrabbit".  You look at it and see a rabbit.  Staring at what you think is a rabbit for hours might not lead you to see a duck.  But if you go outside for a walk, you might go through a park, and see some squirrels and birds, and then when you get back to the illusion, you have a different sent of mental primes bouncing around your brain, and you look at it and see a duck.  Make sense?

To put it a different way... when you get to the point where you have the option to "step away" from a problem, obviously you haven't solved it.  (Otherwise you would be finished with it, not stepping away.) If you couldn't solve it, you didn't have the exact mental tools you needed at the time.  If you can solve the problem at all without learning something new or practicing more, your best bet is to come back to it in a different state of mind, a different mood, different junk stored in your short term memory.This is a bad test because it does not give you explicit information.  Normally when we discuss tests and probability we want to know *two* pieces of information about it: the rate of False positives and the rate of False negatives.  Normally you report these two pieces of information separately (i.e., this test has a 1% rate of False positives and a 1% rate of False negatives.) They report it as one rate for both, which is weird and not strictly correct.  I think you should have been able to figure out what they were asking (you wouldn't have had enough information to answer the question without a False positive rate), but it is easy to think that they were giving you a False negative rate and the test had a 0% rate of False positives.

When you are doing probability and talking about tests or random samples, always do it this way:

1. Start by writing down the total population (you can do "1.0" to mean "everyone" if you think well in fractions, or pick a big number like 1,000,000 to make the math pretty.)

2. Then draw out two branches from the first number, and multiply by the True population proportion for each sub-group.  We are now looking at the absolute numbers of people in each sub-group, who do not yet have any idea which sub-group they are in.  (So if you start with 1,000,000 people, you would draw one branch with 100 people who have the disease, and another with 999,900 people who don't have the disease.)

3.  Now, draw four more branches and use the information you have about the test to divide each of the sub-groups into two groups.  1% False negatives: so of the diseased group, 99 (99% of 100) get positive results (True positives, although all they know is that it is positive), and 1 (1% of 100) gets a negative result (False negative).  1% False positives: so of the healthy group, 9,999 (1% of 999,900) get positive results (False positive) and 989,901  (99%) get negative results (True negative).

4. Now interpret the results.  Overall there are 10,098 positive results; 99/10,098 are True positives, 9,999/10,098 are False positives.  So from the evidence that you have a positive result, you have a 1% chance of having the disease.  From the evidence of a negative result, you have a 1 in 989,901 chance of having the disease.

If you draw out the branching structure you won't get confused.In general, this is the question: if you can rent out a two-bedroom apartment for $5,000, you can make money on a two-bedroom apartment if you can get ownership a two-bedroom apartment for *less* than $5 *million* dollars.  (That's a rule of thumb, just accept the numbers for the sake of argument.)  Now, people who want to make money as landlords want to make as much as possible, so they will ask themselves: is it cheaper to buy an apartment that already exists, or pay construction companies to build a new one?  If it's possible to build new apartment towers at a cost of, say, $2 million per unit, then developers can realize a (hypothetical) $3 million profit per unit by building, say, 100 2-brd for $200 million and selling them for $500 million.  But it would only happen *exactly* like that if there one construction company that had a monopoly on all construction; in a free market, many companies can build apartments, and they will compete and drive one another down to a bit more than $2 million per unit.  Then the landlords have all these units that they've bought for $2 million per unit, which they can profit from renting out at $2,000/mo; in theory, at the old rent of $5,000/month they would make a clean profit of $3,000/month, but actually they would keep building and buying and renting out more and more apartments, and competing with other landlords until the prices fell down to what would be barely profitable for them.

So why don't prices tumble by 60% immediately? Well, SF isn't letting anyone build new residences, but the number of people who want to live in SF is much higher than the people who wanted to live there in 1990, so when a much higher number of people want to live in the same number of homes, landlords can keep raising prices.  The sense I have is that SF *could* be redeveloped, but that politically it is difficult.  Remember, those 2-bdr apartments that rent for $5,000/mo are worth $5 million. If rents fell by 60%, the owner would lose $3 million in property value on just that one apartment.  Moreover, big new apartment towers would block the view from the landlord's current buildings, create more traffic, make getting a spot in a local school harder, whatever; so overall he is opposed.  Property owners have a lot of power.  And it's hard to get the *tenants* (the big winners) excited about it, partly because they are short-sighted and partly because the pay-offs really would be a long way off... construction has been bottled up for a long time, and if you built new towers starting now, they might not be on the market until 2020, and prices might not come down completely until 2025. (Just example numbers, based on some construction projects I've lived near.)  They would prefer to keep their communities the way they are, while the rich are usually opposed, so nothing happens.

Now, NYC is different from SF in two ways.  First, I think there really are affordable apartments in NYC... but maybe not in *Manhattan*, or in Brooklyn.  For Brooklyn, what I said about SF might apply (if you built more units, more people could live there) but Manhattan is a little different... it's already covered in skyscrapers.  I'm no expert, but I don't know how much even the most aggressive developer could actually bring down prices with new construction.  At a certain point, you have to recognize NYC has amenities that make it a very, very valuable place to work and live, many of those amenities are in Manhattan, so living immediately next to some of the best amenities in one of the best cities in the world will be really desirable, apartments will be scarce, people will pay a lot for them.  It's like buying front row seats to a concert: there's no way for *everyone* to have a front row seat! So the best you can do is charge more for them so people pay a fair value for the privilege.  Everyone else can commute in from Queens/Staten Island/the Bronx/uptown. (However, you might make some progress on real estate prices in downtown Manhattan if you built more in the outer boroughs, added transit, and generally made them cleaner, safer, and more pleasant - at that point more people would want to live in currently undesirable neighborhoods and lower demand for Manhattan apartments would bring prices down.)

This leads to another point - the only way you can make a city cheaper to live in without building more apartments is to make it *less pleasant* to live in.  A homicide wave, layoffs, absurd taxes, terrible schools: any of these would make living in SF or NYC really unpleasant, people would leave, prices would fall.  In essence, that is what happened to Detroit, at the opposite end of the spectrum.  The city government was spectacularly corrupt and incompetent, crime soared, education was in shambles, the regional economy was overdependent on the ups and downs of one industry, so everyone who could afford to move started moving to places where they could find good jobs and safe communities (like SF and NYC).  Now the housing market in Detroit is very flat, living there is very cheap, but that hardly makes it more attractive... if anything it attracts a permanent population of uneducated, unemployed people who are shopping around for a place where they can stretch out their welfare benefits as far as possible.It's like how you wear sunglasses to protect your eyes from the sun.  Your eye-area is darker when you wear sunglasses; yes, your eye-area is absorbing more light, total, when you wear sunglasses, and reflecting more when the sunlight directly hits your bright pupils; but the point is that the light *hits the sunglasses and is absorbed by them*, and doesn't get through to the *eyeball*, which is what can be damaged by sunlight.

Same with black skin, white skin, and sunburn.  Black skin absorbs more sunlight total, but most of it is being absorbed into something like sunglasses, not into the parts of the skin that die/become cancerous from UV radiation.You're welcome. You're welcomeNo one really knows, because the decisions about the currency portraits are the choice of Secretary of the Treasury, and the past deliberations of the committees that designed the current bills have not been preserved.  One requirement (or at least, one previous requirement) was for portraits to be of immediately recognizable national figures, like Presidents, and Andrew Jackson certainly fits the bill.  His face and hair are easy to recognize.  It's also possible that they wanted to put a Southerner on the bill for regional balance, but didn't have a lot of choices.  -- But yes, many people have noticed that Jackson was one of our worst presidents, and in particular was opposed to central banking, and is a strange choice for a Federal Reserve Note.There are three big issues in economics -- growth, employment, and distribution.  Right now the economy is *growing*: we are producing more goods and services per capita then we we were ten years ago.  Also, our economy is *employing* more people: it is inching towards 5%, which is the lowest in five years.  But *distribution* of the gross national product is still going largely to the richest Americans. Wage growth has been uneven.

The main reason why wages are stagnant is that the recovery is not over yet.  Wages are the price of labor. Prices are set by supply of labor.  With unemployment at 5.5% (and other workers on part-time work, or not working in the occupation they are trained in), we still have a lot of people looking for jobs, people who would be *overjoyed* to get a job and the same wage you get paid right now.  Once the pool of chronically unemployed people dries up, then employers stop getting stacks of hundreds of applications for each spot. Then they start raising their starting offer to poach each others' workers away, and offer their current workers big annual raises to avoid the headache of losing a critical team member to a rival firm in the hot job market.

So in these kinds of recoveries, the fortunes of the middle class rises in two steps as the central bank pumps money into the economy: first, the unemployed workers get back to work, and next wages start to go up.  In this recovery, wages are stagnant because we are still working on getting unemployment levels back to were before the recession.  Over the last 30 years, wages have been stagnant because  the central bank has consistently kept monetary policy too tight.We have in the past voted to limit corporate campaign contributions, but the Supreme Court has ruled that donating money to help someone express their ideas is a form of free speech and protected by the constitution.  So that is a non-starter.There are many, many more complex numbers than i -- uncountably many, in fact.  In fact, there are uncountably many complex numbers *for every single number* on the real number line.

You may be confusing how we express complex numbers with what a complex number is.  A complex number contains the square root of a negative number.  We tend to simplify them... just like we might write sqrt(18) as 3sqrt(2), we will write 5+sqrt(-4) as 5+2sqrt(-1) or (the same thing) 5+2i.  But i isn't the complex number, the whole thing is the complex number, and there are an unlimited number of them.I believe to the actual campaign organizations of the candidates, correct? Corporations can still make unlimited contributions for issue ads, I thought.This is pretty ridiculous.  They call this a "deterioration" of Canada's position... but this should be below Bloomberg. I don't think of them as part of the newsertainment industry. People lend/invest money across national lines.  There are only two ways this can go: either on net you are investing/lends more than you are being invested in/lent to, or vice versa.  You can't buy new investments/make new loans without money "flooding out" to the country you're investing in.  You can get new money into your country without selling "vital national assets" and "being deeper in debt" to scary foreigners.  If it's not the first, it's the second.  You can't have money coming in on net while also making international investments.But this is not really a serious barrier to participating in the campaign media festival.  Some of the most effective campaign ads don't mention the candidates at all, or didn't mention them until the very end.I don't know what you mean by "commonly taught numbers".  What is special about i? Just that is a letter than stands for a number?There is a force of gravity pulling down on your body.  Say that force is 150 pounds.  Now, why don't you sink into the ground? Why doesn't gravity pull you straight into the center of the earth? Well, because the ground is pushing up on your feet with the same force: so far so good.  Okay, but here is another problem... the ground can keep your feet up, by what about the rest of your body? Why don't you just collapse down, under the force of gravity, until you are lying and the ground can support your whole weight directly?  The answer there is that you maintain a fairly high tension in your leg and core muscles. You might have the equivalent of, say, 100 pounds of force pressing up from your thighs, keeping the trunk of your body erect.  You can control this force, and use it to lower yourself closer to the ground and raise yourself higher.

Most of the time when you are trying to lift someone up, you are not actually trying to hold them in the air.  Someone who is squatting is exerting a large amount of force to keep himself from falling down. If you try to grab him and force him into a standing position, because he is *already* counteracting 100% of the force of gravity, you only need to add a bit more force to accelerate him upwards.  But all he has to do overcome this upward force is stop fighting gravity, releasing the tension in his legs.  So you might start thinking that you are about to lift him up (because he is helping you overcome gravity) and then feel impossibly weak ten seconds later (because you can't actually support his full body-mass with your arms).I don't know how much they actually dislike each other.  There has been a huge amount of shared cultural history.  French has historically been the most common second language in England, and vice-versa in France.  During the 17th-18th century, there was a widespread sense that France would like to invade England and reconvert it to Catholicism, based on French support first for Charles II, then for the Jacobite pretenders.  There was a tense set of differences between the two nations.  France was a much larger nation (and had a much flashier royal court), but England was actually the wealthier and more productive nation.  France had an army that could have steamrolled England, but England's navy made sure that no invasion fleet ever got out of port.  Then the French Revolution came, lots of aristocrats were guillotined, and the English were scared of being invaded and forcibly converted to *atheism* (first by Robespierre, then by Napoleon).  During WWI the French and English were allies for a change, but this produced even more tensions... the French felt like the British used them as cannon fodder in a war destroying their towns, the British felt like they were dying to defend an ungrateful France, and after the war the French took a vindictive policy which the British diplomats found disgraceful and dangerous.  

Beyond that, all nations (or even regions) have their little ethnic quirks, and even though we tend to be closest to the nations we are *nearest* to, we see our neighbors the most so their minor quirks irritate us whereas the truly exotic customs of people on the other side of the world seem fascinating.Sure. 0 and 1 are the most important.  Then there is 2, and 3, and other small primes, and also their reciprocals, square roots, squares, and cubes.  Next I would mention pi (and pi/4, pi/2, etc. on up to 2pi), and e.  Oh, and ten is important, because we count in base 10. You might also run into N (Avogadro's number) and phi, but you wouldn't use them frequently just for algebra.Most leaves have acid in them that kill grass, and most people like lawns. If you go into the middle of a wood and look for an area without too many bushes and brambles, you'll see what your lawn would look like without raking.  Dirt, covered by a couple of inches of packed-down, damp leaves.Sumerian cuneiform was written up-down, then left to right. Hebrew was written right-left.  The earliest European writing (Greek, runic, Etruscan, archaic Latin) isn't necessarily one particular direction... sometimes it is left-right, sometimes right-left, sometimes "oxplow" style (you get to the end of a line, and then start going backwards on the next line; this style was also found in the ancient Middle East). It seems unlikely that there is an particular reason for one style coming to predominate.  Right-handed people seem to think that it's incredibly convenient to have your hand moving away from what you write as you finish each word, but I think that is imbecilic... if that were so much easier, you would think most of the world would have switch to that system once writing with ink became common.As others have said, it could just be rhyming; Richard is not shortened to Dick because we used to call people Dichard! 

But also, the W/V sounds are very close, so close many cousin languages pronounced the same name with a V, like German Wilhelm or old Norman Villiam.  Villiam was actually the source for our name William (not the Old English Wilhelm/Willem), so it was pronounced with a V at once point.  B is not close to W, but it *is* close to V; you may have noticed that some Spanish speakers can't distinguish V and B, and children can't always distinguish them either.  B is an easier sound to make, so Billy could be babytalk for Villy.All names always mean something... words almost always start as metaphors referring to something else and then begin to be taken literally, as something unique.  Like take "headphones" -- they're phones that you wear on your head.  "Eyeglasses" -- they're pieces of glass for your eyes.  But you don't think of that that way, which is why no one blinks when you buy eyeglasses with *plastic* lenses (impossible!).  

Almost all primitive tribes give each other names that mean something metaphorical. (Think of stereotypical Indian names like Sitting Bull or Red Cloud.)  It takes a huge amount of tribal memory to keep naming people after other people for so long that we forget that the name had a literal meaning (like Lily, or Rose... popular names, but we don't usually think of flowers when we meet someone named Lily), and even *more* memory to keep using the word even after it is no longer used as a word in our daily language (like Theodore... we aren't classical Greeks).

But even within this, we are still *always* adding new names for people that have metaphorical meanings that refer to other objects.  For example, we think of Marcus Tullius Cicero, the famous Roman leader, as having a nonsense name... just a name-name.  But to Cicero, "Marcus Tullius" was "just a name", but "cicerones" was the word for "chickpea".  He was called "Marcus Tullius Chickpea"... because his family all had a bump at the end of their noses that looked like a chickpea.  Look at our own last names... "James Smith" has a first name that hasn't meant any other than as a name for thousands of years, but his last name was given to his family because they were actually blacksmith not too long ago.  Look at the nicknames athletes get, or musicians.In middle English you might say "push\u00e8d", with two full syllables.  So was taunted, of course.  The emphasis will tend to be on the *first* syllable, since that conveys the meaning. "Was he pushed or did he jump?" "PUSHed", because just saying ED could be either "pushed" or "jumped".  Same with TAUNTed.  Now, when you don't emphasize a syllable routinely, it will tend to become less and less distinct as you say it quickly and without attention/precision.  So the "e" sound *could* drop out.  But will it? To find out, you have to imagine what it would sound like if you dropped the sound.

*pushd* -- most people can't actually say this without careful attention.  As you remark, they will tend to say either *pusht* or *pujd*, so that the throat is either vibrating for both sounds, or not at all. (The only difference between, say, dad and tat or dud and tut is that your throat vibrates while you say the D-words. "Sh" isn't a sound with vibrating.)

*tauntd* - this doesn't really work as a sound because the t and d are the the same sort of sound, letting out a puff of air. There is no way to combine them, because you would have to breath and let out another puff of air, unless you concentrated very carefully.  So you can't drop the E.  Since you keep them in separate syllables, the D doesn't have to change to match the sound of the T.

But you get D-sounds in some ellisions, too.  For example, punked (punkt) bunked (bunkt), bagged (bagd) gagged (gagd); k has no vibration (unvoiced is what you call that) and g does vibrate (voiced) so the D stays a D (voiced) next to G, but loses the voicing (becomes T) next to K. Razzed (razd), passed (past); Z is voiced, S is unvoiced.  Now sound these ones out yourself: Lapped versus grabbed; revved versus sniffed; leashed versus obliged. It's a number of factors coming into play at once.

1.  Not every one has *changed their opinions*, they may just have changed their priorities.  While there were not any new developments happening in immigration, people who were against immigration/multiculturalism (I assume that is what you mean by "nativists and racists"), these people whose first preference was no new immigration were happy to vote for the center/center-left on issues that they thought were more import and more pressing.  But when suddenly the politicians they had elected enacted a massive, potentially irreversible change in immigration policy with no votes and no electoral mandate, they decided it *was* a huge issue, and started to look for parties who would listen to them.  This is probably the largest factor.

2. Experience is an incredible teacher.  If your knowledge of the Middle East is limited to a few children of ruling-class Egyptian and Saudi families you met in college, you might think that Middle Easterners are fun people, brilliant, eloquent, and just like you.  That experience would give you one picture of what it would be like to have a million Syrian refugees move into your country.  Having hordes of refugees wandering around your country might be a very different experience, and give you a different picture of that.  Likewise for expectations about the honesty of refugees (many center-left Europeans still cannot quite wrap their mind around the fact that 80% of the migrants are not, in fact, from Syria), the functioning of refugee camps (which have been rocked by fighting and harassment), the gracious and grateful behavior one would expect of guests (not exactly); you learn a lot about an ambitious social experiment by trying it.

3. Some countries have responded to spontaneous outrage against the mass immigration policy with legal action against citizens and threats.  When someone's ability even to *express* they opinion they hold is under threat, that immediately moves them very far to the extreme of whatever political opinion they hold.  If even a post on Facebook can get you branded as a fascist or a racist, well, guess what? People start feeling more sympathetic to the *actual* fascists or racists.

4. I get the sense that some people on the left are kind of disgusted the government can mobilize all of these extra resources and breakthrough all this political process and respect for conventional procedures for *immigrants*, but they couldn't do it for their own citizens.  I've heard this from people, but I don't know whether it is just one or two people, or a widely-shared feeling.

5.  Finally, you can't forget how much you change a policy by making it *big*, by making it *irreversible*, and by making it *non-negotiable*.  I'm sure you can think of dozens of policies that you would think were a *good* thing if they were rolled out in a limited way, with built-in sunset provisions for closing down the experiment and the end of the trial period, and an ability to discuss the ongoing success/failure of the experiment before expanding it... but that you would think was a bad thing if it had to be on a national scale, with an unlimited budget, forever and ever, with no respect for public opinion. Human beings need water for three things:

1. Drinking

2. Hygiene/sanitation

3. Economic activity

Drinking water is a human right, but you only need ten cups a day; it is very easy for people to get a sufficient amount of water *to drink*.  Getting clean water is somewhat harder, but the difficulty there is the cost of *boiling water*; somehow "clearcutting forests for charcoal is a human right" doesn't have the same ring to it.  Another issue can be the distance a person has to travel to get water, but there again, "farmland next to potable water is a human right" isn't quite the same.

Sanitation and hygiene aren't quite as crucial as drinking water.  You can call them human rights if you want, but the bottom line is that you need a lot of infrastructure to give a community a working sanitation system.  The difficult thing about a flush toilet isn't getting the half-gallon of water that flushes the shit into the sewer, it's *building and maintaining the sewer*.  Maybe having a working sewer system where you happen to live is a human right, but at that point, where do you stop? Are paved roads human rights? Reliable electricity? Many communities want those before they want sewers. If you are going to say someone's human rights are being violated unless the local government has the capacity to build them a fully-functioning first-world municipal utility system, then you are making the concept of human rights meaningless.  Anyway, the water isn't the issue here, it's the infrastructure.

But economic uses of water are by far and away the largest uses of water, and these are the ones that cannot possibly be considered a human right.  Most crops use a huge amount of water; industry uses a decent amount for cooling; miners use tons of water.  It's a simple economic question for them.  The more they put in, the more money they make, up to a certain point of diminish returns.  You don't want to give farmers unlimited amounts of water any more than you want to give them unlimited numbers of tractors, or unlimited gallons of gasoline, or unlimited bags of chemical fertilizer.  They can keep using them and using them, but at a certain point the resources they are pumping into the crop are worth more than the crop they are producing (or at least, worth more than the extra crop they get from wasting so many more resources on it).  You figure out how much they should actually use by charging them what they're willing to pay.Tsar (or Czar) is just the Russian word for emperor (caesar), just like Kaiser is the German word.

A king is the head of state.  Kings are almost always king for life (although they can abdicate, or be deposed by a revolution); in the last few hundred years "king" nearly always implies not just a head-for-life, but a *hereditary* head who inherited the office.  However, during the early Middle Ages many kings were elected by their chief noblemen, or by an entire army; the last elective kingdom was probably Poland, which disappeared around 1780.  Currently kings are mostly symbolic, the way Ronald McDonald is the symbol for McDonalds, but previous they held many of the same powers as presidents and prime ministers do nowadays.  Sometimes they also made decisions we would give to law-making assemblies and judicial courts; if kings made all decisions on all questions with no limitations on their powers, they were *absolute* monarchs.

Emperors are like kings.  The original use of the word "emperor" was to take the role of a king without saying that you were becoming a king (it just means "commander" or "the guy who's in charge").  Because that original emperor (the leader of the Roman Empire) was basically the top dog in his part of the world, people use it to mean anyone who is supremely powerful, especially over a wide area.  An empire can include kingdoms within it, with the king recognizing the supremacy of the emperor; it is typical of empires that they are not completely uniform in their political arrangement, and may have different autonomous regions which are ruled according to different laws, may have their own local leaders (either elected, or hereditary), and so on.Well, what are the chances that a test to find a certain gene or protein or whatever would just-so-happen to have exactly the same rate of FP and FN?  I'm not sure whether you're saying that you've done a lot of homework problems where they use that convention (which some textbooks might use, I don't know), or you are in a field where you work with a lot of tests like that.No problem.The other example is not quite accurate.  The "Assyrian Empire" took its name from the city of Ashur, which was occupied by an Akkadian-speaking semitic group.  They gave their name to the region they (briefly) unified in Mesopotamia, and there were people living there who spoke a different Semitic language (Aramaic) who spread throughout the region; these people and their culture were called "Assyrian" because they lived in the former empire of Assyria, not because they were descended from the founders of that empire.

In particular, up until around 700 AD a big ethnic group in that part of the Middle East was Aramaic-speaking, ethnic Arameans who belonged to the "Assyrian" branch of Christianity.  They have been nearly persecuted out of existence by Arab-speaking Muslims, but they're still around.Most popular peanut butters are nothing other than fat and sugar.  The nutritional information is disgusting.  "Organic" by itself doesn't mean anything, but if you buy a food that is an actual butter made out of peanuts with the taste and nutritional value of a peanut, it will probably be organic.So you know how when you read a newspaper, people might say something like "She was looking very elegant in her evening dress," but someone with less formal education might say "She look fleek in dat dress she wearin'"?  You can see how across time and space, speakers who don't communicate which *each other* adapt to new ways of talking that have features other people can't express.  This includes grammar (some people might not use constructions like "was looking", or even "looked", to talk about the past), vocabulary (to be honest, I don't even know what "fleek" means, maybe it's a compliment?), and phonology (for example, some English speakers can't make a "th" sound and say "dat" for that, and they make sounds I have trouble with, like the "mr" in "mrusic").  At a certain point, it gets tougher for people who speak in different ways to understand one another, and that just encourages them to speak only to their neighbors.  Finally, they can barely make out what people from other areas are saying.

Now, why did Latin become a *living* language? Because a bunch of herders and horse-traders who lived north of the Black Sea (Ukraine, southern Russia), who all spoke the same language, spread out from India and Tibet in the east to Britain and Spain in the west.  At a certain point, the people who had gone from Ukraine to Central Europe just had no way to talk to the people who had gone from Ukraine to Centra Asia anymore, so when European members of this big family started speaking in a different way, the fad didn't reach the Asian branch, and vice-versa.  And that extended down to the different branches of the European family, as well.  The people who migrated to Italy went a long, long time without ever hearing a single word spoken by distant cousins who migrated to Spain, Denmark, or Greece.  So after a thousand years of relative isolation, the people who lived on the hills around the Tiber weren't speaking Indo-European, or even Western Indo-European; they shared some features with Sanskit and Persian, and many more features with Celtic, Germanic, and maybe Greek (complicated), but mostly the people living on each hill spoke the same language as people living on the *next* hill, and they couldn't understand distant cousins living beyond the Alps anymore.  That language was Latin.

But the language didn't stop changing when it became different enough that the Celts couldn't understand it.  It continued to change; and it's quite likely "Latin" speakers alive in 700 BC would have had a hell of a hard time understanding most Latin speakers in 1 BC.  The only reason we call them all "Latin" speakers is because they never left Rome, so the speakers of, say, three languages - call them Archaic Latin, Classical Latin, and Vulgar Latin - all lived in the exact same place, so even when the way Romans spoke changed, all Romans changed at the same time.

Well, almost all.  We can see how fast Latin was changing by looking at the writing of Cicero, Horace, Seneca, and so on, and comparing it to how Romans actually spoke.  These educated Romans went to school specifically to be able to preserve a literary way of speaking and writing... that allowed them to read old Roman annals, poems, and plays, and also communicate ideas to other Romans using the same language.  But their servants, slaves, and soldiers were *not* speaking that way.  By the time classical Latin literature appears, the vocabulary had changed (for example, they started calling a head a "pot" as slang, and then stopped calling the head anything *but* a pot), some of the phonology changed (they stopped making distinctions between certain vowels), the grammar had changed (they used the case system less, and syntax more).  

That was how people were speaking when the Romans conquered the Western world.  Colonists brought Latin to Gaul, Hispania, Africa, Dacia, and Illyria, and the natives started learning Latin to cooperate with their new neighbors.  But Latin *kept changing*, and now the Hispania-colonists were rarely seeing the Gaul-colonists, neither of them got back to Rome very often, and Dacia was just way out there on the frontier of the empire.  So the languages changed in different ways.  For a long time everyone thought they were still speaking Latin, but just that those "other guys" were speaking it in a really weird way.  It started with the Sardinians -- very early on, the other Latin-speakers said "we have no idea what these guys on Sardinia are saying".  It started to be an issue because (Christianity was big by now) no one could read the old classical Latin Bible anymore; so St. Jerome translated into into the vulgar (recent) Latin.  But then a few hundred years later, no one could read *that*, and the Church had parishes everywhere where the priest didn't understand what he was reading and the congregation didn't understand what they were hearing.  By this point writers realized two things: (i) Latin wasn't just a fancy, formal version of their own language (like how we write English in newspapers and books), it was a different language. So they started to write books in Italian, French, and Spanish. (ii) No one really understood how to speak Latin anymore! But people still wanted to read the accumulated wisdom written in Latin, and communicated with people from other countries in Latin, so they had to first, study how Latin actually worked, and then teach it to people as a foreign language.

That's the point at which Latin was recognized as "dead".  There were still people who were fluent in classical Latin and wrote amazing books in Latin, had deep debates in Latin, but they had to learn it as a foreign language from *other* people who had learned it as a foreign language.  And all of the daughter languages were recognized to be connected to Latin, but different from both the mother-language, and each other.

It's interesting to compare this to Greek!  The Greeks also established a big empire, and a vulgar form of Greek was spoken from Egypt to Crimea.  But just like there is no Latin-descended language in Britain, Hungary, or Yugoslavia because the Latin colonies in these areas where overrun and extirpated by barbarians, there is no Greek-descended language *anywhere* outside of Greece because all of the Greek-speakers in Egypt, Palestine, Syria, and Anatolia were overrun and either killed, forced to flee, or forced to start speaking Arabic/Turkish; and likewise for the northern parts of the Greek cultural zone, where were invaded first by Iranian-speaking peoples, and then by Slavs.  So even thought modern ("demotic") Greek is quite different from Ancient Greek, no one says that Greek "died".  Languages only die when there are daughter languages.Two aspects: the New Deal, and cost-disease.

The New Deal: During the 19th century, and especially during the so-called "Gilded Age", western economies had a gold standard which led to random slumps, stagnant recoveries, and, thus, persistent unemployment. :( They also has a policy of not interfering in the business world ("laissez-faire")... you could sell cocaine-flavored soda as a medicine, you could ask workers to work for 16 hours a day, whatever you want. 

This was terrible for workers, WWI made it worse, and the post-war peace settlement after WWI made it *much much* worse. In some places workers abandoned the mainstream political parties (which basically embraced the two dogmas) for extremist parties like the Fascists, the NSDAP, and the Communists.  In other places, mainstream parties realize this wasn't working and (i) replaced the gold standard with active central bank policies that encouraged business activity and employment, which meant workers were in demand and the working class started to share equally in economic growth, plus (ii) replaced laissez-faire with a network of social safety nets to protect people in difficult situations, economic regulations to prevent businesses from following selfish, destructive polices, and labor laws that allowed unions and permitted all workers to negotiate with one voice, just as corporations allowed all the investors and managers to speak with one voice.  After WWII, a political elite that was grateful to the veterans and wary of proving the USSR right about the inequality of capitalism further strengthened these programs.

However, some parts of the social elite were never very happy with this and thirty years later they had built up a political coalition that started chipping away at the New Deal.  Like any big program, some of the protections it put in place were miscalculations; others were suited only to a certain time and place; for some, their value was only apparent in an emergency (like 2008), so there was no clear sign that something dangerous had happened.  But by 2005, most of the New Deal had been rolled back.  Your grandfather could get college paid for by the government, a union job, a cheap mortgage, a defined-benefit pension, etc.  You can't, because the people who were born right after the New Deal took it for granted.

Cost-disease: as human beings get more tools, they get more productive.  As they get more productive, they can demand higher wages.  But they don't get more productive in every field at the same time, which means that old-fashioned industries that haven't improved much get vastly more expensive.  Look at it this way: in the year of the lord 1300, if you are rich and powerful a commoner might have the choice between scratching mud with a stick, and being your servant.  In 1850, he might have the choice between driving a mechanical plow or reaper over dozens of acres, and being your servant. In 1950 he might have the choice between building a car on an assembly line, and being your servant.  Since he has better choices in 1950 than 1300, as time goes on you have to pay more and more for servants, even though servants do the same thing: that's cost-disease.  A long time ago, it was normal for "middle class" people to have a servant, but no longer; now, ironically, most people have to do a lot of menial tasks themselves.  More recently, it was normal to: have a house with a big lawn in the suburbs, give your children a good education, possibly up through college if they were interested, pay for full and complete health care, own one or two cars.  All these were considered basic necessities of life, and attainable for anyone who was willing to work... not even work hard, just work.  But they have all suffered horribly from cost-disease, such that now many people can't sleep at night because they don't know how they'll pay the mortgage (or even get together a downpayment to *get* a mortgage), educate their kids (or pay the loans for an education their parents couldn't pay for), pay the dentist or the surgeon, make a car payment, find childcare... these are sources of major anxiety for a huge percentage of the populations, partly because until very recently these were staples of life, like getting enough food and having a warm place to sleep. People were raised to expect they *must* have these things (and they are very important), so it's hard to give them up, and even harder to pay for them.

But on the other hand, in 2015 12 year-old welfare babies carry around cellphones in their pockets with more computing power than the US Government could afford for the Manhattan project in 1945. People routinely travel to exotic destinations, hundreds of miles away for the cost of a nice dinner. There are lots of perks to being alive in 2015, because cost disease is *caused by* increased productivity in newer industries, but cost disease in sectors that are vital to human life are tough to deal with.Let's say that I get you into a hypnotic state.  We're in a crowded room.  I tell you that the room is empty, and because of the hypnotic suggestion you believe me.  I tell you to walk from one side of the room together.  You will (this has been tested repeatedly) carefully walk from one side of the room to the other, avoiding all the furniture and junk; and when I ask you *why* you walked that way, you will give any number of sincere, convincing explanations for the meandering path you took, all of which are clearly False since the only even vaguely probable reason to take that path would be to avoid crashing into the furniture that you don't believe exists.

Likewise, we know that people with neurological vision problem -- for example, people who do not see anything to their left, or in the lower part of their field of vision -- will avoid obstacles and respond to dangers in their blindspot, but will be unable to explain why they acted as they did, and in fact will be completely unable even to guess at what they saw.

There is another phenomenon called subception where experimenters shock healthy people when they say/do certain triggers.  The test subjects will learn to avoid the triggers, but they won't realize *that* they are avoiding the triggers, or what the triggers are, and will not believe that they way they word certain statements or performed certain actions are at all affected by shock-avoidance -- they will have a different theory for why they do what they do. (BTW, I have read *about* these experiments, but haven't read the articles themselves, so I can't answer questions about it - it seems rather extraordinary to me.)

There are a huge number of these phenomena where people have the experience of making a choice for reason X, when it is really, due to some special circumstance, glaringly obvious that the choice was made for reason Y.  That implies that the experience of "making a decision" is not actually causal: it is something we do after our neurons have already set an action in motion.  Sometimes we might have access to the real reason for the action (either because it would be obvious to everyone, or because we are somehow tuned into the brain-processes that *do* decide), but clearly we don't *always* have access, and we have no reason to be sure that we *usually* have access.  The only evidence we have that we make a decision to do X because Y is that it certainly *feels* like we are doing X because Y, but because these feeling is equally strong and equally convincing in the cases where it is 100% wrong, that feeling doesn't count as evidence at all. And that is why people would call that feeling an illusion.

(Note that this idea  - that the decisions we think we are making are an *illusion* - is very different from a different idea that many people are talking about here, that our decisions are forced on us by antecedent causes, and so our will is "determined" by physical causes in the same way as the movement of molecules is determined.  Here, you might say that the will is not free, or you might say that the sense in which will is free is different than and compatible with the sense in which it is forced by physical causes, but we wouldn't say in any case that the will and the decision-making process are *illusions*.)Eh, I don't think the major factors have been covered explicitly enough.

Other than being a healthy organism in general (not sick, not weak, not crippled, not dumb) what you want more than anything else in a partner is *fertility*.  Fertility is caused by different pathways in men and women, since their bodies do different things in reproduction; male fertility is roughly related to having a lot of testosterone and other chemicals that regulate the male developmental pathway, and female fertility by estrogen, estradiol, and female chemicals.  These chemicals have *accidental affects on human growth that affect human appearance*.  These are called secondary sex characteristics.  These include especially bone structure, but also the distribution of fat and muscle.  A skinny man and a skinny woman look distinctly different, due to the different way they store what little fat they have on their bodies, the hip-to-shoulder ratio of their skeleton, the greater prominence of the man's muscles, and especially the unmistakably male and female facial structure.  The more fat you add to this basic set up, the more of these hormonally-caused differences in human body size disappear.  As a human being adds fat, the shape of the human body approximates a perfect sphere, which is sexless and therefore unattractive.  The structure of the hips, shoulders, skull, musculature, and sex-linked fatty deposits are buried under a mountain of lard.  Also, fat screws with metabolism and causes breakdown in hormone regulation for both sexes.  Men lose body hair where they should have it, women grow attractive mustaches.

Second, you say that "fat people are better suited for survival", but this is False in two ways.  At what point in human history would human beings have learned to associated obesity with better food storage?  You can only evolve to be attracted to something under circumstances where the trait exists.  People probably did *not* get obese in our ancestral environment, because there just wasn't enough food to go around.  Hunter-gatherer societies rarely have people who are so much as overweight, because they fight a daily battle for calories.  Farmers tended to suffer terrible malnutrition, as their populations expanded to fill up all fertile land.  That's sort of like saying "you should be attracted to people who are good at calculus, because they'll get good jobs and help you raise a lot of children."  That may be True in theory, but was there anyone who was studying calculus around when humans evolved to be attracted to secondary sex traits?

But further, survival was much more physical in our ancestral environment.  People who are obese are often 50-100 lbs overweight.  Yes, they could survive a famine better than I could, but what about a lion? What about a rival tribe?  Pack 100 lbs of books into a big hiking pack and ... well, first, just try to stand up.  Then run up a flight of stairs.  Jump.  Practice your alternating lunge.  Pick up a piece of paper off the floor.  How does it feel to be obese? Do you think your chances of surviving in the wild are good?Stretching is good for you because doing any kind of work (using your muscles) damages the muscle to some degree, which means the filaments that make up the muscles are no longer in alignment.  Pulling them all to their maximum length gets them all straight again, which allows repairs to begin, and gets them ready for use.  (Think of a tangled box of wires - you need to start by pulling them all to their full length, untangling them from each other before you can use them all.)

*Because* it is good for you, your body rewards you with a little hit of dopamine for stretching, especially for stretching sore muscles. Dopamine is basically human-heroin; the body's way of getting you addicted to healthy behavior.  This is actually why stretching too much before exercise is dangerous - ideally as soon as you hurt a muscle, you'll wince and stop exercising.  Stretched muscles are less prone to injury in an absolute sense, but that dopamine makes exercise feel great even when you're in the process of tearing something.Western accounting/financial conventions mostly go back to the Renaissance and the late Middle Ages, at which point many financial records were kept in Latin.  It was pretty common in Latin to put adjectives *after* the noun (still common in the languages descended from Latin): think of some common Latin phrases you know.  Like *annus mirabilis*, "year wonderful".  So of course if you wanted to say "six pounds (of silver)", you wouldn't say put the adjective first like us, you would say "librae sex", adjective second.  So those medieval scribes, if they were doing a lot of financial records, would naturally abbreviate it "L VI" or "L 6", putting the first letter of "pounds" (librae) first, the way they would naturally say it.  Once these things get established as habits, they are very hard to change; and obviously it has uses, as people are describing in other comments, although I don't think any of them actually get at *why* so many currency symbols are written in front of the number.Something is literary when it is writing for writing's sake.  If you are writing a message, say, offering to meet someone for lunch next Tuesday, your message *uses letters*, but that alone doesn't make it literature, in the same way that banging your hands on a piano doesn't make you a musician. The reason is that you can accomplish your goal without necessarily writing *well*.  Absolutely anything that accomplishes that goal would make it an effective message, even if it were an ugly one; it just depends on what the person you are writing to will understand. The same goes for writing threats, demands, business offers, statistical analyses, and so on; there are millions of ways to write where the bare minimum of mutual comprehension gets the message across, and so you can write out words, sentences, and even books that are *effective* but still *terrible writing*.

Now, you might assume that any work of poetry or fiction that someone reads for enjoyment would be "writing for writing's sake", because if the experience of reading it is your reason for reading it, then the book can't be good in any other way than, good as literature.  But this isn't quite True.  First of all, it goes without saying that many people have written stories for the sorts of reasons I mentioned above, to convey warnings or threats (like fables with heavy-handed morals), to indoctrinate others in their beliefs, to teach key vocabulary words, even to give hidden geography lessons.  I'm sure you'll admit that a story could be a very, very good geography lesson, but still a mediocre *story*; the writer would probably consider the quality of the story as something *extra*, a distraction from the main purpose of the book, that he needs to add to get the kids to keep reading the book.

But beyond even those works of fiction that are written with an ulterior motive, there are works of fiction that are written to provide great experiences, but *still aren't good books*.  How is that possible? Well, there is a difference between experiencing the book itself, and using the book as an experience-creation machine.  For example, imagine someone who is just *obsessed* with guns.  He loves guns.  He goes to gun shows to see guns.  He subscribes to gun magazines.  He searches for images of guns only. If there is an /r/guns, he probably browses it.  Now, if he reads a novel in which the characters own, and carry, and fire a lot of guns, and there are paragraphs and paragraphs of descriptions of guns and gun-manufacturers and shooting, will he like it? Sure.  But the reason he likes it is because it gives him the same sort of gun-immersion experience that gun shows or gun magazines give him.  The gun-porn novel isn't a good book any more than the gun show is a good book.  You could write a story that was a fantastic experience-generation machine for a gun fanatic, but which most people would agree was really, really terrible.  

An especially important version of the experience-generation machine for fiction is *escapism*.  Escapism is what you get when the experience that someone really craves is to abandon his own sad little life, and exchange it for something better.  First-best would be to *actually* make the switch and be a new person, but second-best would be to feel like you had made the switch, at least for a few hours.  For that, you need an experience-generation machine.  Some people like movies, some like music, others like drugs, some like books. Some people want to forget that they're poor and imagine being rich, or forget that they're anonymous and imagine being a world leader, or forget that they're indecisive and unimportant and imagine being a dashing spy, or... on and on and on. A book that makes you feel like you are powerful might be fun to read, but it's a tool to get the same result as doing lines of cocaine.  If the cocaine isn't a good book, the escapist book about powerful people isn't a good book (at least, not because of the experience it creates).

Here are some tell-tale signs of great literature:

1.  Mediocre books tend to get worse when you read them again, and again, and again.  They also tend to seem much worse than you remember if you look at them again after a decade of heavy reading.  Great books are better the second time, and better still the third time. If you come across them again a decade later, you will often feel like you are reading a different book, because there is so much going on that you missed the first time.

2.  Great literature has staying power.  The experience-machines that people want, and how they create them, is very faddish and changes rapidly. One decade's best seller can easily be considered unreadably bad in the next decade.  (This is partly because if you want an experience machine, *reading* is really an inconvenience, and you want it to be smooth and effortless so you forget you are reading as soon as possible.  How do you write in order to get that effect?) What makes a well-written book valuable in 1900, on the other hand, will still speak to a reader in 2000.

3.  Mediocre books tend to appeal especially to certain people and repel others, like different kinds of foods.  Many people can do a reasonable job of predicting whether they will have fun reading a mediocre book just from looking at the cover, because the marketing execs know that the dragon will draw all the people who like books with dragons, so they'll get lots of happy customers.  Bookstores squeeze all these books together on one bookshelf, believing that people who like one dragon book will be sucked in by a whole shelf of 'em.  But someone who likes Moby Dick will not generally conclude from that he wants to read more books about whales or more books about the fishing industry.  Someone who likes Infinite Jest is probably not going to decide he wants to read another novel about tennis, or about alcoholism.  (Also, great writers sometimes dwell on one topic, but more frequently they branch out.  Henry James, for example, wrote one of the best horror stories ever... but only that one. I don't think he ever wrote anything else we would call horror.)

4.  When you make a convincing, blatant copy of the style of a mediocre book, people will love the parody in a mean-spirited way, because they love to see the mediocre author humiliated.  When you make a convincing, blatant copy of the style of a great book, people will love your book *because they think it's good*, although it will constantly remind them of how much better the great book is, and they will call your work derivative.

Does that clarify it?Refrigerator is a word based on Latin roots. It means something like cold-maker, I guess? Same root as *frigid*.  That's how it's spelled.  Anyway, in Latin the *frige* part of that word would sound something like "free-gay" (long I, hard G), but hundreds of years ago English speakers started pronouncing most words which were originally spelled with the letter I with a short I (like tin, instead of teen), and pronouncing G's as soft before E and I.  

So far so good.  The pronunciation is now, in the international phonetic alphabet, something like /\u0279\u026a\u02c8f\u0279\u026ad\u0292\u0259\u02cc\u0279e\u026a\u027e\u025a/.  We need to use IPA to make a specific point about /f\u0279\u026ad\u0292/, which is the most unique part of the word. The "re-" prefix occurs in thousands of words, the "-ator" suffix occurs in thousands of words, but /f\u0279\u026ad\u0292/ is nearly unique, so if you shorten refrigerator to a slang word, it will be /f\u0279\u026ad\u0292/.  But you see the cluster of consonants /d\u0292/ -- most J (or soft G, same thing) sounds in English are /d\u0292/.  Joe, jam, geriatric, gender.  In English, /\u0292/ by itself it pretty rare - that is the symbol for the sound that you hear in *vision* (note vision doesn't rhyme with *region*), *delusion*, and also in how some people pronounce *beige* and *oblige*.

And right there in *oblige* you can see the problem.  The way English spelling works, all people who see *frige* would assume it was pronounced with the same work as *fry*, and many people would assume it was a /\u0292/ with no /d/ (just like oblige).  But we aren't spelling a Latin word here any more; we are spelling modern slang, and we can spell it exactly as it is pronounced.  By adding the "d", we get exactly what we want, a word that rhymes with bridge. ("frid" and "brid" have the same short i as bid, hid, kid, lid. "-idge" has the same /d\u0292/ cluster as hedge, sedge, ledge.)The British "Empire" in India was a hodge-podge of peace treaties, commercial agreements, alliances, and protectorates.  Some areas they controlled more or less directly, other areas they barely controlled at all.  At the point where the British consolidated their control over (nearly) all of India, there were still a number of semi-independent Indian kingdoms who had recognized their allegiance to Britain's Victoria as Empress of India, but who still considered themselves rulers in their own right.  The British had signed agreements guaranteeing the sovereignty of these allied Indian rulers, and they were extremely reluctant to betray them and break their treaties by stripping away their sovereignty when they granted the rest of the subcontinent independence.  The least they could do, they felt, was give these "princely states" the choice of whether they wanted to join Pakistan or India.  Kashmir was one of these semi-independent states, and its ruler vacillated and then went with India, but he ruled a mostly Muslim population.  This was difficult because for India to rule this majority-muslim region would go against the guiding principle for the partition, but for Pakistan to seize it would violate the ground rules for how everyone's rights would be adjudicated that both parties had agreed to.

That was the cause of the first war.  After you've fought three wars over a region, it becomes a question of pride and national security.  No one wants to offend the people who died over the conflict by saying "Eh, we didn't really want it anyway." No one wants to be accused of treason.  No one wants to let the other side take a mile, and then use that advantage to seize another ten miles.Can you imagine that if you were addicted to cigarettes or heroin or something, someone could describe to you what it means to not be addicted, and you could understand that description? And then you could even memorize the description and repeat the description. But you would still be addicted.  You would know what you would have to do to no longer be classified as an addict, but that knowledge doesn't bring you any closer to beating your addiction. Some knowledge is like that... knowing what something is, isn't the same as knowing how to be it.

Or thing of a geometric proof.  You can read the premises. You can read the conclusions.  You can even memorize them.  Know you know what the proof is -- you know what it's a proof of.  You still don't know or understand the proof, though; you can't explain why the conclusion has to follow from the premises, even if you have memorized *that* it does.

Or think of an optical illusion.  Someone can tell you "this is an optical illusion where you can see two faces or a vase". Or "this is an optical illusion where you can see a rabbit or a duck." So you can know what kind of optical illusion you are looking at... even if you can only see the vase and can't see the faces, yourself.  In one sense you know what kind of optical illusion it is, but in another sense you don't.

Buddhists are asked to believe some things about reality and human life that not only most people don't believe, they *can't* believe, or at least they can't start to believe it simply because they aren't actively doubting or denying it.  So you start by learning what the Buddha taught... and then you spend years trying to learn what he taught. And when you know, that's enlightenment.Centuries ago, the elected politicians in the US federal government were much more actively involved in the logistical side of running the government.  Like they were supposed to spend Mondays reading letters from their constituents on the floor of the House, and if someone wanted a government job he would just go straight into the White House, introduce himself, and the president would conduct a job interview.  

One artifact of this is that, in the 1790s, if you wanted to borrow money that was actually kind of a labor-intensive thing.  So if the US needed a temporary loans for some project, the Congressfolk would vote on a resolution telling the Secretary of the Treasury to saddle up and ride to Philadelphia to talk to some bankers about borrowing some money.  And then he would ride up and if he got the loan issue he wanted, he would go back to Washington and then they could go to war or buy Louisiana or whatever. (Actually, Jefferson didn't seek Congressional approval for the huge loan to buy Louisiana, which was controversial, but it wasn't like anyone wanted to give it back.)  

Now things are different.  Debt issues are streamlined. There is a global banking system.  The Treasury Dept. has bazillions of underlings to arrange things thing, and there are more at the Federal Reserve.  The US can borrow huge amounts without changing the interest rate that much.  Figuring out whether the US Gov't can borrow money is no longer a separate logistical hurdle that it once was, but Congress still believe the US Treasury doesn't have *permission* to borrow money until they say so.

The problem with this? Congress already determines the amount America will borrow by passing a tax bill and spending bills.  Whatever the gap is between the spending at the taxation, that is the annual deficit, and we borrow to cover that.  So they think they get two bites at the apple - first they pass bills instructing the Treasury to borrow X dollars, and then they pass a separate bill forbidding the Treasury to borrow X dollars.  It's insane, useless, and dangerous, and they shouldn't have that power anymore.

Why are they using it like this? Because if the US had a legal obligation to spend on certain things, but couldn't legally raise the taxes or borrow money to pay for them, we would default on our financial obligations, which would be a huge catastrophe.  Republicans currently would like to pass a budget which Obama would certainly veto.  That means that they need to either pass a budget acceptable to the president, or one that's acceptable to 2/3 of Congressfolk.  They don't want to compromise, though, so instead they are threatening to plunge us into a national disaster (which Congress can do with a simple majority of votes, by forbidding the Treasury to borrow the funds it ordered the Treasury to spend) unless Obama does what they say.Emotions are complicated, so it's hard to know exactly what you are talking about.  One common feature of emotional distress (both sadness and stress) is "ruminating".  It's basically like if the brain were stuck on repeat, thinking about something sad.  They've done brain scan studies that show that when they let healthy people and depressed people just sit with nothing to do, both are in the thinking/daydreaming mode.  But when you present them with a task to do, healthy people switch out of the ruminating mode and into a action-oriented mode, with activity in different sections of the brain. Depressed people just stay in ruminating mode... in other words, presenting them with something to do doesn't get any mental response from them, or create any motivation, because they can't switch brain activity over to the area that would permit that.

So when we are so sad we can't exercise, or eat, or visit friends, it is generally because we lack strong motivation to do *anything*.  People can generally force themselves to go to work or shower because there would be consequences, but it's really hard to force yourself to eat if you're not enjoying eating.If you mean "why are there so many more murders in Chicago and Detroit than in American cities of similar size", the answer is because they have a very high black population; for some reason black people are disproportionately likely to commit murders, so cities with very high black populations have very high murder rates. No one really knows exactly why this is.

If you mean why are so many people *shot* in Chicago/Detroit, but not in equally large cities in Europe, the answer is that it's easy to get guns in America so most criminals use guns to commit murder, rather than, say, knives.

If you mean why are so many people shot in *big* cities, well... you can't have a murder without a murderer.  If you have twice as many people then you have twice as many potential murderers, so all else equal you will get twice as many murders.  Atlanta has a murder *rate* that is 33% higher than Chicago's (20 per 100,000 vs 15 per 100,000), but it's a smaller city so you still end up with fewer murders.First, not all people believe that the gender/sex distinction really makes sense.  It's a very recent division.  Gender just means "type" (like *genre*) and sex (derived from the same word as *section*) also means "type"; it was only in the last few decades that gender theorists began insisting that they were two different things.  If there *is no such thing* as gender that is a completely separate concept from sex, then of course it couldn't be a social construct.

Now, here are some more points to consider:

1.  Many animal species have behavioral differences and differentiated roles that are (a) sex-linked, and (b) clearly learned or performative.  In fact, almost *all* of the behaviors that could be called performative in the animal kingdom are sex-linked. Animals perform because they want to get laid.  Are you going to tell me that the courtship dance of the bower bird is a social construct? Are you going to tell me that elaborate jousts between male deer in the springtime are caused by the perpetuation of masculinity stereotypes in the media? 

2.  The content of a specific gender-linked behavior can be somewhat or completely arbitrary, even while the existence of gender-linked behaviors is biologically driven.  For example, men have much more interest in the kinematics of projectiles flying through the air than women do.  This may be a hunting skill, or it may be some weird spandrel.  Regardless, whether this is expressed as an interest in soccer, or baseball, basketball, discus, lacrosse, etc. it 100% arbitrary.  You can't have a society where young men are obsessed with soccer without teaching them the rules of soccer, which no one in the world knew before the 19th century.  But that doesn't mean that they wouldn't have been interested in *some other ball game*.

3.  Males and females differ by one whole chromosome. This gives them, not only different reproductive organs, but a whole different suite of neurochemicals, which in itself would be enough to drive a huge number of behavioral differences.  But that difference also means that men express genes in a much more extreme way, because it is more frequent that they have only one copy of a gene for a protein encoded on the X-chromosome.  That's why men are much more likely to be bald, or colorblind.  Men are also more than twice as likely to develop impulsivity-linked mental health conditions like alcohol dependence, and three times as likely to have anti-social personality disorder; we see the same risk-taking and proclivity for violence in male chimps, our closest relatives. Conversely women the world over, in societies on every culture and at every level of economic develop, are about twice as likely to develop a depression or anxiety disorder. This could be a distant relative to the passive, listless behavior female chimps at the bottom of the social hierarchy experience.

That's a great analogy.Thank you :)Burma/Myanmar is right next to Bangladesh (formerly East Pakistan).  During the civil war in which Bangladesh gained independence from Pakistan the country became a basket case, and things have only slowly gotten better, with multiple natural and social disasters coming in between.

During that chain of disaster, lots of Bangladeshis fled Bangladesh... and the obvious places to flee are the neighboring countries, Myanmar and India.  Myanmar let the refugees come in during the first set of crises.  Then, afterwards, Bangladesh explained that it was still barely keeping things together, and asked if the refugees could stay in Myanmar for the time being.  That was the 1980s.  At a certain point, Bangladesh decided it just didn't want to deal with the problem, and started to question whether the refugees were actually Bangladeshi at all.  

Now you have the classic problems with large, long-term refugee populations.  The refugees had children (a lot of children), and they don't really want to leave, but they don't really want to assimilate to Burmese society, either.  So that leads to huge social tensions.  And Myanmar only recognizes citizenship by descent, so no, they can't vote.There are a number of things things that spark extremism:

1. Multiparty systems that reward people who pass some threshold like 3% of the vote with more than 3% of the seats in parliament.  Not only does this magnify the power of crazies, it gives crazies hope that they can pass the threshold if they keep trying.  Many multiparty systems also give some sort of bonus (like fifty seats) to the top vote-getting party, so you can have 30ish% of the votes and 51% of the seats in some parliaments. In the USA, if you don't work with one of the two parties, you have no say in federal politics.

2. Stagnant political systems.  The US has fairly frequent alternation between the two parties.  When one party is out of power for a long time, it tends to get nuttier and nuttier (because only nuts would stay in a party that has never won an election... people who are willing to compromise hold their nose and join the dominant party).  

3. Small countries.  US states sometimes enacts truly weird policies in either the left-wing or the right-wing direction, but a big country is made up of many small populations, and even if some lurch left and some lurch right, the middle is going to be right were it started out. In Europe you can have communists in government in one country and fascists in another, even thought there is no chance of the EU getting a majority of either fascists or communists.

4. Weak protections for freedom of speech and assembly.  In the US you can say whatever you want, and the most extreme people get right out there and wave banners.  In Europe, you can get arrested for speech that is judged hateful, anti-democratic, revisionist, hostile, anti-constitutional, etc. etc. etc., so people with extremist positions tend to meet secretly, react off one another, and become more and more poisonous.  Meanwhile, the extremists on the other side *know* that their rivals are muttering in secret, and both sides worry that the other secretly control/is plotting to control the government.  (This is a pattern that goes back hundreds of years in Europe, by the way.)

5.  High levels of elite solidarity.  The number of things that are politically popular but that European politicians refuse to do is just *crazy*.  The social elite in other countries is so insular and in-bred that on a huge number of policies, the main socialist party and the main conservative party agree on controversial issues and won't back down, even to win elections.  The reason this is a problem is that the safety valve on democratic policies is for Government A to put in place policy X, X turns out to be a disaster, the voters get angry and replace A with B, who repeals X.  Disaster averted!  So long as politicians are opportunistic, you can have two mainstream parties who switch back and forth and solve problems.  But if *neither* party will tamper with the problematic policies, then voters will be willing to turn to extremist parties.

6. Finally, gridlock and sectionalism.  There are tons of veto-points in Washington DC, and since so many different groups can have a veto, a lot of legislation is negotiated between the two parties.  That means that it never pays to alienate the opposition, since even if you have majority today, you might not tomorrow. This has traditionally been deepened by the existence of large areas of the country which were Democratic or Republican for historical reasons, but which had interests more aligned with the platform of the opposite party; there, too, it was easy to pass a bill by hammering out a deal with the Southern Democrats or the Northeastern Republicans.Right. Part of what you should remember, though, is that the term "Rohingya" is three years old.  Before 2012, there was only one mention of a people called "Rohingya", and that was from two hundred years earlier, referring to a small group that does not appear in any records in the 1800s and almost certainly bears no relation to the people currently called "Rohingya".  There are almost certainly some ethnic Bengalis who were brought into Burma by the British during British rule, who have been living there since before independence, but there are also a huge number of recent refugees who are adopting the "Rohingya" label and claiming to have been living there from time immemorial.  The growth of the refugee population (the Bengalis now make up more than 40% of Rakhine province) create the perception that the Bengalis expect to take control of the province away from the natives. This leads to high tensions, which can easily be ignited -- you may know that the 2012 riots were triggered by the gang rape of a Burmese woman, a little spark which led to violence which caused more than 100,000 people to flee from their homes.  So being "left alone" is all well and good, but you can see why the citizens take a dim view of them.To give people a sense of what you're talking about:

&gt; [Dr. McHugh] also reported on a new study showing that the suicide rate among transgendered people who had reassignment surgery is 20 times higher than the suicide rate among non-transgender people. Dr. McHugh further noted studies from Vanderbilt University and London\u2019s Portman Clinic of children who had expressed transgender feelings but for whom, over time, 70%-80% \u201cspontaneously lost those feelings.\u201d

People are saying something like Johns Hopkins is conservative (what?) and that it must be right-wing because  right-wing *brain surgeon* worked there (you must be really ideological if you think deans should be firing professors of neurosurgery for radical politics...), but in fact Hopkins was one of the first academic hospitals to openly concentrate on sexual research, and one of the pioneers in sex-reassignment surgery in the US.  They started performing sex-reassignment surgeries in 1960; two decades later they had 20 years of data on how their patients fared after the surgery, and the results put sex-reassignment in such a bad light that they actually shut down their sex-reassignment surgery program.That's exactly right. TV shows are in production all year long.  The last episodes for the 2014-2015 season were filmed probably around May, and the first episodes for the 2015-2016 season were filmed around August.  The exact filming time for each episode probably depends on the quality of the show.  But remember that you don't need to wait to finish post-production on episode 1 to start on pre-production for episode 2, or even episode 5.  They have huge teams of people working on everything at once.Kingdoms are generally considered to be  *form* of government.

Primitive tribes generally have rules that are partly based on tradition, partly on common sense, and partly on the commands of respected/senior members of the community.  People who break the rules are punished in different ways... sometimes just by social exclusion (what we would call "bullying"), sometimes by physical violence, sometimes by expulsion from the group.

The most primitive tribes tend to be very small and have a non-hierarchical structure. Experts in one area of tribal life will get respect when the group is acting on a related question; overall older people tend to get some deference, especially as stores of knowledge accumulated over a long time and authorities on tribal tradition.  However, as small groups grow, it is hard to maintain group cooperation *and* maintain hierarchy.  Past a certain size, a primitive group while either split into two groups and occupy neighboring territories, or start to accept the authority of one particular "big man" who acts to judge disputes between people who aren't close apply rules fairly.  The agreements between neighboring villages on how to cooperate (for example, for defense against foreigners, or for intermarriage) and the domination of larger villages by chiefs is the start of something like "government".  In general the chief was chosen by popular consensus, but obviously chiefs would like to see their children be equally powerful, so they tried to put them in a position to succeed them.

The earliest recorded city-states had signs of all three ideas (group consensus, agreements between neighboring clans, and rule by chiefs).  On the one hand there were some decisions for which the whole male population of the city would meet together, hear speeches, and vote on some topic (like whether to execute someone, or whether to go to war).  There were other questions which would be decided by a council just of elderly men.  On the other hand, the citizens were divided into different clans or families, and there were rules about when each clan would have responsibility for some public function.  And finally, there were hereditary priest-kings who had the power to decide some questions themselves; although frequently the city would become unhappy with the kings and kick them out, but keep a position with the same duties which might be occupied by a different man every year, chosen by election. There were a variety of different systems, some putting almost all power in the hands of the people, or the kings, or the elders.  These kinds of cities began writing about themselves around 600 BC, but they probably existed in a similar form as far back as 1500 BC.

Conflicts within and between cities led to further developments in the government.  Most of these cities had slaves or servants, and above that a class of poor farmers, and above that a class of rich landowners.  The rich landowners were always using their wealth to lend money to the poor, who would fall deeper and deeper into debt and then lose their family land and/or be sold into slavery.  The result was a constant struggle between the poor (who wanted debt forgiveness, land redistribution, and other policies that would help them) and the rich (who did not).  This basic struggle would then turn into a secondary struggle about which institutions in the city would be more powerful, and how much power the rich and the poor would have in each institution.  These shaped those institutions into complicated forms, and also gave the world some of its earliest written fundamental laws/constitutions (which were basically peace treaties between the rich and poor).  

Then there were conflicts *between* neighboring cities, as well.  Cities would fight, and a city that could convince or force its neighbors to obey it could then use its neighbors' citizens and resources to expand its army and navy, which would allow it to win wars with even more powerful neighbors.  These agreements between cities, for a weaker city to accept a stronger city as its master/protector, formed the basis for various empires.  The basic idea with ancient empires was that the ruler of the empire would let his subjects govern themselves with their traditional local system, but they would pay him tribute and fight for him.  However, rebellious subjects would be punished with harsher, more direct rule.  Over time, successful empires took most autonomy away from local regions and made them follow the same laws to make cooperation between different regions of the empire smooth and profitable.

Does this mostly answer your question?Britain was the earliest nation to industrialize.  They industrialized before trucks, before refrigeration, before modern food science, before supermarkets.  They practically industrialized before canning.  As a result, displaced British peasants were coming to live in a city where they had zero access to the cheap, fresh ingredients of their traditional cuisine, no ability to buy or prepare expensive foods, and no modern scientific substitutes available.  As a result their food had to either be preserved (like with salted, smoking, or pickling), processed (like canned or ground foods), or else boiled and over-seasoned to hide the fact that it was rotting.  This isn't going to give you any ability to make a cuisine that is palatable, and as a result the diet of the British poor became gross, and they lost both the ability and the desire to prepare delicious food.

Compare that to today, when a peasant from the most remote country in the world can come to any big American or European city and find, not just a huge number of fresh fruits, vegetables, meats, milk, etc., but also special groceries catering specifically to peculiar foods and spices that are found only in his own region.  Urbanization hasn't had anything like the same negative impact on cuisine in the countries that industrialized late.Yes, although to be clear to others (you probably know this) all Bangladeshis (nationality) are Bengali (ethnicity/language), whereas some Bengali families never lived in Bangladesh (either because they are from the Indian parts of Bengal, or because they emigrated before East Pakistan became independent).All the Abrahamic religions (Jewish, Christian, Muslim) recognize that God commands his followers not to lend money at interest, but (traditionally) they disagree on how exactly to interpret this.  The Christians and Muslims said, no lending money at interest, *ever*: that's a sin.  But Jewish rabbis said that many moral commandments don't apply to "foreigners", so it was only a sin to lend money at interest *to other Jews*.  That meant that all the money-lending in Europe (and I believe some parts of the Middle East) *either* had to go through complicated procedures that made it "not really money-lending" in the eyes of the church, or it had to be done by Jews. That gave the Jews a market niche in money-lending and other financial services.  In particular, when rulers needed to make big loans, they might need to turn to the Jews, and if their Jewish bankers did an especially good job financing their wars and palaces, they might give them aristocratic titles or other valuable privileges.  (This was one of the reasons the Rothschilds became powerful, as bankers to the Holy Roman Empire).  Furthermore, there were Jewish communities scattered all over Europe which had the same customs, the same language (basically ghetto German), educational ties, family ties; so frequently the Jews in one part of Europe were closer to the Jews in another part of Europe than to their neighbors, so they were in a good position to set up international ventures - especially, international trading ventures.

It has been a very, very long time since there were any legal or religious limits on Christians running banks, but once a community builds up a niche in one line of business, it tends to stay there.  People tend to go into the same line of work as their parents and their cousins.  And due to migration to the New World, Jews from rural communities that were never involved in medieval banking could end up living in a neighborhood in New York City and attending a synagogue where all the community leaders *are* involved in banking.

I don't know of which sectors have large numbers of CEOs besides banking and entertainment.  Entertainment, like banking, was an Old World Jewish speciality.  "Vaudeville" shows were possible for Jews who were sort of on the outskirts of mainstream society and didn't have to worry about being shunned from mainstream society (since they already were excluded!).  Also, parallel to banking, many Christians believed that plays and performances were sinful, and (especially) that *being an actor/performer* was sinful.  Those entertainment shows were a huge hit when Jewish immigrants brought them to America, which meant that lots of Jews involved in vaudeville were leading American entertainers or entertainment producers when radio, cinema, and then TV were invented.  That meant they had the best position to jump in and take advantage of the new media.The British and Portuguese were actively trading in India long before they *controlled* any part of India, let alone before the raj.  Is that what you mean? However the superstition is not "ancient", in the sense that it does not go back past the discovery of the New World.  Superstitions are False beliefs, and often part of the False belief is how universal or how long-established the superstition is.  People who think the number "13" is unlucky say that it is because the 13th apostle at the Last Supper betrayed Jesus Christ; but it's clear no early Christians ever thought that, and there is no evidence of that superstition every having existed until the 1800s.  Broadly, supply and demand, just like anything else.  If a ton of people want to buy pizza from your neighborhood pizzeria, and the guys starts to run out of pizza, he'll do two things: first, raise prices, and second, hire more staff so he can make more pizza, faster.  So he'll end up selling slightly more pizza at slightly higher prices. Currency works exactly the same way.  If a huge number of people suddenly want to buy Euros, there might not be anyone who is willing to sell 1,000 EUR for a price of $1,100 (the current exchange rate). So I might offer $1,120 instead, and then someone who wasn't really interested in selling before will step up to the plate and sell me the currency I want.

But... there are complications.  First of all, over the long-term the "natural" supply and demand for currency is set by trade between two countries.  The basic question is, what are the goods that you can just as easily buy at home or import from abroad?  Let's say that Americans buy European cars and Europeans buy American cars.  If that's the case, the relative price of the two goods has to be comparable in the two countries.  That sets the "terms of trade".  For example, if a European car that costs 30,000 EUR is very similar to an American car that costs $33,000, and the two currency zones trade cars back and forth, the exchange rate *has* to be 1 EUR = $1.10, or close to it, for that kind of trade to make sense.  That also means that if American car companies found some breakthrough invention that pushed the price of American cars down to $30,000, that would put pressure on the exchange rate... either the exchange rate would move towards 1:1, or Europeans would stop buying American cars and the flow of cars between the regions would become one-way.  This is called the "terms of trade".

Once the exchange rate is set by the terms of trade, that determines the prices for all imports and exports.  When your exchange rate gets "stronger", you can afford to buy more imports, but you also have more trouble selling exports abroad.  That means that a stronger currency is bad for employment and growth, but good for the quality of life of people who already have secure jobs.  A weaker currency, conversely, makes it harder to afford imports but easier to sell exports, so it is bad for quality of life but good for employment and growth.  For this reason, often "supply and demand" are not the ultimate explanation of exchange rates, because governments can create unlimited supply of, or demand for, their own currency in order to create the desired exchange rate, if they are willing to deal with the consequences.  So governments that are trying to preserve their national standard of living may create demand/cut supply for their own currency to reach the desired goal; government that are trying to create economic growth may cut demand/create supply for currency, until they reach their goal; or they may change supply/demand to accomplish other goals (like controlling inflation or stimulating the economy), with changes in the exchange rate being an indirect consequence of that.In general when you start a new currency you would start with it pegged to another currency.  This effectively limits the supply of the new currency, the gloober, to the new governments reserves of dollars (or their ability to rely on the US, the IMF, etc for emergency loans of dollars), so you would probably get the exact problem you highlight; a tight money supply, constricting economic growth.  Once people are used to the gloober and you have a steady balance-of-payments situation (like, you know you aren't hemorrhaging dollars from your foreign reserves every month), you would put the currency on a managed peg or something (that is, defend a peg, but change the peg every so often so that you stay close to a market equilibrium).  Once you have a starting point, you can start to react to your economic indicators.  It's like steering a boat.  If you are getting too much inflation and unemployment is already very low, you stop printing quite so much currency.  If you are getting too much unemployment and inflation is already very low, you print more currency.  Once you have gotten through the birth pangs of the new currency (when, as I mentioned, a peg would be best), you don't need to worry about screwing up and making the currency worthless from inflation, or "destroying" the economy, overnight from one mistake.  If you go too far in one directions, you read those signs and switch course.Cold air tends to also be dry, and cold, dry air cracks the lining of your respiratory tract and provides invasion points for microbes.Let's say I show you an optical illusion called the "duckrabbit".  You look at it and see a rabbit.  Staring at what you think is a rabbit for hours might not lead you to see a duck.  But if you go outside for a walk, you might go through a park, and see some squirrels and birds, and then when you get back to the illusion, you have a different sent of mental primes bouncing around your brain, and you look at it and see a duck.  Make sense?

To put it a different way... when you get to the point where you have the option to "step away" from a problem, obviously you haven't solved it.  (Otherwise you would be finished with it, not stepping away.) If you couldn't solve it, you didn't have the exact mental tools you needed at the time.  If you can solve the problem at all without learning something new or practicing more, your best bet is to come back to it in a different state of mind, a different mood, different junk stored in your short term memory.This is a bad test because it does not give you explicit information.  Normally when we discuss tests and probability we want to know *two* pieces of information about it: the rate of False positives and the rate of False negatives.  Normally you report these two pieces of information separately (i.e., this test has a 1% rate of False positives and a 1% rate of False negatives.) They report it as one rate for both, which is weird and not strictly correct.  I think you should have been able to figure out what they were asking (you wouldn't have had enough information to answer the question without a False positive rate), but it is easy to think that they were giving you a False negative rate and the test had a 0% rate of False positives.

When you are doing probability and talking about tests or random samples, always do it this way:

1. Start by writing down the total population (you can do "1.0" to mean "everyone" if you think well in fractions, or pick a big number like 1,000,000 to make the math pretty.)

2. Then draw out two branches from the first number, and multiply by the True population proportion for each sub-group.  We are now looking at the absolute numbers of people in each sub-group, who do not yet have any idea which sub-group they are in.  (So if you start with 1,000,000 people, you would draw one branch with 100 people who have the disease, and another with 999,900 people who don't have the disease.)

3.  Now, draw four more branches and use the information you have about the test to divide each of the sub-groups into two groups.  1% False negatives: so of the diseased group, 99 (99% of 100) get positive results (True positives, although all they know is that it is positive), and 1 (1% of 100) gets a negative result (False negative).  1% False positives: so of the healthy group, 9,999 (1% of 999,900) get positive results (False positive) and 989,901  (99%) get negative results (True negative).

4. Now interpret the results.  Overall there are 10,098 positive results; 99/10,098 are True positives, 9,999/10,098 are False positives.  So from the evidence that you have a positive result, you have a 1% chance of having the disease.  From the evidence of a negative result, you have a 1 in 989,901 chance of having the disease.

If you draw out the branching structure you won't get confused.In general, this is the question: if you can rent out a two-bedroom apartment for $5,000, you can make money on a two-bedroom apartment if you can get ownership a two-bedroom apartment for *less* than $5 *million* dollars.  (That's a rule of thumb, just accept the numbers for the sake of argument.)  Now, people who want to make money as landlords want to make as much as possible, so they will ask themselves: is it cheaper to buy an apartment that already exists, or pay construction companies to build a new one?  If it's possible to build new apartment towers at a cost of, say, $2 million per unit, then developers can realize a (hypothetical) $3 million profit per unit by building, say, 100 2-brd for $200 million and selling them for $500 million.  But it would only happen *exactly* like that if there one construction company that had a monopoly on all construction; in a free market, many companies can build apartments, and they will compete and drive one another down to a bit more than $2 million per unit.  Then the landlords have all these units that they've bought for $2 million per unit, which they can profit from renting out at $2,000/mo; in theory, at the old rent of $5,000/month they would make a clean profit of $3,000/month, but actually they would keep building and buying and renting out more and more apartments, and competing with other landlords until the prices fell down to what would be barely profitable for them.

So why don't prices tumble by 60% immediately? Well, SF isn't letting anyone build new residences, but the number of people who want to live in SF is much higher than the people who wanted to live there in 1990, so when a much higher number of people want to live in the same number of homes, landlords can keep raising prices.  The sense I have is that SF *could* be redeveloped, but that politically it is difficult.  Remember, those 2-bdr apartments that rent for $5,000/mo are worth $5 million. If rents fell by 60%, the owner would lose $3 million in property value on just that one apartment.  Moreover, big new apartment towers would block the view from the landlord's current buildings, create more traffic, make getting a spot in a local school harder, whatever; so overall he is opposed.  Property owners have a lot of power.  And it's hard to get the *tenants* (the big winners) excited about it, partly because they are short-sighted and partly because the pay-offs really would be a long way off... construction has been bottled up for a long time, and if you built new towers starting now, they might not be on the market until 2020, and prices might not come down completely until 2025. (Just example numbers, based on some construction projects I've lived near.)  They would prefer to keep their communities the way they are, while the rich are usually opposed, so nothing happens.

Now, NYC is different from SF in two ways.  First, I think there really are affordable apartments in NYC... but maybe not in *Manhattan*, or in Brooklyn.  For Brooklyn, what I said about SF might apply (if you built more units, more people could live there) but Manhattan is a little different... it's already covered in skyscrapers.  I'm no expert, but I don't know how much even the most aggressive developer could actually bring down prices with new construction.  At a certain point, you have to recognize NYC has amenities that make it a very, very valuable place to work and live, many of those amenities are in Manhattan, so living immediately next to some of the best amenities in one of the best cities in the world will be really desirable, apartments will be scarce, people will pay a lot for them.  It's like buying front row seats to a concert: there's no way for *everyone* to have a front row seat! So the best you can do is charge more for them so people pay a fair value for the privilege.  Everyone else can commute in from Queens/Staten Island/the Bronx/uptown. (However, you might make some progress on real estate prices in downtown Manhattan if you built more in the outer boroughs, added transit, and generally made them cleaner, safer, and more pleasant - at that point more people would want to live in currently undesirable neighborhoods and lower demand for Manhattan apartments would bring prices down.)

This leads to another point - the only way you can make a city cheaper to live in without building more apartments is to make it *less pleasant* to live in.  A homicide wave, layoffs, absurd taxes, terrible schools: any of these would make living in SF or NYC really unpleasant, people would leave, prices would fall.  In essence, that is what happened to Detroit, at the opposite end of the spectrum.  The city government was spectacularly corrupt and incompetent, crime soared, education was in shambles, the regional economy was overdependent on the ups and downs of one industry, so everyone who could afford to move started moving to places where they could find good jobs and safe communities (like SF and NYC).  Now the housing market in Detroit is very flat, living there is very cheap, but that hardly makes it more attractive... if anything it attracts a permanent population of uneducated, unemployed people who are shopping around for a place where they can stretch out their welfare benefits as far as possible.It's like how you wear sunglasses to protect your eyes from the sun.  Your eye-area is darker when you wear sunglasses; yes, your eye-area is absorbing more light, total, when you wear sunglasses, and reflecting more when the sunlight directly hits your bright pupils; but the point is that the light *hits the sunglasses and is absorbed by them*, and doesn't get through to the *eyeball*, which is what can be damaged by sunlight.

Same with black skin, white skin, and sunburn.  Black skin absorbs more sunlight total, but most of it is being absorbed into something like sunglasses, not into the parts of the skin that die/become cancerous from UV radiation.You're welcome. You're welcomeNo one really knows, because the decisions about the currency portraits are the choice of Secretary of the Treasury, and the past deliberations of the committees that designed the current bills have not been preserved.  One requirement (or at least, one previous requirement) was for portraits to be of immediately recognizable national figures, like Presidents, and Andrew Jackson certainly fits the bill.  His face and hair are easy to recognize.  It's also possible that they wanted to put a Southerner on the bill for regional balance, but didn't have a lot of choices.  -- But yes, many people have noticed that Jackson was one of our worst presidents, and in particular was opposed to central banking, and is a strange choice for a Federal Reserve Note.There are three big issues in economics -- growth, employment, and distribution.  Right now the economy is *growing*: we are producing more goods and services per capita then we we were ten years ago.  Also, our economy is *employing* more people: it is inching towards 5%, which is the lowest in five years.  But *distribution* of the gross national product is still going largely to the richest Americans. Wage growth has been uneven.

The main reason why wages are stagnant is that the recovery is not over yet.  Wages are the price of labor. Prices are set by supply of labor.  With unemployment at 5.5% (and other workers on part-time work, or not working in the occupation they are trained in), we still have a lot of people looking for jobs, people who would be *overjoyed* to get a job and the same wage you get paid right now.  Once the pool of chronically unemployed people dries up, then employers stop getting stacks of hundreds of applications for each spot. Then they start raising their starting offer to poach each others' workers away, and offer their current workers big annual raises to avoid the headache of losing a critical team member to a rival firm in the hot job market.

So in these kinds of recoveries, the fortunes of the middle class rises in two steps as the central bank pumps money into the economy: first, the unemployed workers get back to work, and next wages start to go up.  In this recovery, wages are stagnant because we are still working on getting unemployment levels back to were before the recession.  Over the last 30 years, wages have been stagnant because  the central bank has consistently kept monetary policy too tight.We have in the past voted to limit corporate campaign contributions, but the Supreme Court has ruled that donating money to help someone express their ideas is a form of free speech and protected by the constitution.  So that is a non-starter.There are many, many more complex numbers than i -- uncountably many, in fact.  In fact, there are uncountably many complex numbers *for every single number* on the real number line.

You may be confusing how we express complex numbers with what a complex number is.  A complex number contains the square root of a negative number.  We tend to simplify them... just like we might write sqrt(18) as 3sqrt(2), we will write 5+sqrt(-4) as 5+2sqrt(-1) or (the same thing) 5+2i.  But i isn't the complex number, the whole thing is the complex number, and there are an unlimited number of them.I believe to the actual campaign organizations of the candidates, correct? Corporations can still make unlimited contributions for issue ads, I thought.This is pretty ridiculous.  They call this a "deterioration" of Canada's position... but this should be below Bloomberg. I don't think of them as part of the newsertainment industry. People lend/invest money across national lines.  There are only two ways this can go: either on net you are investing/lends more than you are being invested in/lent to, or vice versa.  You can't buy new investments/make new loans without money "flooding out" to the country you're investing in.  You can get new money into your country without selling "vital national assets" and "being deeper in debt" to scary foreigners.  If it's not the first, it's the second.  You can't have money coming in on net while also making international investments.But this is not really a serious barrier to participating in the campaign media festival.  Some of the most effective campaign ads don't mention the candidates at all, or didn't mention them until the very end.I don't know what you mean by "commonly taught numbers".  What is special about i? Just that is a letter than stands for a number?There is a force of gravity pulling down on your body.  Say that force is 150 pounds.  Now, why don't you sink into the ground? Why doesn't gravity pull you straight into the center of the earth? Well, because the ground is pushing up on your feet with the same force: so far so good.  Okay, but here is another problem... the ground can keep your feet up, by what about the rest of your body? Why don't you just collapse down, under the force of gravity, until you are lying and the ground can support your whole weight directly?  The answer there is that you maintain a fairly high tension in your leg and core muscles. You might have the equivalent of, say, 100 pounds of force pressing up from your thighs, keeping the trunk of your body erect.  You can control this force, and use it to lower yourself closer to the ground and raise yourself higher.

Most of the time when you are trying to lift someone up, you are not actually trying to hold them in the air.  Someone who is squatting is exerting a large amount of force to keep himself from falling down. If you try to grab him and force him into a standing position, because he is *already* counteracting 100% of the force of gravity, you only need to add a bit more force to accelerate him upwards.  But all he has to do overcome this upward force is stop fighting gravity, releasing the tension in his legs.  So you might start thinking that you are about to lift him up (because he is helping you overcome gravity) and then feel impossibly weak ten seconds later (because you can't actually support his full body-mass with your arms).I don't know how much they actually dislike each other.  There has been a huge amount of shared cultural history.  French has historically been the most common second language in England, and vice-versa in France.  During the 17th-18th century, there was a widespread sense that France would like to invade England and reconvert it to Catholicism, based on French support first for Charles II, then for the Jacobite pretenders.  There was a tense set of differences between the two nations.  France was a much larger nation (and had a much flashier royal court), but England was actually the wealthier and more productive nation.  France had an army that could have steamrolled England, but England's navy made sure that no invasion fleet ever got out of port.  Then the French Revolution came, lots of aristocrats were guillotined, and the English were scared of being invaded and forcibly converted to *atheism* (first by Robespierre, then by Napoleon).  During WWI the French and English were allies for a change, but this produced even more tensions... the French felt like the British used them as cannon fodder in a war destroying their towns, the British felt like they were dying to defend an ungrateful France, and after the war the French took a vindictive policy which the British diplomats found disgraceful and dangerous.  

Beyond that, all nations (or even regions) have their little ethnic quirks, and even though we tend to be closest to the nations we are *nearest* to, we see our neighbors the most so their minor quirks irritate us whereas the truly exotic customs of people on the other side of the world seem fascinating.Sure. 0 and 1 are the most important.  Then there is 2, and 3, and other small primes, and also their reciprocals, square roots, squares, and cubes.  Next I would mention pi (and pi/4, pi/2, etc. on up to 2pi), and e.  Oh, and ten is important, because we count in base 10. You might also run into N (Avogadro's number) and phi, but you wouldn't use them frequently just for algebra.Most leaves have acid in them that kill grass, and most people like lawns. If you go into the middle of a wood and look for an area without too many bushes and brambles, you'll see what your lawn would look like without raking.  Dirt, covered by a couple of inches of packed-down, damp leaves.Sumerian cuneiform was written up-down, then left to right. Hebrew was written right-left.  The earliest European writing (Greek, runic, Etruscan, archaic Latin) isn't necessarily one particular direction... sometimes it is left-right, sometimes right-left, sometimes "oxplow" style (you get to the end of a line, and then start going backwards on the next line; this style was also found in the ancient Middle East). It seems unlikely that there is an particular reason for one style coming to predominate.  Right-handed people seem to think that it's incredibly convenient to have your hand moving away from what you write as you finish each word, but I think that is imbecilic... if that were so much easier, you would think most of the world would have switch to that system once writing with ink became common.As others have said, it could just be rhyming; Richard is not shortened to Dick because we used to call people Dichard! 

But also, the W/V sounds are very close, so close many cousin languages pronounced the same name with a V, like German Wilhelm or old Norman Villiam.  Villiam was actually the source for our name William (not the Old English Wilhelm/Willem), so it was pronounced with a V at once point.  B is not close to W, but it *is* close to V; you may have noticed that some Spanish speakers can't distinguish V and B, and children can't always distinguish them either.  B is an easier sound to make, so Billy could be babytalk for Villy.All names always mean something... words almost always start as metaphors referring to something else and then begin to be taken literally, as something unique.  Like take "headphones" -- they're phones that you wear on your head.  "Eyeglasses" -- they're pieces of glass for your eyes.  But you don't think of that that way, which is why no one blinks when you buy eyeglasses with *plastic* lenses (impossible!).  

Almost all primitive tribes give each other names that mean something metaphorical. (Think of stereotypical Indian names like Sitting Bull or Red Cloud.)  It takes a huge amount of tribal memory to keep naming people after other people for so long that we forget that the name had a literal meaning (like Lily, or Rose... popular names, but we don't usually think of flowers when we meet someone named Lily), and even *more* memory to keep using the word even after it is no longer used as a word in our daily language (like Theodore... we aren't classical Greeks).

But even within this, we are still *always* adding new names for people that have metaphorical meanings that refer to other objects.  For example, we think of Marcus Tullius Cicero, the famous Roman leader, as having a nonsense name... just a name-name.  But to Cicero, "Marcus Tullius" was "just a name", but "cicerones" was the word for "chickpea".  He was called "Marcus Tullius Chickpea"... because his family all had a bump at the end of their noses that looked like a chickpea.  Look at our own last names... "James Smith" has a first name that hasn't meant any other than as a name for thousands of years, but his last name was given to his family because they were actually blacksmith not too long ago.  Look at the nicknames athletes get, or musicians.In middle English you might say "push\u00e8d", with two full syllables.  So was taunted, of course.  The emphasis will tend to be on the *first* syllable, since that conveys the meaning. "Was he pushed or did he jump?" "PUSHed", because just saying ED could be either "pushed" or "jumped".  Same with TAUNTed.  Now, when you don't emphasize a syllable routinely, it will tend to become less and less distinct as you say it quickly and without attention/precision.  So the "e" sound *could* drop out.  But will it? To find out, you have to imagine what it would sound like if you dropped the sound.

*pushd* -- most people can't actually say this without careful attention.  As you remark, they will tend to say either *pusht* or *pujd*, so that the throat is either vibrating for both sounds, or not at all. (The only difference between, say, dad and tat or dud and tut is that your throat vibrates while you say the D-words. "Sh" isn't a sound with vibrating.)

*tauntd* - this doesn't really work as a sound because the t and d are the the same sort of sound, letting out a puff of air. There is no way to combine them, because you would have to breath and let out another puff of air, unless you concentrated very carefully.  So you can't drop the E.  Since you keep them in separate syllables, the D doesn't have to change to match the sound of the T.

But you get D-sounds in some ellisions, too.  For example, punked (punkt) bunked (bunkt), bagged (bagd) gagged (gagd); k has no vibration (unvoiced is what you call that) and g does vibrate (voiced) so the D stays a D (voiced) next to G, but loses the voicing (becomes T) next to K. Razzed (razd), passed (past); Z is voiced, S is unvoiced.  Now sound these ones out yourself: Lapped versus grabbed; revved versus sniffed; leashed versus obliged. It's a number of factors coming into play at once.

1.  Not every one has *changed their opinions*, they may just have changed their priorities.  While there were not any new developments happening in immigration, people who were against immigration/multiculturalism (I assume that is what you mean by "nativists and racists"), these people whose first preference was no new immigration were happy to vote for the center/center-left on issues that they thought were more import and more pressing.  But when suddenly the politicians they had elected enacted a massive, potentially irreversible change in immigration policy with no votes and no electoral mandate, they decided it *was* a huge issue, and started to look for parties who would listen to them.  This is probably the largest factor.

2. Experience is an incredible teacher.  If your knowledge of the Middle East is limited to a few children of ruling-class Egyptian and Saudi families you met in college, you might think that Middle Easterners are fun people, brilliant, eloquent, and just like you.  That experience would give you one picture of what it would be like to have a million Syrian refugees move into your country.  Having hordes of refugees wandering around your country might be a very different experience, and give you a different picture of that.  Likewise for expectations about the honesty of refugees (many center-left Europeans still cannot quite wrap their mind around the fact that 80% of the migrants are not, in fact, from Syria), the functioning of refugee camps (which have been rocked by fighting and harassment), the gracious and grateful behavior one would expect of guests (not exactly); you learn a lot about an ambitious social experiment by trying it.

3. Some countries have responded to spontaneous outrage against the mass immigration policy with legal action against citizens and threats.  When someone's ability even to *express* they opinion they hold is under threat, that immediately moves them very far to the extreme of whatever political opinion they hold.  If even a post on Facebook can get you branded as a fascist or a racist, well, guess what? People start feeling more sympathetic to the *actual* fascists or racists.

4. I get the sense that some people on the left are kind of disgusted the government can mobilize all of these extra resources and breakthrough all this political process and respect for conventional procedures for *immigrants*, but they couldn't do it for their own citizens.  I've heard this from people, but I don't know whether it is just one or two people, or a widely-shared feeling.

5.  Finally, you can't forget how much you change a policy by making it *big*, by making it *irreversible*, and by making it *non-negotiable*.  I'm sure you can think of dozens of policies that you would think were a *good* thing if they were rolled out in a limited way, with built-in sunset provisions for closing down the experiment and the end of the trial period, and an ability to discuss the ongoing success/failure of the experiment before expanding it... but that you would think was a bad thing if it had to be on a national scale, with an unlimited budget, forever and ever, with no respect for public opinion. Human beings need water for three things:

1. Drinking

2. Hygiene/sanitation

3. Economic activity

Drinking water is a human right, but you only need ten cups a day; it is very easy for people to get a sufficient amount of water *to drink*.  Getting clean water is somewhat harder, but the difficulty there is the cost of *boiling water*; somehow "clearcutting forests for charcoal is a human right" doesn't have the same ring to it.  Another issue can be the distance a person has to travel to get water, but there again, "farmland next to potable water is a human right" isn't quite the same.

Sanitation and hygiene aren't quite as crucial as drinking water.  You can call them human rights if you want, but the bottom line is that you need a lot of infrastructure to give a community a working sanitation system.  The difficult thing about a flush toilet isn't getting the half-gallon of water that flushes the shit into the sewer, it's *building and maintaining the sewer*.  Maybe having a working sewer system where you happen to live is a human right, but at that point, where do you stop? Are paved roads human rights? Reliable electricity? Many communities want those before they want sewers. If you are going to say someone's human rights are being violated unless the local government has the capacity to build them a fully-functioning first-world municipal utility system, then you are making the concept of human rights meaningless.  Anyway, the water isn't the issue here, it's the infrastructure.

But economic uses of water are by far and away the largest uses of water, and these are the ones that cannot possibly be considered a human right.  Most crops use a huge amount of water; industry uses a decent amount for cooling; miners use tons of water.  It's a simple economic question for them.  The more they put in, the more money they make, up to a certain point of diminish returns.  You don't want to give farmers unlimited amounts of water any more than you want to give them unlimited numbers of tractors, or unlimited gallons of gasoline, or unlimited bags of chemical fertilizer.  They can keep using them and using them, but at a certain point the resources they are pumping into the crop are worth more than the crop they are producing (or at least, worth more than the extra crop they get from wasting so many more resources on it).  You figure out how much they should actually use by charging them what they're willing to pay.Tsar (or Czar) is just the Russian word for emperor (caesar), just like Kaiser is the German word.

A king is the head of state.  Kings are almost always king for life (although they can abdicate, or be deposed by a revolution); in the last few hundred years "king" nearly always implies not just a head-for-life, but a *hereditary* head who inherited the office.  However, during the early Middle Ages many kings were elected by their chief noblemen, or by an entire army; the last elective kingdom was probably Poland, which disappeared around 1780.  Currently kings are mostly symbolic, the way Ronald McDonald is the symbol for McDonalds, but previous they held many of the same powers as presidents and prime ministers do nowadays.  Sometimes they also made decisions we would give to law-making assemblies and judicial courts; if kings made all decisions on all questions with no limitations on their powers, they were *absolute* monarchs.

Emperors are like kings.  The original use of the word "emperor" was to take the role of a king without saying that you were becoming a king (it just means "commander" or "the guy who's in charge").  Because that original emperor (the leader of the Roman Empire) was basically the top dog in his part of the world, people use it to mean anyone who is supremely powerful, especially over a wide area.  An empire can include kingdoms within it, with the king recognizing the supremacy of the emperor; it is typical of empires that they are not completely uniform in their political arrangement, and may have different autonomous regions which are ruled according to different laws, may have their own local leaders (either elected, or hereditary), and so on.Well, what are the chances that a test to find a certain gene or protein or whatever would just-so-happen to have exactly the same rate of FP and FN?  I'm not sure whether you're saying that you've done a lot of homework problems where they use that convention (which some textbooks might use, I don't know), or you are in a field where you work with a lot of tests like that.No problem.The other example is not quite accurate.  The "Assyrian Empire" took its name from the city of Ashur, which was occupied by an Akkadian-speaking semitic group.  They gave their name to the region they (briefly) unified in Mesopotamia, and there were people living there who spoke a different Semitic language (Aramaic) who spread throughout the region; these people and their culture were called "Assyrian" because they lived in the former empire of Assyria, not because they were descended from the founders of that empire.

In particular, up until around 700 AD a big ethnic group in that part of the Middle East was Aramaic-speaking, ethnic Arameans who belonged to the "Assyrian" branch of Christianity.  They have been nearly persecuted out of existence by Arab-speaking Muslims, but they're still around.Most popular peanut butters are nothing other than fat and sugar.  The nutritional information is disgusting.  "Organic" by itself doesn't mean anything, but if you buy a food that is an actual butter made out of peanuts with the taste and nutritional value of a peanut, it will probably be organic.Oh, okay.  That is somewhat different. Explaining how a rule evolved and explaining how you learn to follow a rule are two different things!

What she is doing is called "hypercorrection" or "overcorrection" and is very common for native-speaker toddlers.  For example, also in past tense, children will learn irregular past tenses (like swum, ate) very easily, but sometimes they will make little mistakes like eat&gt;ate implies beat&gt;bate, cheat&gt;chate.  So adults hammer in "no, the rule is always -ed, cheat&gt;cheated", and then for a while the poor kid will go around saying "eated" and "beated".  But immersion always fixes this over time.

I think you should just tell her to listen for what other people say.  The real issue is that the "e" in taunt\u00e8d can't ellide.  If she spoke a language similar to English, just tell her that the difficulty of saying "tauntt" shows that she needs two syllables.  But in many languages, "-sht" might be just as strange and difficult as "-t't", so you might not be able to rely on that. -- You should also make sure that she understands that the t/d and the 1 syllable/2 syllable things are two different issues.

If you are teaching people English, you should really buy yourself a phonology textbook and practice making these sounds.  The question you are asking is perfectly, 100% natural, and there is *no reason* a native speaker would understand these issues, but a language teacher really should.There is a difference between "conveniently simple" like, has many common factors so that the division is easy, and "conveniently simple" like, creates the illusion that the False positive rate and the False negative rate are the same thing.  The first helps test a specific idea, the other bungles that specific idea.Like I say, you should be able to work backwards from what they are asking to guess what kind of information they would have to be giving you in the problem for a solution to be possible; but that doesn't make it a good problem.Every retail outlet offers a combination of pros and cons.  Some are cheaper or more expensive; some are closer or further away; some have longer or shorter lines; some have more or fewer choices; some have higher or lower quality products; some have better or worse customer service.

Walmart's main advantage is that it has very low prices.  It has no advantages over other stores in the other areas, so compared to other stores Walmart's customers people who care about cheapness above everything else = mostly poor people.  Also, Walmart tends to have long lines (partly due to high volume, partly due to how long poor people take in checkout lines... they often don't know the total amount until the cashier rings them up, and then need to decide whether they can afford it and how they will pay), and standing in long lines to save money is mostly valuable to people who have a low hourly wage.

This is compounded by the fact that since most of Walmart's customers are poor, Walmart cannot really afford to kick out customers for behavior people consider trashy, because they need their business.It's hard to explain this without drawing diagrams.

Your brain unscrambles information from the light that enters your eye to see things.  You are already familiar with some of the shortcuts it uses, right? When you wear sunglasses, everything looks darker, or tinted; that is because the sunglasses change the frequency of the light, and your brain uses that info to see what color things are.  When you look at a painting, sometimes it looks three-dimensional even though it's flat; that's because the brain shading and relative size to guess at the shapes of objects and how far away they are.

But to determine the *position* of an object, the brain uses the angle at which the light enters your eye.  I want you to draw these diagrams for yourself: 

1.  Light going directly from an object, passing through a window, and into your eye.

2. Light going from an object, bouncing off an mirror, into your eye.

3. Light going from an object in a glass of water, bending a little bit when it hits the edge of the glass, and then from their directly into your eye.

4. (You're driving along a road.) Light coming down from above (say from the blue sky, or a cloud), hitting the road, and then bouncing up into your eye.

5. (You're near the ocean.)  Light going up from a ship in the ocean, bouncing off a cloud, and then going down into your eye.

Now for each of these, your brain doesn't see the object as being where it really is, just because it happens to really be there.  In the first case, you draw a line from your eye in the direction the light was coming from, and you think the object is there; and actually, it *is* there! Success, yay.  But in the second case, you draw a line continuing straight from your eye in the direction the light came in from the mirror, *and then continuing straight behind the mirror*; and that is where the reflected object appears to be, in a secret room behind the mirror.  In the third case, you draw a line continuing from your eye to the edge of the glass, and then continuing straight without bending into the water: that is where the object appears to be, not where it really is. (Try it with a straw or a knife in a glass of water.)  In the fourth case, the shimmer of the sky doesn't appear to be up in the sky where it came from, but inside the road (I'm sure you've seen this on hot days, when the air is hot enough that light bends slightly near the asphalt.) And when light reflects off a cloud with lots of salt-water crystals, it appears to be coming from somewhere directly behind the cloud.They spread lies about it, mostly.  They claim that Planned Parenthood is effectively a for-profit companies that sells fetal organs and tissues to hospitals for research purposes.

If you ask why people *believe* those lies... well, consider something that you are more ideologically attuned to.  Do you know any left-wingers who think that the financial industry is a scam and the whole thing should be socialized? Do you know anyone who believes the Iraq War was just an excuse to grab Iraq's valuable oil? In the same way, expenses and billing in the medical industry is very complicated and, rather than incinerate an aborted fetus, Planned Parenthood *does* offer the patient the chance to donate its tissues for scientific research, and that tissue *is* extremely valuable to researchers, and the researchers *did* previously reimburse Planned Parenthood for the logistical costs of getting the donated tissue to them... although I believe that Planned Parenthood recently opted to decline these reimbursements to simplify things.  If you aren't looking at things carefully, you can see how simple it is to say "look, look, they're hacking up the babies to give them to researchers who pay big bucks to experiment on the pieces!" The reality is more boring, but extremists generally don't look into the details.Currently, beer has more calories per unit of alcohol consumed.  Many popular wines are very sweet.  People often have two problems with alcohol: (a) they don't want to get fat, (b) they don't like the taste, either of the ethanol itself or of the fermentation by-products.  Because men are typically larger and have higher daily energy consumption, A is less of a concern for the average man than the average woman (and especially to the average man who has a manual job and/or physically exhausting hobbies).  Likewise, women and children have more taste buds and are more sensitive to bitter and strong flavors; as a result women are much more likely to want to drink *only* for the intoxication benefits, wanting to hide the taste of the ethanol as much as possible.  So there are too continuum, with women relatively more likely to choose more ethanol-dense drinks and also to choose sweeter drinks; a light, sweet wine will be more frequently chosen by women than beer for both of these reasons.First, it was unlikely that civilization was going to develop in Africa.  I can go into more detail about this if you want, but basically Eurasia was a much better candidate for a number of reasons.  All the modern Eurasian populations are descended from a group that spread out of Africa into Eurasia 60,000-50,000 years ago, which cuts down on your time horizon by a lot. 

Second, it was unlikely that there was going to be civilization emerging during the Ice Age.  The glacial maximum was 24,500 years ago; temperate climates have only been getting warmer and wetter since that time.

Third, there was steady technological change during the entire period from 60,000 years ago to the dawn of "civilization", but we do not consider all technological progress to be civilization, and many of the important inventions of that period (like spear throwers) don't appear to be significant parts of human life because later ages replaced them with something more efficient.

Fourth, making new discoveries is hard and getting them accepted/understood/widely used is harder still.  When you have a population of about 6,000 (the proposed initial colonization of Eurasia), you are going to make discoveries a million times slower than when you have a population of 6,000,000,000.  (And that's assuming you want it to spread; the Hittites kept iron-working techniques a secret for about 400 years.)

Fifth, new discoveries are usually more complicated, inefficient, and useless at first than they are later.  99% of the things we use writing for simply didn't exist before writing, so people didn't know that if they invented writing, they would get to do those things.  It seems the main purpose of writing was, originally, to keep agricultural inventories.  Can you imagine spending a decade of your life studying Sumerian cuneiform just to learn to keep inventories? That's another thing, that even though it is easier to learn an alphabet than cuneiform, people didn't *understand* that speech could be analyzed as words, words as sounds, and sounds represented with letters on a 1:1 correspondence until after they had been using cuneiform for a few thousand years.To add an additional point: there *have* been times when governments owed other governments large debts, it was screwing up the world economy, and forgiving the debts would have saved everyone a lot of trouble. (After WWI, for example.)  But even in that case, the debt still comes back to taxes, loans, and government spending.  If Britain had forgiven Germany's post-war debts to Britain, that would mean that *Britain* would have to raise British taxes or default on loans from British citizens, instead of Germany raising German taxes or defaulting from German citizens.So the idea of a password is like the idea of a combination lock... a combination lock (like what you put on a locker or a bike) has 3 numbers, there are 40 choices or something, so someone who just wanted to randomly try a few numbers might have to try 64,000 before guessing the right one.  That would take weeks, that's boring, so no one does it.

The problem with using three numbers on a computer password is that computer programs can be set up to just try every single "combination" on the "lock", one after another, and they can do 64,000 of those possibilities pretty quickly.  But every new symbol you add to the combination makes it harder and harder, exponentially so.  For example, a digital equivalent of a "combination lock" where you choose four numbers between 1 and 40 would take forty times longer.  A computer that is fast enough to try 64,000 combinations in a day would take forty days to try 2,560,000.  If you choose eight numbers, then it would take the computer 102 million days to try all the possible passwords, which should give you enough time. :)

Diverse passwords help in two ways... first, they make sure that you aren't just using your name or your birthday as your password, which is very easy to guess.  Second, if you make someone include even *one* capital letter, then there is no way to find a password without trying both capital and lowercase letters, which means you need to try far more than forty letters at every step.

If you still have trouble understanding, try this.  

1. Write out all the possible combinations of 0s and 1s for six consecutive numbers. (For example, all the possible combinations of 0s and 1s for three consecutive numbers is: 000, 001, 011, 010, 100, 101, 110, 111. Do that for six consecutive numbers.)

2. Write out all the possible combinations of 0s, 1s and 2s for seven consecutive numbers.

3.  Write out all the possible combinations of 0s, 1s, 2s, and 3s for eight consecutive numbers.

Are you getting tired yet?The best answer I can give you at the actual 5-year old level is that imaginary numbers have the special property that if you multiply sqrt(-1) by itself twice, you get -1, three times you get -sqrt(-1) or the opposite of what you started with, four times you get 1; and when you multiply it by itself five times, you are back where you started, with sqrt(-1).  So you can see that multiplying sqrt(-1) by itself creates a sort of a circle, where you move around and around the loop endlessly. Whenever you multiply what you start with by sqrt(-1) twice you are at the opposite of where you started, and four times you are back at your starting point.

Now imagine you were trying to do some sort of math with circles. Imagine the hand of a clock moving around the clock 90 degrees (or fifteen minutes/three hours, if you don't understand degrees) at a time.  When it has moved 90 degrees twice, it is pointing in the opposite direction of where it started (for example, from 12 o'clock to 6 o'clock).  When it has moved 90 degrees four times, it is exactly back where it started (from 12 o'clock back to 12 o'clock). And you can keep moving the hand of the clock around like this forever - six times, eighty times, one thousand times, it will still come back to its starting position every fourth time you move it 90 degrees.

Because there is this similarity between multiplying sqrt(-1) times itself once and moving one-quarter of the way around a circle, any kind of math that involves circles can potentially be done using imaginary numbers to stand in for the cyclical nature of circular movement.  And because many important aspects of math and of the natural world are related to circles, this means imaginary numbers have deep relations to other important numbers.  For example,

e^\u03c0i = -1

This seems unreasonable.  It's not even clear to most people what it would *mean* to raise "e" to the power of an imaginary number.  But it's True, and it means e and \u03c0 are relate to one another via imaginary numbers.  (If you've never seen e before, the ELI5: "e" is the number where when you plot out e^x on a graph, the slope of the line is always equal to the height of the line.)You're welcomeIt used to be the case that people understood that names (at least other European names) have the same meaning/history as other names in other countries.  So for example we talk about William the Conqueror (not Villem or Guillaume), Holy Roman Emperor Charles VI (not Karl or Carlos), 

That probably broke down, in America at least, during the period of high levels of European immigration where people who didn't know the history of these names had to interact on a daily basis.  Furthermore, people care a lot more about what they are called to their face than what they are called in foreign history books.  Once we were used to calling immigrant neighbors Karl and Giuseppe instead of Charles and Joseph, we expected to call famous people from those countries by their ethnically-appropriate name.

We tend to call other countries and cities by different names from what they call themselves for the same reason that we pronounce, say, Charles and Karl differently -- originally, a long time ago, we pronounced it the same, but over time the pronunciation in the two languages changes.  For example, look at *Rome* and *Roma* - you can still see the final *e* there from when we pronounced it as *Roma*, but over time most of those final vowel sounds were lost on *all* English words.  Or *Florence* versus *Firenze* - here we are pronouncing it pretty much exactly the way the Florentines pronounced it many centuries ago, but over time they lost it.

As for Germany... Germany was not a unified political unit until relatively recently.  For most of that time it was a *region* with many small kingdoms and duchies speaking similar dialects, and as a result different languages came up with different names or it.  One tribe in the region was called the Allemani, one was called the Germani, another was called the Teutoni or Teuts.  In Latin people tended to call the region *Germania*; the French called it *Allemagne*, after the tribe that was closest to them (other than the Franks themselves, who of course were their rulers); the English tended to call them the *Dutch*, but eventually they ended up restricting this to the Germanic-speakers closest to them (in Belgium and the Netherlands) and calling the area beyond that *Germany*.  So some place-names work on that principle.There is a difference between whether something *feels* hot and whether something *holds* heat.  It's like the difference between giving you money and having money.  A bank might *have* billions of dollars (they hold heat) but that doesn't mean they are giving lots of money to you... in fact, you might owe the bank a lot of money (the bank feels cold).  On the other hand you might work for a company which is going broke (they don't hold much heat), but they still give you a paycheck (they feel hot).  Make sense?

A very strong wind might carry a lot of energy, but still feel cool to you because your body carries even more energy, so the more air you come into contact with (i.e., the faster it moves past you), the more heat the air takes out of your body (the colder it feels).  This is called windchill.

Secondly, heat is particles moving very quickly *in no particular direction*.  Imagine you get on a train.  Instead of traveling at 0 mph, you travel at 100 mph.  Do you heat up?  No, because your molecules are all traveling faster *in the same direction*.  In fact, to you, on the train, it doesn't feel like you are moving fast at all; it looks like the trees and buildings are zipping by the train at 100 mph.  Heat isn't supposed to depend on whether we take the perspective of the person who is on the train or on the ground.  

However, moving really fast does give you *energy*, which can be converted into heat (another form of energy) in different ways, for example by friction.  Try rubbing your hands against one another, back and forth, starting slow.  Now do it a bit faster, and finally very fast.  Do your hands feel warmer now? By moving your hand back and forth quickly, you give kinetic energy to your hands.  The friction between your hands causes your skin molecules to move faster (but not in any particular direction), and you feel that as heat.You're confusing two different orders of explanation.  My hand can definitely come into contact with my keyboard.  But the electrons in my hand can never touch the electrons in my keyboard.  How? When we talk about one object touching another object, what we *mean* is that the electron clouds on the outer boundary of one object exert a repulsive force on the electron clouds of another object.  In fact, this force occurs *because* the electrons want to stay as far away from one another as possible.  But what does it mean for *electrons* to touch? Clearly it doesn't mean for an electron's electron cloud to exert a repulsive force on the other electron's electron cloud... an electron doesn't have an electron cloud of its own, it's *part of* an electron cloud!  Having a lower income tends to mean people are less educated, and also more stressed.  Being less educated and more stressed both tend to make people more selfish and short-sighted.  Going out to campaign rallies, going door-to-door, and even just showing up to vote requires a certain amount of public spirit; if everyone votes you all benefit, but if you are selfish you can stay home because you figure that the time it takes you to vote isn't worth the difference it makes.Most people wouldn't say that it "stings like hell".  Most would feel a mild discomfort, like trying to hold it in while you wait in line for the bathroom.  Go to a doctor, you may have an infection.For most of human history the huge grassland on the interior of Eurasia (basically, from Moscow to Beijing) was dominated by nomadic herders who didn't have all of the advantages of modern technology, but who had unlimited numbers of horsemen and were extremely mobile and difficult to put on the defensive.  These peoples were always militarily equal or superior to agricultural empires until the invention of light artillery (cannons that could be pulled into position by a team of horses).  At that point, the technological and industrial power of civilized countries could be used to crush the nomadic peoples. Russia and China, which until around 1700 were terribly exposed and weak because they shared borders with these peoples, suddenly had an amazing opportunity to conquer enormous territories."Strong" is a stupid word that means one US dollar buys more of another currency (say, Euros) and a Euro buys fewer US dollars.  From our point of view, a "stronger" dollar makes foreign goods look cheaper, and from foreigners point of view, a "stronger" dollar makes American goods look over-priced.  This means that Americans consumers can afford to buy more foreign goods, but that American workers can't sell as many goods to foreigners (or even to other Americans, who can import cheaper, foreign-made goods instead).

If you need a short answer to "good or bad": generally it's *bad* to have a strong currency, because the people who higher employment and faster growth helps the most, need the help more.  More specifically, in 2015 the US has slow growth and low inflation, so a stronger currency would be *bad* (because pushing prices for goods even lower than they are now wouldn't be helpful, and there are still lots of people who need jobs or raises).  But really, it depends on what you do for work and what assets you have.As a toddler or slightly older you may go into daycare, which is basically little kids sitting around getting babysitting while drawing or hitting each other or whatever.  Some go all week while their parents work, some go for just one day or two half-days or whatever, to socialize with other children.  This is usually private, but poor parents can usually get public daycare or money to pay for daycare.

At 4 years old, some areas have preschool or pre-K, which is like daycare but starts to teach a few skills like using pencils, learning the alphabet, learning to count.

At 5 years old, most areas have kindergarten, which is available at public schools.  Like pre-school, it is usually a mix of skill-learning and play-time.  In some areas kindergarten is a full school day, five days a week; in others it is only a few days a week, or only a half day, etc.

From ages 6 to 18 you go, one year at a time, from 1st grade to 12th grade.  At public schools these grades are generally kept in three different school buildings: the most common arrangements are K-5 as "elementary school", 6-8 as "middle school" and 9-12 as "high school".  (The high school grades are also called freshman, sophomore, junior, and senior year.)  Another system which used to be common was 1-7 as elementary, 8-9 as "junior high", and then only 10-12 as high school.

Most high schools focus on academic skills.  There are public vocational high schools but these are rarer; generally a student would have to take the initiative to apply to it. 

"Public schools", for us, means a school organized by the town, or even a city neighborhood, for local residents.  Traditionally they were run with local tax dollars, but more and more they are funded with money from the state and federal government (to the point that now, poor school districts get more money per pupil than wealthy districts).  "Private schools" would be schools where parents pay tuition for their children to attend; common kinds include Catholic schools (originally mandatory for strict Catholics, now admired for providing high standards, especially in poor areas), Montessori and Waldorf schools (teaching with an unusual pedagogy), and charter schools (privately-managed schools run with public subsidies).  There are also "boarding schools", where the child is resident at the school.

After high school many students go on to get an undergraduate degree.  We call this "going to college"; undergraduate institutions are called "colleges" if they only educate undergraduates, and "universities" if they also grant graduate degrees and professional degrees.  A "community college" is a two-year program that is open to anyone and often offers the kinds of courses stronger students would have taken in high school. Most American colleges are not very selective, but the few that offer education of an extremely high quality, free/cheap education, or both at once are highly selective (sometimes acceptance rates of 5%-12%) and this causes high school students a lot of stress.

After receiving an undergraduate degree, the most intensive graduate education programs you can apply to are for law, medicine, or an academic doctorate.  There are also masters programs for nursing, education, engineering, and several other fields that qualify you to practice in those fields, but it is also common to start studying that topic directly after high school and graduate from college fully certified to work in that field.

What other questions do you have?A question where you have to look at the possible answers to figure out what the question could possibly be talking about is a good trick question or maybe good for testing mastery for someone who already understands the subject, but *terrible* for teaching it to someone like OP.  It's not about making a semantic distinction, it's about making a *conceptual* distinction... for someone with a shaky grasp of stats, knowing what kind of error "sensitivity" refers to doesn't matter as much as knowing that there are two types of error to look for, False positives and False negatives.  Conflating them is as bad as, I don't know, expecting them to guess that they are supposed to use one "error" number as *both* the standard error on a distribution *and* as the False positive rate.The idea is supposed to be that you still are *in* a calorie deficit, but that you spend less time going through the following cycle:

1. Eat lots of pasta

2. Build up blood-sugar level

3. Build up glycogen level

4. Burn off blood sugar

5. Burn off glycogen

6. Finally, after running out of glycogen, start burning fat.

7. But now you have another meal, so you eat more pasta, back to square 1.

The idea is that taking all the sugar and glycogen away from the metabolic system is like separating a mom from her baby.  The baby will sob and sob and sob, and then forget about her and start playing with his blocks.  And he could play with blocks for hours... but if you bring his mom back, he'll sob as soon as they are separated.  To lose weight you have to burn fat, but your body *hates* to give up the final reserves of energy stored as sugars before getting down to that fat, and people who spend a lot of time in that state are irritable, stressed, and hungry.  Once the actually conversion of fat to energy gets going, it's not as bad.  So if you power yourself mostly through fat, it's easier to go through with it, because you spend less time in the carb-separation temper tantrum.

That is the theory.  In practice, it may just work because when you say "no carbs" you rule out a ton of foods and have to be very picky. Teacher give tests in their own subject as often or as rarely as they like.  Some teachers give a test every week, others only a few big tests a year.  Tests might be 20%-40% of your quarter grade; at my high school, we also had a final exam in each course that counted as 1/5 of the annual grade (so like a full quarter).  College courses can focus on essays or on tests.  Some courses will have almost the entire grade based on tests, with one mid-term exam and one final exam being a common arrangement, but other courses will have no exams at all (in which case they will have at least one big research paper).  But the effect of one test on the grade can be limited, in many cases by policies that allow students to retake exams, or drop their lowest exam, or replace them with a higher score from a later test on the same subject.

Then there are the standardized tests.  The ones that matter most to *students* are the PSATs, the SATs, and the APs. The PSATs are a practice SAT test for 10th graders so that no one is completely unprepared for the SAT; they are also used to identify very bright young teens for special academic opportunities.  The SATs are in theory an intelligence test, although like many straight-up IQ tests you can get better at them by practicing the format of a specific test; the basic idea is to allow the schools to identify maximum academic potential, beyond the work ethic that is shown by the course they took in high school and the grades they received there. You can take the SAT test as many times as you like, but most students take it once at the end of 11th grade.  Advanced Placement courses are college-level courses taught to high-school students with a partially-standardized curriculum; in May all the students who are at the end of an AP course take the exam, which not only demonstrates what they learned in an objective way, but also can allow them to skip prerequisite courses in college or receive college course credit for high school work.

Then there are a patchwork of tests which are aimed at the *teachers* and not at the students, organized both by states and by the federal government, which are important for teacher promotion and school funding; they have lead to huge changes in how schools tackle education, mostly bad.  The two biggest issues are that the tests expect herculean efforts to educate people who have learning disabilities, and that teachers look better if they teach little kids how to take a test carefully than if they actually teach them the skills that are being tested.

I don't know if that gives you a sense of how important different tests are...You sound like someone who gets the right answer on a quiz, and then five years later can't answer the same question in the real world because he doesn't even know enough to *ask* the question when he isn't provided with five multiple choice answers. 

When you actually use statistics, you can't prop up a weak conceptual understanding by asking "what the question is testing".  And the most *common* way for a question to be confusing is by spreading misinformation about one topic while trying to teach you something about another topic.When you buy a stock you have an ownership right in a company.  That gives you a right to a share in the profits the company pays out to owners, and a right to a vote in the management of the company.  More importantly, to many people, *other* people are willing to pay to get your share in the future profits of the company, so if the company does well and grows fast, that doesn't mean you have to wait twenty years to collect the twenty years of profits... the price of your stock lets you sell those future profits to someone else and get the cash today.

The company's original owners/founders benefit when they sell part of their ownership in the company, because instead of owning 100% of the company, they can own 50% (or whatever) and have a lot of cash to spend now.  They can spend that on rich-person things, or they can use it to expand the company/pay off its debts.  After the initial public offering of the stock, if the price continues to go up (a) the founder benefits, because he probably owns a lot more stock and can continue to sell it for money, (b) the company benefits, because if it needs cash for a project it can raise money by selling more stock, and (c) the executives benefit (if it wants to stay independent) because it is possible for larger companies to buy smaller companies against their will if the price falls and the big company can afford to buy 51% of the stock.  Also, people view the price of the stock as a prediction of how well the company will do in the future, so they view a higher price as a vote of confidence and a lower price as bad news.For every prescription drug that is used to treat a serious problem, there are related chemicals that have similar effects that are (a) more dangerous, (b) not as valuable for recreational use as it is for medical use, and (c) used and obtained in different ways.

Amphetamines are not methamphetamines.  I know the name sounds similar, and they do have some similar effects, but small differences make a huge difference with biochemicals.  Estrogen and testosterone, for example, are a slight modification of the same molecule.  Methylphenidate and cocaine have *nothing* to do with one another, so far as I know.

Methamphetamine is a much more powerful drug than amphetamine and has many more dangerous side effects, including brain damage, tooth decay, and a near-certainty of addiction.  Do you know anyone who has been prescribed Desoxyn for ADD?

Most parents wouldn't be happy with their kids doing amphetamines for fun either, but that calculation changes for someone with a psychiatric problem.  It's like saying, "Oh, you don't want your kid doing heroin? Then you shouldn't give him codeine after his wisdom teeth come out." Actually, no: codeine is the same sort of thing, but the chemistry is different and, more over, it's worth the risks when you can solve a severe problem with it.You're welcomeThe government wants you to save. To encourage you to save, they give your employer and you tax incentives to save.  The "401(k)" is an account where you save money; your employer may match your savings (give you free money).  If you get matching contributions, the plan is a good idea, otherwise you should probably use an IRA (individual retirement account) instead.  These have the same tax benefits as 401(k) plans, but you can choose to invest the money in the fund with the lowest fees.

The tax benefits of 401k's are that you can either not pay taxes on the income you save this year (the "traditional" 401k) or you can instead not pay taxes on it when you start to retire and sell (the "Roth" 401k).Republicans are supported by rich people, Christians, whites, and people who live in rural areas.  If you want to know whether a policy is good, start by asking: "Is it good or bad for rich people?", and if the answer it "unsure", go to Christians, then whites, then rural people.

Democrats are supported by non-Christians, some ethnic minorities (black, hispanic), poor people, and city dwellers.  If you want to know whether Democrats support something, again, go down the list.  

On specific big policies, Democrats tend to support more public spending, Republicans opposed (except to military spending). Democrats tend to support fighting unemployment, Republicans worry about inflation. Democrats are pro gay marriage, Republicans are anti.  If you have any other specific policies you want to ask about, feel free.They mean lots of things.  Think of them as being like numbers.  What does "one" mean?  One apple doesn't seem to mean the same thing as one week, and one "yes" means the opposite as one "no"... doesn't it?  The most useful words are also the most versatile words (just like some tools are only good for one specific job, and duct tape is good for everything), so that means that if you want to know what they "really" mean you have to be a little more specific, and put them into a systematic relationship with other words.Oh god, don't waste money on that. Thanks, though.Exactly.  It's been a while since I studied this, but the super-simplified version is that every tissue in the body has a place in the queue for available energy that determines when different tissues will stop storing/using more, and when they will provide energy; a tissue's place in the queue is determined by it's insulin sensitivity.You're welcome. Obviously if you are teaching a foreign language in  foreign country, the issues are different, but you already seem to understand that English  movies, music and TV shows can be a good substitute for immersion.  You type English quite well, though.  If a lot of your tutoring is in English work, a phonology textbook would still be valuable for you - maybe more valuable, since (a) you may not realize deviations between your accent and a native accent, (b) you may have trouble teaching a consistent target accent (for example, many European children learn British accents in school and American accents on the TV), and (c) just in general, if you are doing language tutoring it's hard to figure out what rule to teach someone if you don't know what words would describe the rule (like the rule, "consonants next to one another have to be both voice or both unvoiced".Thank you.&gt; Your body in the medium term prefers to break down your muscle to generate glycogenic amino acids before it begins to burn fat in the long term

So far as I know this is wrong, but is mediated by the fact that your body may mark some unused muscles for atrophy.  If you are physically active in a normal kind of way (preventing muscle loss), your body will not break down muscle for energy unless your energy deficit exceeds the maximum rate at which fat cells can burn their fat molecules, which I believe is 25-35 kcal per lb of fat per day.

&gt; Try getting full off of nuts versus potatoes while holding calories the same.

Have you actually tried this? The oils in nuts produce ghrelin which makes you feel full very quickly.  You lose your desire to eat more raw nuts very quickly, although this won't be the case for, say, salted nuts, sugared nuts, or other flavored nuts which are coated with chemicals your body craves.

&gt; Ketogenic diets are especially bad for people who work out because your body is far stronger with enough glycogen. More weights lifted -&gt; more muscle gained.

That's spectacularly False. Strength has a lot to do with different factors, including, as you say, *nutrition*.  Most people who become stronger while dieting are getting better vascular and nervous systems.You can find them yourself if you care! Sorry, this is ELI5, not AskScience. I've put time into thinking of ways to express ideas that could, in theory, be understood by a 5 year-old; I'm not *also* going to put time into searching PubMed for the articles where I have read about the latest research into metabolic pathways.  

Also, when you ask people for sources for "their claims" in a forum where they are likely to humor you, be sure to state what you accept/understand and what you doubt/don't understand.  For all I know, you were unaware until yesterday that the body stored some energy in glycogen and some in fat, and I would have to start with high-school biology.&gt; The one asset that a country has an infinite supply of at zero cost you think is good to devalue?

Hmmm. I think there is a very simple misconception here that I think is standing between you and a decent understanding of the monetary system.  What do *you* think a country *does* when it wants to "devalue" its currency?Are you running 5+ miles a day? Are you losing weight (burning fat)? Then at some point during the day, you reach the end of your stored glycogen and switch to the burning of fat for energy.  If your energy intake is primarily carbs, you will just go through the cycle of building up and burning down your glycogen stores more frequently.

I'm not sure whether your emphasis is on your results, how you feel while running, how many calories you burn, etc.  An hour of cardio is an hour of cardio... the skinnier you are, the harder it is to recruit your remaining fat cells, and the more tired you'll feel while trying to exert yourself and run an energy deficit at the same time.Whose economy are you talking about?

In general, economic activity uses fossil fuels as an input to produce consumer goods as an output.  The cheaper the inputs are, the more of the final product you can make, so cheap oil is *good* for the economy.

But conversely, if the economy collapses for reasons unrelated to oil, people will stop producing goods and they will stop buying inputs - including oil, of course - and that will cause the prices of raw materials to fall.  So in that sense low gas prices could be a *bad sign* for the economy, but as a side-effect, not as a cause.

On the other hand, for some people, oil production *is* the economy.  Some countries, like Venezuela, Saudi, and Russia, get a large chunk of their national income from oil production.  There, "the economy" is basically the national government using oil revenues to give people freebies.  When oil prices fall, the nation as a whole makes much less money.

Even in the US, there are some regions where oil production is a larger industry than any other.  There, low gas prices make some operations unprofitable (because it costs more to drill for the oil than you make back by selling it), and for the small group of people who are invested in those industries or work for them, they might say low gas prices are bad for *themselves*, even if they are good for America.The main thing to look for is the endings of the words.  Just think of it as a way to make the endings of all the words in a phrase about a specific noun "hang together."  As though in English, when we talked about a "zebRA", we said "thera bigra, fastra zebra", but when we talked about an "elephaNT" we said "thent bigent, fastent elephant".  Obviously the rules aren't quite that simple... but that should give you the basic idea.The US got involved because it was worried the South Vietnamese couldn't defend themselves against the North Vietnamese without help.  And in the end, when the US left, the South Vietnamese couldn't defend themselves against the North Vietnamese.  So the basic answer is; what happened at the end would have happened much earlier.

That said, what originally worried American planners wasn't just the fate of the Vietnamese themselves, but the fate of countries threatened by communism all around the world.  (a) If the communists had controlled all of Vietnam ten years earlier, would that have meant other SE Asian countries would have been threatened by communist insurgencies at a far earlier point, when the communist movement was stronger? (b) If we had set an example of letting allies fall without a fight when challenged by communist guerrillas, would that have encouraged the USSR and China to fund more communist guerrillas?  

Also - the US didn't *know in advance* either that South Vietnam would lose, or that later US administrations would decide to withdraw.  You make decisions based on your expectations, not on hindsight.We do have medicines that stimulate neurons -- caffeine, nicotine, cocaine, amphetamine, sucrose.  In general though they either have nasty side effects, or your body adapts and you need bigger and bigger doses to get the same effects. But we do *have* them, and many people suspect that a lot of the speeding-up of intellectual progress in the west comes from the use of stimulants.

We also know of lots of dietary and lifestyle changes that effect mental function, but most people are too lazy to do them, given the effect you get.

Elective surgery only has become a thing since Semmelweis pioneered the idea of sterilizing medical implements - before that, if you had to have a surgery you would *probably* die, so no one was going to have a surgery to get smarter.  The first brain surgeries were even more recent, and we still can't do a perfect job neutralizing brain *diseases*.  There are no surgeries to become stronger, or get bigger lungs or a more powerful heart, either.Let's say I own a lawn-mowing business.  I hire 4 dudes at $8.00/hr and then charge home owners $40/hr.  That means that, once I've paid my 4 workers, I make $8/hr of net revenue from the lawn-mowing business.  How much of that is profit depends on the annual overhead for the lawnmowers, the pickup truck, the advertising; let's say the annual overhead is $8,000, so if I can get 1,000 hours of lawn-mowing customers per year I break even, more than that I make a profit.

Now let's say the government tells me I need to pay $15.00/hr to those four dudes.  That means my labor costs are $60/hr.  So I will lose money every hour if I charge $38/hr... I have to raise it to at least $60/hr just to not lose money; let's say I raise it to $68/hr.  This is nearly double what I used to charge, and most of my customers are now going to say "No thanks, I would rather mow my own lawn." But I still need 1000 hours of lawns that need mowing in order to pay for the overhead expenses! So it looks like there is no way for this business to make money; I shut it down, and those four guys have to look for some other job.  If some of them were lawyers or computer programmers who just happened to be mowing lawns for fun, they will probably find another job, because they have skills that make their work more productive than $15 per hour.  But the guys who have no skills, and maybe don't even speak English very well, will be fighting for a small number of jobs where one unskilled guy can produce $15 of revenue in an hour of work.

That's what happens overall.  Some people lose their jobs, other people get a raise.  Workers who were making more than $15/hr already aren't affected, other than that they are paying more for services that are done by unskilled workers (like lawnmowing), or else don't get to have those services at all.  In the long run, it might encourage people to figure out more efficient ways of doing business (like inventing a lawnmower where one unskilled worker can do the work of two, bringing the labor costs for my lawn-mowing business even below where they were originally).Sure. It's like saying "I've always called my mother 'Mom' and my grandmother at least once a month."  It's not like it is an ambiguous sentence, but it's not a good way to teach English to foreigners.It's eli5.  I think he understand what happens when the companies are rolling in money and don't have any incentives tied to labor costs, when *nothing* changes: the workers get more money. As I understand it, his "what would happen" question means, what effects could it have *other than* some people now having the $15 minimum wage?  That's what I tried to explain.  Does anyone *not* know that a $15 minimum wage would raise the minimum wage to $15?

&gt; Additionally, there is the government perspective to keep in mind. Many of those people now earning minimum wage need to have that wage supplemented by food stamps and other social programs. By increasing the minimum wage, there is a very real possibility that dependence on social programs can be lowered.

That is an additional benefit of people earning more which I think is fairly obvious... when people have more money they spend it on all kinds of things and need less help in all sorts of ways, we don't need to list every single one.  This is only worth mentioning separately if you somehow thing it is better to be on government assistance without a job than to be on government assistance with a job (which some people do think - like, they believe it is exploitative on the part of those companies, and those low-income jobs should be eliminated to punish the companies. I think that is a strange view, myself.)

&gt; It has never led to this crazy state were suddenly all companies are going bankrupt.

That's True.  I'm giving an example to someone who hasn't looked into it before of why certain jobs can only exist in a low-wage environment.  I didn't mean to imply that every single job in the country would be like my low-wage lawnmowing business, though.  I didn't emphasis the possibility that the effects would be minor because he was asking about a national increase to 15$/hr.  That would be a relatively large increase, and I don't know why you would expect it to be an inconsequential as earlier increases. For example, when economists were looking at the border of PA and NJ (where there were two different minimum wages on the opposite banks of a river) and employment in gas station employees didn't really change much, that was about a $1 difference. But 42% of American workers earn less than $15/hr.  How are you supposed to know it's zebra and not sebra or jebra? When you learn the word, you learn how each syllable of it is pronounced.  From that point, there will be a more or less predictable pattern that determines what gender the word is. 

Maybe we are seeing two different questions: you are seeing the OP as asking a question equivalent to "Why is the English word for *manzana* "apple" and "pull-up"?" And there, the answer is that it is passed down from generation to generation and you just have to learn the word as it is.  I am seeing a question more like "How do I know whether I should used the article "a" or "an" with the word "apple"?"  There, the explanation is that the historical "n" which once existed on all articles was lost *except* on the class of words which start with a vowel, so once you know the word you know whether it is "a" or "an".Okay, but the ultimate method behind all of them is to *increase the supply of currency*.  The rest is details.  You can do it by changing an interest rate, by increasing the size of the budgetary deficit, by buying bonds, securities, and foreign currencies, but these are all tools, different *ways* to increase the supply.  

So you say, you can have an infinite supply of something and no cost, why would you want to devalue it? But there is a cost - whenever you increase the supply of currency, you lower its price, just like when you increase the supply of any other good... except currency prices are measured in foreign currencies or commodities (not in the currency itself, where the exchange rate is always 1:1), and we call the price change "devaluation" instead of "getting cheaper".

As a result - sure, it's True to say that the infinite ability to supply more currency is one of a state's greatest resources.  But it can't actually use that ability without devaluing the currency that it is supplying huge amounts of! Conversely, a state that wants to prevent a devaluation can only prevent that by abandoning that ability, because you prevent devaluation (i.e., defend one price for a currency) by sharply limiting the supply of that currency.

You mention capital controls -- capital controls are a great tool for managing exchange rates, but they still control exchange rates by *limiting the supply of currency*.  They are different from a standard monetary policy in that without restricting the supply of currency for domestic use, they make the entire currency near-useless for international use.  It's liked if you were proud of manufacturing a car that could never get a speeding ticket, because you had crippled the engine to make it incapable of traveling faster than 50mph.  I don't mean to knock capital controls, but they aren't a way around the central problem: the downside to a pegged currency is that you have to choke off the supply of currency to maintain the peg.Lots of aspects of modern society are a carry-over from centuries ago.  Tax-free non-profit organizations are just a survival of the old exemption of priests and church lands from royal taxes.  US bankruptcy laws are just a particularly literal-minded codification of the Biblical commandments on lending and debt (down to the detail that you get to declare bankruptcy once every seven years).  Birth certificates evolved seamlessly out of baptismal certificates, and welfare out of a more and more bureaucratic forms of the poor-relief offered by medieval churches.  

Marriage was the same way.  A lot of the features it has (the steps you go through, the ages at which it is contracted, what you do after being married, what counts as a grounds for divorce) were all set down by the sacrament of marriage in Christian societies.  The secularization of marriage involved taking the procedures, the authorities, and the justification for any reforms out of the hands of the church, but there was no practical difference between a married couple's civil marriage in 1800 and their religious marriage in 1750.  

People who criticized marriage on secular grounds (or defended it on religious grounds) mostly expected that the more secular alternative to the Christian-ish marriages we have today would be *no* marriage.  The state just wouldn't recognize any partnerships between people and would let them do whatever they liked in their romantic affairs, like unmarried couples do today.  There was no expectation that gay marriage would exist because gay marriage is historically unprecedented.  There has been gay sex and gay love since the beginning of recorded history, but the romantic relationship that primitive societies put an incredible amount of effort into defining, controlling, and regulating is the relationship between a man and a woman.  I'm sure you can understand why... and if you can't, it's not worth our time to go into.  Suffice to say that people could envision changing marriage in very extreme ways, but always as a legal contract with a man on one side and a woman on the other.

The idea of gay marriage didn't take shape until there was enough acceptance of homosexuality for gay couples to be openly keeping households together, in an era where the government puts a lot of thought into how to help people raise families and makes some decisions about who gets what benefit on the basis of marriages.  At that point there was something gay couples could clearly use (the benefits going to married couple), or even needed, and a clear reason why they couldn't (because, unlike straight people in the same situation, they could not legally marry).  That immediately raised the question... why not?Connecticut historically had two industries: shipping and financial services.  As I'm sure you can imagine, a working-class guy is more likely to be a longshoreman and a college-educated guy is more likely to work for an insurance company or a hedge fund.  During the mid-1900s both industries did really well, and because it can be hard for working-class families to find good jobs, lots of them migrated to CT, creating a large semi-skilled population.  

Then technological change made many of CT's big ports redundant.  That meant there was a large working-class population that became unemployed.  But the financial industry - even though in the 1600s they started out providing underwriting and insurance to the shipping industry - didn't need the ports.  CT was already tied to the national and international financial businesses in NYC.  In fact, many people who work in finance in NYC raise their families in the CT suburbs or retire to CT.  These are some of the richest people in the nation.

Because the state has a lot of total income to draw on, it could provide services to the communities that were hit hard by the decline of those ports, which prevented worse suffering but kept a population of potential-longshoremen who were unneeded locked in place (when if they had just told them to gtfo, they would have suffered more, but they would have lefts the state to go suffer *somewhere else* and made Fairfield and Bridgeport look better).Not really... the role of Arab civilization in the history of science was primarily (1) ferrying accomplishments between the east and west of Eurasia, and (2) preserving some copies of whichever Greek scientific works they didn't destroy.

So - not to sound hysterical, just because I can't think of a better analogy - it's sort of like giving the Nazis credit for saving so many people from the Holocaust by sending them to work camps, giving them food and medicine, and so on.  That misunderstands the situation entirely.  There would be nobody *to save from* the Holocaust if the Nazis hadn't started sending people to death camps and denying them food and medicine. There would be no need to preserve Greek mathematics and science if the Greek world hadn't been pulverized by the Arab conquests first.  Likewise, the Greeks were perfectly good at taking ideas from one end of the Middle East and spreading them all over the far ends, as were the Assyrians, the Persians, the Romans, the Parthians, the Mongols, and every other group that has had a piece of that particular pie.In general when you are looking at the health of a nation in terms of *economics*, you want to look at a range of different factors.  Measured according to *most of* these factors, the American economy is actually doing pretty well.  However, the month-by-month changes in economic activity, which for the last few years have shown steady improvement, recently got weaker; so we were hoping the US economy would improve as much from 2015 to 2018 as it did from 2012 to 2015, but now that looks less likely.  People are less certain about what the next year will look like.  

Now, two specific groups hang on to two factors to specify fairly narrow ways in which the economy is in "bad shape".

First, right-wing nuts tend to have exaggerated ideas about the danger of the size of the money supply, the national debt, and the annual deficit.  In the last ten years the US has created a lot of new money and borrowed a lot of money; and this has actually been very good for the economy, and is fairly benign.  However, in the right-wing people tend to think that anything that is True of a family must also be True of the USA as a whole.  I can explain these issues to you if it interests you... 

Meanwhile, people on the left repeatedly and correctly point out that most of the growth, not just in the past five years but in the past thirty or forty years, has gone to the wealthiest Americans, and the poor and middle class have missed out.  I think there is a lot of truth to this, but it is misleading for a number of reasons... most importantly, whether *the economy is good* is a different question from *who it is good for*.  Growth, investment, inflation, employment, consumption, and other strictly economic measures help you track the dynamics of an economy through the boom-bust cycle.  I think the most reasonable interpretation of "is the *economy* in bad shape" is, are we currently in a bust or boom, is it sustainable, and what policies could facilitate that? This goes back to the 1700s when, if the federal government wanted to borrow money, there were actually logistical questions of *who* they would borrow it from, how much, when it would be due, and at what precise interest rate.  So if Congress thought the US needed to borrow money for something, they would pass a bill instructing the Treasurer to go around trying to see who we could borrow the money from. It was a separate sort of action in the same way that applying for a mortgage is a big deal for you or me... if I want to buy a house, obviously that means I'm committing to take out a mortgage, but there is still a huge hurdle of *actually applying for* the mortgage, which I might not get, or might not get at rates I like.

Nowadays the federal debt is vastly more streamlined.  In fact, there was no real logistical complication to borrowing money as far back as 1900, which is around when Congress decided it would stop passing individual bills instructing the Treasury to borrow more money, because it was pointless and a pain in the ass. Unfortunately, instead of taking formal steps to *end* debt authorization, Congress thought it was perfectly easy and logical to switch to a system of telling the Treasury to borrow whenever it liked, up to a certain *level*.  From the point of view of the system that came before, that was extremely rational and convenient, but from our current vantage point we can see the wrinkle: that it gives a congressional leadership with a tiny majority the ability to threaten to torpedo the US government if the other party doesn't do exactly what it wants.&gt; We live in a capitalist nation . If GM would have fallen , it would have given room for other companies to grow.  If i was a small business , I would have certainly have had to file bankruptcy.

And in bankruptcy, your small business would have probably had about ... what? Five creditors, ten creditors clamoring for money? Even if a few of them ended up going bankrupt themselves because they can't collect what you owe them, it's not a big deal. Likewise with any employees you have, or any companies you give a lot of business to.  Sure, it hurts them to lose you, but it's not a threat to the US economy.  

With General Motors, though, we are talking about thousands upon thousands of different businesses who need the money, thousands upon thousands of employees and suppliers who need the paycheck/orders, and \u2014 more importantly \u2014 further thousands of businesses who depended on them.  At that point, the good the bailout does for the economy outweighs the inefficiency of government intervention.  In fact, because the government only lost $11 billion on the bailout (because it owned 61% of GM afterwards), and the bailout saved enough midwestern economic activity that it increased tax money by $37 billion, the net effect of the bailout on US finances was +$26 billion, which is pretty good.  

Also note that the GM *organization* and *creditors* were bailed out, but the *owners* were not.  The value of the old stock was basically wiped out.

&gt; Ford got our of their debt without asking for government help. Why didn't we let GM do the same ?

Ford, GM, and Chrysler went to the government asking for a bailout.  Ford just wanted free money; when they learned how strict the government's terms were, they back out.  GM also backed out, but they didn't have any other alternatives, so in the end they were forced to accept the government plane.  Chrysler also got bailout money, but I don't know how that ended up.

&gt; Also how is the government able to accrue so much debt ? Who do they answer to?

In terms of politics, voters like you and me. In terms of borrowing? No one.  The US government is the safest investment in the world, so Americans pay very low interest rates on the national debt.  Think of it this way: if a bank thinks your small business is a bad bet, they can say "You have to take these high interest rates, or we'll lend the money to a big reliable firm instead."  And if they think the big firm is a risk they can say "You have to pay us high interest rates, or we'll switch over to mortgages instead."  So the reason why other people have to worry about indebtedness and how much interest they pay is because the bank doesn't *have* to lend to you, it can move into safer and safer assets.  But what's the safest asset of all? A treasury bond from the US government.  Why are they safe? Because there is no chance the US government will ever decide not to repay them.

&gt; If i was in debt surely the government would come after me ? Are they immune to justice or scrutiny?

You may be confusing two senses of debt: owing money to people for goods and services that you haven't paid for yet, and owing money to a lender whom you have agreed to repay at a later time.  There is nothing illegal about having a debt, even lots of debt! It's only when you can't repay it that it becomes a problem, and even then you have the right to declare bankruptcy, so the debt itself will never get you in trouble. But when you buy a service with the expectation that you will make payment when the bill arrives, and instead you ignore the bill, that is considered one step above stealing or writing a bad check, and yes, you might get in trouble for it.Let's say you had a shape that was a combination of two three-dimension shapes that you knew the volume of... like, maybe it looks like a cone glued on top of a cylinder. The obvious thing to do would be to break it up into two parts, right? You would measure the volume of the bottom like a cylinder, and the top like a cone, and add them up.  And you can imagine an object that is made out of three shapes glued together, four shapes, a hundred shapes, whatever.  If you know the volume of each piece, you can add up as many parts as you need to get the total volume of the combined object.

The idea behind using calculus is that if, instead of knowing the *volume* of lots of 3-D shapes, you know the *area* of lots of 2-D shapes, then you can cut a 3-D shape into very, very thin slices, and the volume of the whole shape will be equal to the area of an infinite number of infinitely thin slices... time the infinitely small width of each slice.  (Imagine a step-pyramid and a True pyramid.  Can you see that a step pyramid made of three levels might have a very different volume than the True pyramid, but a step pyramid with thousands of steps would have almost exactly the same volume? Same idea.)  The idea of adding up the volume of an infinite number of very thin slices may seem crazy, but calculus exists for exactly this situation.  It may seem like overkill to use this method for cubes, because every single slice is the same\u2026 but when the size of the slice changes depending on where it is in the object, then calculus becomes very useful.If you learn a lot of about 17th century mathematics, you'll see that Newton wasn't a lone genius... as he said himself, he was making incremental steps beyond what the previous generation of mathematicians (especially Fermat) had been doing.  And what was Fermat doing? He and the generation before him were doing lots of very original math, but they were also struggling with the surviving work of 5th century mathematicians, and trying to figure out what they knew and how their techniques worked, and how to advance them.  And in fact, some of their techniques turned out to be rediscoveries of ancient mathematical ideas that have since been rediscovered by archaeologists in scraps in trash-middens in Alexandria.  I don't think it's any exaggeration at all to say that the Arabic invasions delayed modern mathematics, at least, by 900 years.  Obviously there wasn't some medieval Greek thinker who would have discovered calculus on the *day after* the Arabs interrupted him, but all the pieces were in place at the point when the Greek world was destroyed.  The same goes mutatis mutandis both for other fields where we know what the Arabs transmitted was a fraction of what they destroyed, as well as for other areas (like optics) where Western European experiments in lens grinding proceeded with little knowledge of ancient Greek optical theory, but surely would have benefited from an intellectual exchange with a living Greek tradition.

&gt; shows the lack of understanding about the Islamic world when it was in its prime during the 8th to 11th centuries

Those were the glory days of the Islamic world, but they had barely stopped burning books before the end of the 8th century. Political apex, religious apex, artistic apex, I'm happy to buy all that, but intellectually...? It's easy to go back to the 1000s after the 1800s, squint your eyes, and say "Oh, er, Alhazen was kind of trying to do something like what Riemann did!"  But the proof is in the pudding and in this case nothing really had meaning in Alhazen's work besides his transmission of Ptolemaic ideas back into Europe.  (By the way, *secundus Ptolem\u00e6us* mean "Ptolemy-follower"... second in the sense of next, secondary, "according to". I would be curious if you have a source for this being a way of idolizing someone, like we might call someone a "Second Einstein".)You're very welcome.Reagonomics was two interlinked ideas; supply-side economics and trickle-down.

First, it\u2019s obvious that when tax rates are 0%, the government collects zero dollars in revenue, correct? What is not quite so obvious, but still clear when you think about it, is that if tax rates are at *100%*, the government would *also* collect zero dollars, because no one would work if the government took everything away from them.  In other words, there are two factors at work here that determine how much tax you collect at a certain tax rate\u2026 as you raise the tax rate from 0% you tax a large fraction of income, but as the tax rate gets closer and closer to 100%, people work less and less, and eventually not at all.  If the total tax revenue, as you go from 0% rates to 100%, starts at zero and ends at zero, it must rise for a while at higher and higher rates, then peak, and start to get lower and lower.  Currently economists who study these issues believe that the \u201cpeak\u201d tax rate on rich people that would maximize tax revenue is something like 75%, and maybe higher; but Reagan\u2019s advisors thought it might be much lower, maybe as low as 40-50%.  So they thought that if you *cut* taxes, you would get *more* tax revenue (because you are moving backwards, up to the peak) and also, people would work harder, so there would be *more* economic growth.  Win-win. George HW Bush memorably called this \u201cVoodoo Economics\u201d.

Second, for a long time the government tried a lot of different policies to fight poverty and, weirdly, the distribution of income between the poor, the middle class, and the rich stayed exactly the same.  Americans as a whole got richer over time, but the ratio between the richest and the poorest stayed the same.  Many economists, and not just on the right, started to wonder whether there were powerful social forces that made the distribution of income between classes rigid and impossible to change.  But if there was nothing the government could make the economy more fair because it was impossible for the government to change the way the economy distributed income, then *anything the government did to expand the economy* would end up benefitting the poor, even if the immediate impact appeared to benefit the rich.  So Reagan\u2019s administration started to defend measures that were clearly designed to benefit the rich by saying that the large economic benefits of these policies would necessarily be evenly spread through society: the money would appear to be in the hands of the rich at first, but then it would somehow \u201ctrickle down\u201d to everyone else.  Unfortunately this didn\u2019t work; it seems to be largely a coincidence that programs to benefit the poor and middle class between 1945 and 1980 only barely managed to keep things the way they were, creating the impression of a stable distribution of income.Pigments absorb light.  We make paintings, photos, printed illustrations, and so on by adding pigments together.  The more pigments you add to get the exact right shade, the more light the pigment absorbs.  Therefore you need to start with the brightest possible pigments (cyan, magenta, and yellow) in order to be able to mix them together to get a full range of lighter and darker shades (including the darker red, green, and blue).

But *light itself* makes things brighter when you add a second beam of light to the first beam.  Therefore if you want to make all sorts of colors, including both less intensely bright shades like red, blue, and green, and also brighter shades like cyan, magenta, and yellow, you need to use darker beams of light as your building blocks, so that you can get the darker colors and also combine them into high-intensity beams that produce the really bright colors.Why would it be hard to run a 5k with a 50-lb pack? Why would it be harder to run it with a blister? Or with a spoonful of tabasco in your mouth?

You could give lots of complicated explanations, but they all come down to, "Because that would be really unpleasant."  When we are doing unpleasant things, we want to stop.  But when we do things and find them pleasant, we want to keep going, and even start to get playful about trying to do the activity in new and better ways (for a fun, in other words, trying to go faster).  Pleasure is our body's ways of saying "You're doing something good, I want you to keep it up," so being in a good mood wouldn't be much use if it didn't somehow keep our energy up.If by "losing weight" you mean "burning fat", the answer is mostly "it turns into water and carbon dioxide."  A fat molecule is a bunch of fatty acids hanging off a sugar like suits off a clothes rack.  First you cut the fatty acids off the sugar, which produces one molecule of water each.  Then you slice the fatty acid in half; these pieces get used for energy, and when they are thrown into the power-plant of the cell the result all that is left afterwards is two water molecules and two carbon dioxide molecules per half. So each fat molecule gives you have 9 water molecules and 6 carbon dioxide molecules when it is fully metabolized, if I understand correctly. As the other guy says - you breath out carbon dioxide and piss out water.&gt; Every object in a state of uniform motion tends to remain in that state of motion unless an external force is applied to it.

This is still True.  Electric and magnetic fields can apply force to charged particles, changing their motion.

&gt; II. The relationship between an object's mass m, its acceleration a, and the applied force F is F = ma. Acceleration and force are vectors (as indicated by their symbols being displayed in slant bold font); in this law the direction of the force vector is the same as the direction of the acceleration vector.

Still True.  The force is just applied by an E&amp;M field rathe than by friction, gravity, normal force, spring force, etc.

&gt; III. For every action there is an equal and opposite reaction.

This is usually explained with reference to the forces two bodies exert on one another in a collision, but Newton intended it to extend to the attractive force of gravity as well, I think.  He couldn't have intended it to extend to E&amp;M (which he did not know about), where the mutual attraction/repulsion of two charged particles could be compared to the mutual gravitational attraction of two massive objects, but you will probably see the similarity.I mean "saturated", but since saturation is used in two different ways in these discussions it's not a good ELI5 term! 

You can think about colors in two ways.  Once is: what has to be True of the *surface of a physical object* for it to appear to be a certain color in white (ordinary) light? Another is: what has to be True of *the actual light itself, that is traveling through the air and entering your eye* for it to appear to be a certain color?  -- Does the distinction between those two make sense?  You have vast personal experience that didn't teach you the problem with saying "You can produce an infinite supply of it at no cost, so why would you ever want to devalue it?" I have no idea what kind of experience you could be talking about, but regardless, good luck.To *six months*? For gang rape? I think most people would want six years, followed by deportation.  The difference is that a country that has almost no crime will have criminals with a different profile than crime-ridden countries, who commit crimes for different reasons, under different circumstances, and as a result can be effectively deterred/reform with a different set of punishments.  Sweden could have 6 month reform-school sentences for rape twenty years ago because twenty years ago, they didn't have gangs of rapists wandering around Stockholm looking for victims.  As you say yourself: "Different country, different standards." And a country is the people who live in it, not some abstract metaphysical creature.  New populace, new country, new standards.

Additionally, while I have no information about the angelic youths in this particular case, it is well-known in Sweden that men aged 20-30 come to Sweden, claim to be teenagers, refuse to provide any documents, and as a result are legally protected as minors and cannot be deported.  I don't know what would be more frustrating, to learn that these men lied to get lighter sentences, or that there are genuine gangs of teenage rapists in Stockholm. Teens may deserve leniency on isolated, impulsive crimes like shoplifting, but I can't help but think that crimes that are (a) brutal or (b) carefully planned planned and orchestrated are a *worse* sign coming from teens.  

By the way in reference to your other comment; as you probably know, Sweden has had for years the same permissive immigration regime that the EU has really only adopted in the past year and a half.Food has a high percentage of water content.  Over time, or with the application of heat, the water content can be forced out, which generally makes the food harder and more brittle.  Sometimes we dry out a food on purpose and under controlled circumstances (for example, to make jerky or raisins) but other foods are meant to taste "moist" (like bread or cake) and we call the undesirable flavor/texture the food gets when it dries out staleness.Teachers have a lot of work to do that isn't directly related to sitting in a classroom with students, so for a teacher to have a 9-5 workday, the students need to leave earlier.

That is the main reason.  It would also be very difficult to get students to focus for 8 hours when they can already barely focus for 6.  Students (and their families) also want time for sports and other non-academic activities.Violent crime is terrible, no matter who the victim is, but past a certain point there is collective responsibility.  Groups of people collectively choose to follow a certain way of life. They reap the benefits of the culture they have chosen, but where their culture makes them a danger to others, it's more just for them to live with other people of the same background.  That way the people who reap the benefits of that way of life *also* share in its human costs.  That is the only genuine reality check available - short of some form of gruesome imperialism - that can ever force group of people to admit that they need to change.I think what you are trying to say is 36% percent of violent crime is committed by 12% of the population.  51% of *murders*.&gt; "Don't complex numbers only have a definition because we created one for them?" 

There is a sense in which this is True.  It's the same sense in which real numbers, rational (fractional) numbers, and integer (whole) numbers only have definitions because we created definitions for them... because they are useful.  

But there is something your question keeps missing, which is that we haven't just *passed up* on the chance to define x/0.  The problem with x/0 is that there is no way to define "zero" and "divide by" so that this makes any sense.

Let's start with what zero is. The number we write as "zero" is, more technically, defined at the *additive identity* when we get technical about describing numbers.  The "additive identity" is the number such that, when you take a number and add the additive identity, the sum is identical to the original number.  Make sense? In other words, for all numbers N,

N+0=N

That's what zero means.  

Now, multiplication is defined so that AxB=A+A+A+...+A, adding the two numbers together B times. Even from this, I think you start to see what is wrong with having a number of the form x/0.  Because zero is the *additive identity*, and multiplication is *adding things over and over*, multiplying any number by zero gives 0+0+...+0, which remains identical (0) no matter how many zeros you add.  Let's give a stupid definition of division: solve the division problem "x/0 = ?" by asking "Zero times what number gives x?", there is no way to solve the problem.  For any X that isn't zero, *no number* will solve the problem, and for any X that *is* zero, *all numbers* would solve problem.  It is just the nature of a "division" operation that is supposed to invert the "multiplication (repeated adding)" operation, that it doesn't have any meaning applied to the additive identity.

Back to the different number systems.  When we start with the natural numbers (0, 1, 2, 3...) we can add but we can't subtract; you get around this by making any two natural numbers stand for some integer.  You get around the fact that 2-5=? can't be solved with a natural number by letting (2, 5) stand in for the type of number you would like to have to solve it.  (Do negative numbers only have a definition because we created one for them? Yep.)  But then even with the integers, we can multiply but we can't divide; you get around this by letting any two integers stand in for the the type of number we would like to exist so that reverse-multiplication works out.  Real and complex numbers are defined in a similar way.  But we don't have a set of numbers that we would *like to be* equal x/0, in order for division to work.  The numbers we needed for division to work were already created when we defined the rational numbers; it's a *consequence of those definitions* that x/0 doesn't make sense.It's not reporting the *rate* of giving, it's reporting the *change*.  The richest people give much, much more, even as a *percentage* of their income (and this on top of an already larger tax bill).  

Below $200,000/yr, the income *percentage* to charity starts to reverse, but the absolute number is much higher, as you would expect. Someone who makes $200k probably gives about $5,000 to charity per year, and someone who makes $50k gives about $1,500.  Even if this were all True charitable donations, it would seem reasonable to me... but in fact, most Americans' "charitable" donations are actually donations to their local church, which is more like a membership fee in a club than a True donation to the needy.  Furthermore, church-donations make up the larger share of donations in poorer regions, which must accentuate the trend.

Overall research shows that financial stress and other forms of scarcity create mental strain and lead to stupider, more short-sighted, and less altruistic decisions.Do you understand the evolution of *any* of the body's organs? I don't think I can ELI5 the evolution of any particular biological function, but if you understand some in detail I can give you a ELI5 translation from the one you get to the one you don't.Species (like genus, family, order, and class, for that matter) is just a word for *type*.  Dividing the animal kingdom into species is one project, and identifying breeding problems between organisms with slightly different genes is another.  The second project actually started long before the first project (the "Linnaean" system of classification, named for Linnaeus) was even dreamt of! But later on, people doing the first project decided the second project was really useful for what they were doing.

The basic insight goes back to the ancient world.  People had already noticed that donkeys and horses can crossbreed, but that the offspring (a mule) is sterile.  Ancient scientists expanded this into a convincing account of why fabulous monsters, like centaurs (horse-men) and minotaurs (bull-men) would be impossible.  Horses can walk at birth, humans only after a year or more; horses reproduce from three years old, humans from thirteen; horse-stomachs digest the grasses they graze on, human-stomachs a wide range of foods but no grasses; with all these discrepancies and thousands more, it seems totally impossible that one creature could be developing to be a horse and to be a human at the same time.  So centaurs don't exist.

Nowadays we understand genetics, and connect these observations to *inbreeding depression* and *outbreeding depression*.  I'm sure you've heard of isolated villages becoming inbred and everyone being a little bit off? Well, that is what happens when your parents are so closely related that they share the same genes.  Everyone has rare genes, which can produce unusual or or unhealthy results, but normally even if you get a rare gene from one parent, you'll get a normal gene from the other, and the healthy gene can do most of the work.  Getting two rare genes would be like lightning striking twice - unless you are inbred! In that case it's quite likely, and you'll be sickly and unlikely to thrive because of *inbreeding depression*.  Outbreeding depression is the opposition situation... where instead of getting two rare genes that are exactly the same from related parents, you get two genes that are common in two different populations, but they don't play nicely together when combined. Think of it like throwing parts from a diesel engine and a standard engine together haphazardly... each part might be an amazing part in the engine it was designed for, but it will be a lucky thing if the hybrid engine works at all, never mind works well.  Outbreeding depression is what explains why mules' reproductive systems just don't work, but it doesn't imply that the parents are from different species.  You can see it in plants, beetles, humans... 

Anyway, back to species.  The people classifying species were originally most interested in coming up with the key anatomical and biological features that were distinctive markers of each species.  It was largely a descriptive task.  But at a certain point they had to ask... how similar do two animal populations need to be to be in the same species? Is any tiny difference at all acceptable, or do they need to be completely different? Where do you draw the line? As you can imagine there were no clear ways to answer this question, and the people who "discovered" new "species" were always keen to argue that some feature they discovered was truly distinctive.

Ultimately what the classifiers decided was that the *overall* similarities they were looking for in a species, and the sharp divide that would ideally separate two related species, occurred because at some point the two populations drifted far enough apart that outbreeding depression set in, so the less-fit intermediate population died out, and so the gene flow between the two populations ended and they continued to drift in different directions.  Since this was the *background history* that was causing the species-distinctions they were looking for, they decided that in ambiguous cases the deciding factor would be whether the two populations could interbreed to produce viable, fertile offspring.  If they can, the populations could theoretically merge completely again, if they were pressed into the same terrain. If they can't, they are separated forever.

So that is how you answer the species question.  But... even here, there are degrees.  Some species can't mate at all with their closest cousins at all (we can't mate with chimps, for example... although we could mate with other hominids).  Others can mate, but the offspring is too sick to live. Others can mate and produce viable offspring, but the offspring are infertile.  Others can mate and produce viable offspring, but only some of the offspring are fertile, or they have very low fertility.  Tigers and lions are of the last kind.Basically, you have a skeletal system.  This goes up from your feet to your pelvis, spine, and skull.  If you line them all up perfectly, so that the skull rests precisely above the spine, the spine directly above the pelvis, the pelvis on the feet, then the whole weight of your body will be borne by the ground, in the same way the steel beams of a skyscraper keep it from collapsing into the ground without any effort or exhaustion on the part of the skyscraper.  This is the most efficient and least tiring way to stand/sit/whatever. 

However, your bones, and especially your spine, are *not* rigid, because if they were that wouldn't be very useful, would it? So as efficient as this directly-stacked skeletal configuration is, you do still need muscles to give it a little push to keep it still.  The "core" muscles around your spine are especially important.  The problem some people have is that their core muscles aren't even strong enough to keep their spines lined up, or at least not for very long.  So they move from the "good" posture (the one where the skeleton supports all the weight of the body) to a bad posture, where they are slouched over in a way that doesn't require the core muscles to keep the spine straight, but puts huge forces on specific muscles/joints/tendons that aren't meant to bear that kind of stress.  The result is sore tendons and muscles.  (Imagine you were having trouble holding a really heavy box, and you were worried you were so tired you were going to drop it, so you passed it to someone else... and the only one to pass it to was a toddler. He is going to get even more tired and is even more likely to hurt himself!) But these sorts of positions become habitual as nerves grow/adapt to try to make that position more comfortable and "natural", which means that it makes the healthier positions harder to get into.  That tires your back out even more while letting your core muscles get weak.  So you feel awful, you have low endurance for all sorts of tasks, and you begin to habitually walk and seat in an unnatural way that looks unattractive simply because healthy people normally adopt the "good" posture.  But if you work to strengthen your core muscles it will become easier and easier to adopt the good posture, and it will become habitual again.

Make sense?Think of all the things in the world that don't form memories.  Books don't have memories.  Milk doesn't have memories.  Lamps don't have memories.  Even plants don't have memories, and most animals don't have real memories, at least not in the sense of "an experience you can recall", which is what you're talking about.

Forming a memory requires a very specific organization of matter into cells and cells into neural networks.  There are infinitely many more ways to organize matter into non-memories than into memories.  It's not surprising that when you hurl chemicals at the brain, it is much more likely to move it into one of the states where there are no memories, than to move it into one of the tiny number of states where there are more/better memories! Think of it like a hurricane hitting a trailer park.  What happens more often, that a hurricane blasts a trailer into splinters, or that a hurricane blows a trash heap into the form of a brand-new trailer?

But even though there are no drugs that promote memory in exactly the way you are talking about, many chemicals promote memory by promoting the *processes that promote memory*.  Stimulants make it much easier for people to focus/pay attention.  If you are typically distracted when you are introduced to a new person, you won't remember his name because you didn't exactly *hear* it to begin with.  On stimulants you focus on the name (not the distraction), hear it, and start the process of committing it to memory.  Likewise, stimulants make it easier to review data, or attack data in new ways, which is another activity that allows us to promote our memory... but which undisciplined people may be to scatterbrained to focus on.  Conversely, chemicals that have the effect of making you sleep (not of shutting down your brain, like alcohol... that's different) make it easier to get 8+ hours of sleep per night, which is a period that is crucial to memory formation.Drunkenness negates active expressions of consent, but doesn't negate criminal guilt.  If you punch someone while drunk, or hit someone with your car while drunk, or break into someone's house while drunk, not only is being drunk *not an excuse*, but it actually makes you more guilty, both morally (you are responsible for how chemicals you choose to take affect your body) and in most states legally.  Why would you think it would be any different with rape?

What I think is confusing you is that if we were absolute certain that two people were enthusiastically and unambiguously agreeing to have sex and enjoying their decisions to bang (expressions of consent), but both of them were too drunk to think (thus invalidating their expressed consent), there would be a technical sense in which they both raped each other, sort of like the weird technical sense in which when a teenaged couple texts each other sexy photos they are both guilty of exploiting minors.  No one would actually be prosecuted in that situation.

But *in practice*, realistic people know that people's stories about what happened can't be believed with 100% confidence, and they also know that if one of the two partners was actually sober enough to think and was taking advantage of blackout-drunk partner, it was probably the guy, not the girl.When humans started to colonize Eurasia, there were approximately 8,000 of us. Now there are approximately 8,000,000,000.  If each person is equally likely to make new discoveries, shouldn't we make discoveries a million times faster now?

Plus, the Americas were discovered and global oceanic trade routes opened up only slightly more than 500 years ago.  That meant that the ideas, species, and natural resources of every place on the globe could be used by every other place on the globe for the first time.  The printing press allowed ideas to spread quickly and without the supervision of religious authorities.  Long, slow processes of political and economic reform meant that people who discovered new things could put them into operation and keep the gains for themselves; that encouraged inventive thinking and pushed stale old ideas off the public stage.You have lots of nutritional needs.  Not just total calories.  For example, let's say you weigh 180#.  Maybe you need 150g of protein per day.  To get that from a balanced diet, you probably need about 1800 calories a day.  But if you eat only chocolate cake... well, let's be charitable and imagine that a 200-calorie slice of cake has 1 gram of protein.  Then you will need to eat 30,000 calories of cake per day to get the protein you need. Clearly you're not *actually* going to meet your protein needs eating all cake, but if your body is protein-starved and demands more food, you will probably eat far more the 1,800 without ever getting enough protein.

Same with energy.  Calories don't supply you with energy at the same rate.  Let's say your breakfast choices are 600 calories of chocolate cake or 600 calories of oatmeal.  The sucrose in the cake will be digested and metabolized within the hour; you might use 150 calories of it, start storing the rest as fat or glycogen, and then your body is immediately clamoring for more energy.  The oatmeal will be digested over the course of the next four hours, so while only 150 calories are available in the first hour that is enough for your body's needs, and then the next 150 oatmeal-calories are digested and ready for use during the second hour, and so on.  So you could easily manage to eat 2,400 calories of cake trying to get yourself feeling "ready to go" (another 600 calories every hour), when 600 calories of oatmeal would have kept you powered up for a full hour.

Additionally, while it differs from person to person, most people find pure sugar (like chocolate cake) addicting in a way that vegetables and most fruits aren't.  No matter how much someone likes eggplant, it's hard to eat it "for fun", after you aren't physiologically hungry any more.  If you are in the habit of eating eggplant and not cake, you'll also be in the habit of obeying your body's hunger signals.  If you are in the habit of eating cake, you can eat cake for calories, but also to fight boredom, sadness, anxiety, or just because it's fun, even when you aren't genuinely hungry.Satan does appear in various books of the Old Testament; but you're correct that most of the references there are obscure.  Anyway, three big factors:

1.  The original jews probably did not believe in immortality.  They thought you rot in the ground and return to dust, and god rewards good people either in this life, or by ensuring the success of their family/tribe/nation after they die.  Later on this became a point of dispute between different jewish sects, some accepting the original principle, some adapting the beliefs of the surrounding cultures about personal immortality, heaven, and hell.  Jesus and his followers doubled down on heaven and hell.  That naturally meant that the evil spirits jews (and other primitive people) believed were sent to punish evil-doers must be involved also in the *ultimate* punishment; tempting people into hell, bringing them to hell, and punishing them in hell.

2.  As the followers of Jesus debated what the big deal was, one theme that became very important was the nature of mankind as revealed in Genesis; specifically, that misdeeds in the garden of Eden had tarnished *all* human beings with an "original sin" that made us liable to evil, to death, and (on the new interpretation) to hell.  For whatever reason, the early Christians decided that the likeliest explanation for Jesus' mission was that his goal was to cancel out original sin.  That gave the genesis story a new importance, and especially cast the "serpent" who convinces Eve to sin, originally a comical sort of folktale creature, into a cosmic villain. -- At the same time, a indecipherable sort of allegory about the political fortunes of the Roman Empire, which cast Rome as a "great beast", was re-interpreted as a prophecy about the end of the world, and the beast assimilated to the serpent/Satan.

3.  As Christianity spread through the world, it came into contact with a number of other religions.  This was a fertile period.  While they rejected their beliefs, they ended up taking a number of powerful symbols from them... Gnostics who thought the world was created by a flawed secondary spirit who had rebelled against his creator, a supreme being; followers of Mani, who taught that the world was a conflict between two symmetrically powerful kingdoms of light and darkness; and of course the traditional Olympian gods, although with a number of obscure religions like the cult of Cybele and the cult of Mithras.  

4.  At the same time, the Catholic Church was becoming formally organized and getting prone to pedantic squabbles.  Trying to work out positions that would harmonize the beliefs of different factions, they would adopt interpretations of different Biblical declarations that had logical implications which were not in the Bible itself.  For example, in order to have damnation be irrevocable but still have a place for the dead to be punished for sins, they invented a third destination, purgatory.

So when we came to Christian poets and storytellers, they had all these different forces to synthesize; the original material in the Bible, the new emphasis on hell and temptation into original sin engineered by the Christians, the pilfering of appealing elements from the cosmological stories offered by heretical religions, and the need to integrate all of this into a coherent picture that was still consistent with Catholic dogma.

People say it is the cradle of *humanity*, not the cradle of civilization.  If any region gets called the "cradle of civilization" it is normally the Middle East.

Africans (sub-saharan) adopted agriculture approximately 5,000 years later than Eurasians (they had to wait until tropical SE Asian domesticated crops were brought back to tropical Africa), adopted iron-working approximately 2,000 years later, and likewise for many other basic technological innovations.  Given that, it's a credit to development programs how well the most advanced African countries are doing.The context of this is that it is specifically a Sachsen-Anhalt teacher's union, and the capital of Sachsen-Anhalt, Madgeburg, has seen four German young women gang-raped by refugees in the last month.  The title make it seems like a national teacher's union.They don't just *give it* to people.  Typically they inject it into the economy by buying back government debt.  So the former bond-owners have the same amount of wealth they had before, but now they own cash (which is valuable for spending) instead of a bond (which is valuable because it gets interest).  So they spend the cash, which increases the demands for things they buy, raising the prices; and if the prices of all goods are going up on average, that's inflation.The taxi medallion system is a hard ceiling on economic activity.  Labor laws increase the cost of doing business; they're more like a tax.  The advantages of lifting a cap are much larger, so they are more obvious to consumers.Employment is controlled (in advanced countries) by the central bank.  Historically, left-wing parties have been more willing to appoint central bankers who are pro-employment, and right-wing parties have been more willing to appoint central bankers who are anti-employment (they prefer to fight inflation).  However, there is some evidence that right-wing central bankers promote employment more when there are right-wing parties in power (because this helps them win elections).  Make sense?

In the middle of a recession, and especially very severe recessions, employment can be helped by additional government deficit spending. The sort of deficit spending left-wingers prefer (mostly increased public works) is probably more effective at this than the right-wing alternative (mostly tax cuts), but the *most* important thing is for one party to have a clear majority, because if there is a divided government then it won't be possible to pass a big stimulus package of either kind.

On the other hand, debt and many other economic measures (like the Gini statistic, which measures how income is spread across the economic spectrum from poorest to richest) really are affected by different political programs.  For example, one reason there is so much college debt and mortgage debt is that the federal government aids the middle class by subsidizing both kinds of debt, making it cheap to borrow a lot of money; that encourage people to borrow more than they would otherwise, of course (which is the goal).  But if the government decided to flip around and raise taxes in order to pay for students' educations at public expense, then there would be a lot less debt.&gt; Supply and demand? 

Exactly

&gt; If the earth as a whole has an abundance of resources why don't we just manage the resources 

We used to do this.  The problem was that if you measure the value of all sorts of different things - rent, eggs, cars, wages - in some natural resources, like gold, then suddenly when someone finds a big new gold mine your rent drops for no reason, and when the old gold mines run out without any new finds, your rent skyrockets for no reason.  It's still measured in the same amount of gold, but the scarcity of gold changes how easily you can pay it.

&gt; instead of using a money system that pretends there isn't enough for everyone?

Well, there really isn't enough for everyone, so we need to provide as much money as possible (supply, lower its value) that people work harder and produce more goods, without reaching the point that no can produce more goods and, if more people come to them with more orders, they can only raise their prices.  When you reach that point, printing more money just causes inflation.If the feeling you're getting from flexing is the same as the feeling you get from working out, your work outs aren't hard enough.

For a workout to stress the muscle enough to do damage, you want to be tackling a load that is difficult enough for you that you can only do 10 without collapsing.  Then you take a break for a minute and do 10 more (or alternate sets of different exercises).Can you give an example of the kind of chemical reaction you mean? Most chemical reactions end with neutrally-charge particles (or solutions, which means the molar mass would include the weight of protons, neutrons and electrons.  But in practice, you will not have enough significant figures to worry about 1/1836's of the mass... have you learned about significant figures?To be creatures with complicated behaviors, we need to be able to learn how to do things.  To be able to learn how to do things, our body has to have ways to punish us for doing bad things and reward us for doing good things.  The way this normally works is that there is a sort of checklist of "good" things, and whenever one of the good things happens the good will rewards us with some sweet, sweet neurochemicals - euphoria!  We keep doing the good thing to trigger the release of the neurochemical again, and as we acclimate to it we have to do more and more of the good thing. So in essence, our body has a system for making us become addicted to good behavior - except we call this kind of addiction a *habit* or a *skill* instead of an addiction.

However, there are all sort of ways to hijack this reward process.  Sometimes we manage to make trigger molecules that were very rare in ancient times, like sucrose, extremely common. Sometimes we manage to consume neurochemicals that affect the brain directly, like alcohol and narcotics... basically imitating the reward system in one way or another.  Many of these chemicals have physical withdrawal systems that make the addiction harder/more dangerous to beat, but even fairly benign substances can be terribly addictive.The southern tip of Africa was a sparsely inhabited region, populated only by hunter-gatherers, with a temperate climate when the first Dutch settlers arrived (at about the same time as the Pilgrims arrived in Massachusetts).  African agriculture/herding had been slowly spreading south since around 500 AD, but the black agriculturalists didn't reach that far south for another few hundred years.  Settlers (mostly Dutch and French Protestants) moved to the Dutch colony there for the same reason settlers moved to the temperate American colonies... to escape religious conflicts, to get access to farmland... and the population expanded quickly for the same reasons.  Then this initial population of farmers kept spreading beyond the initial settlement in the fertile Cape Town region because the British captured the colony and repeatedly harassed the Dutch farmers, called Boers.  The Boers would pack up their wagons and head north to find somewhere quiet, beyond the reach of the British, to farm, and then twenty years later the British would discover gold or diamonds or something in that region and come conquer it and start harassing the Boers again. Concentration camps were actually invented  by the British as a way to control the Boer population... 

Nigeria, by contrast, was one of the first areas in Africa to practice agriculture and had a very dense population early on in the modern era.  Moreover, the tropical climate simply wasn't healthy for white people, who didn't have genetic adaptations to defend from tropical diseases (and didn't have antibiotics until the 20th century).  The reason Nigerians speak English as a common language is that none of the sub-nationalities would be very happy with the dominance of the language of another nationality.Intuitively, the natural way to measure the progress of a lunar month is at the full moon (maximum illumination), new moon (minimum illumination) and the two half-moons (exactly half of the moon eliminated).  These points can be identified even without any complicated astronomical measuring system, just with the naked eye.  These four points divide a 28-day lunar month into four segments ... which, because of the coincidence that the lunar month has 7x4 days, gives us 7-day weeks.They're all True, but some of them may be misleading.  For example, in the thought experiment, *at the very moment the black people disappeared*, the average income of all post-disapperance Americans would be the average income of all non-black Americans now, which is 20k higher than the current average income.  But it doesn't necessarily mean that post-disappearance, all those incomes would stay exactly where they are...Maybe more football recruits will stop playing football, and then more universities will stop admitting students who don't study. This could be win-win for everyone.We don't pay interest on the federal reserve notes (the money that is printed and that you have in your wallet), we pay interest on the US treasury bonds owned by the Federal Reserve.  The Federal Reverse is, furthermore, part of the US government.  Ultimately the limit on how much the US can borrow from the Federal Reserve is set by the risk of inflation, so paying interest to the Fed is a non-issue: if the Treasury paid less interest to the Fed (or got some kind of rebate), the Fed would just move from buying bonds to selling bonds that much sooner.Every time you start with a number and multiple it by sqrt(-1) four times, you end up back where you started, but first you pass through the opposite of where you started.  Right? This behavior is a lot like the circular motion you see from, say, the minutes-hand on a clock... ever four quarters of an hour it is back where it started, but after two quarters of an hour it is on the opposite side of the clock. So imaginary numbers are useful for tracking circular motion.Or maybe... change the fine to the economic value of a gallon of water. And charge the "fine" to everyone who uses any number of gallons... including farmers.  Then maybe avocado production would drop by 2% and save vastly more water then harassing people about petty shit.I'm not understanding the outrage.  The cops clearly have to drag the idiot by force (you can see the struggle through the doorway) out into the hallway, and then he won't actually stay still until they wrestle him to the ground.

Is there a new generation of teenagers that has been raised under the impression that obeying law enforcement officers is voluntary, and that if you don't want to obey them or the laws they're trying to enforce you are free to brawl with them, flee them, scream at them, or otherwise act like a moron?

No one like to get attention from cops, but the point at which the police are interviewing you is not your opportunity to disagree with them. The judge is interested in your side of the story.  Obey the cops, argue with the judge.  In many cases the court summons will allow you to explain your side of the story, and if you have a *reasonable* story that you can explain in respectful and literate English, they will decline to prosecute on the condition that you do not have any further run-ins with police for about 13 months.  No police officer should *ever* have to drag you *anywhere*, for *any reason*. At the point where you force them to get physical, they have to assume this isn't just a noise complaint anymore, something dangerous is going on and they have to treat you like any other dangerous criminal.Plenty of farmers have junior water rights, or no rights at all.  Ideally the byzantine 19th century water-rights system would be done away with, but even just charging market rates to farmers with who don't have seniority would end the drought.  (You know agriculture has traditionally been 80% of water usage, right?.)  And farmers do not "own" water, water rights are vastly more complex than that.  Clearly they can't own it, since farmers hold the rights to five times more water than actually exists.For some uses, but if you take Taylor expansions of cos(x) and of sin(x) you get something that resembles the expansion of e^x - so then all you need to do is add a scalar of i to sin(x) and you get:

e^ix = cos(x) + isin(x)

...which also gives a famous relationship between e and \u03c0, can you figure it out?  Anyway, this relationship is useful for all sorts of applications.  But the other advantage is that the relationship between the powers of i and the movement of a clock makes it really intuitive for most people *why* this could end up being the case.You're confusing the economic value with the price. Nestle, like many other companies, has arrangements to pay for water that were concluded back when water was plentiful - in Nestle's case, 1998. Many of these agricultural companies pay rates for water based on the tradition of the last fifty years that, as you say, the price of water should be infinitesimal.

But that doesn't mean it has no value. Clearly if it had no value, no one would be upset about the drought, because forgoing water wouldn't hurt anyone.  As it stands, one pound of avocado uses 75 gallons of water (an example).  At the price of $100 per acre-foot (yes, farmers traditionally expect to get so much water for so cheap that they measure water in units equal to 326,000 gallons), that means there is about $0.02 of water in each pound of avocado. Clearly no farmer in his right mind is going to stop growing avocados, no matter how much water they use, if he only has to pay two cents a pound.  Raise the price of water to $1000 per acre-foot, and you're up to around $0.20 of water per pound.  Let the price keep rising until the price is equal to the value, and water-intensive crops will eventually get so expensive that farmers will stop growing them.  Then there's no more drought.Oh no - and what if *they* stopped playing, too? What would the purpose of universities be then?  It all seems too terrible to bear.When they want you to get into the hallway while breaking up your shitty house party? Yes, pretty much&gt; CA would have to pay those people for taking their property

No.  They might want to... that might make it politically easier.  But they don't have to.  Water rights aren't god-given.  They're established by state and federal law.  Just like you don't have to compensate human traffickers when you free "their" prisoners, because it's not legal to own human beings these days, if you change the laws on water rights there is nothing to compensate them for. In fact, the state is starting to chip away at their rights, but hopefully there will be a rational reform of the entire system instead of piecemeal emergency measures.

&gt; LA cannot just unilaterally tells farmers that farmers cannot use their water rights to grow food.

Of course. I wasn't suggesting LA country stage some sort of coup. This kind of reform will have to happen at the state level.

&gt; How could you be a farmer in CA with no water rights?

Typically, you would buy your water from an irrigation district.  Water rights pertain to the right to divert water directly from a water source.So terrible.  I wonder how higher learning will sustain itself without teenagers running around very quickly in the woods.It's a pointlessly broad question.  If he tells me that he's been sent from the future and I need to come with him if I want to live? Then he's probably a nutcase.  But not just this case, but hundreds of other fad cases seem to reveal total ignorance about how the criminal justice system works.  If an officer wants you to get out of your car, you get out of your car... you don't make him wrestle the door open and drag you out.  If an officer wants you to stop, you stop... you don't make a run for it and make him chase you.  It's not Simon Says, there is no realistic question about which of his orders you should follow and which you shouldn't.It's basically the fascist approach to consensus building.  Especially the idea that you surround someone with bodies, so either they agree to effectively be your prisoner, or else they need to trample over someone to escape and you demand even more apologies and concessions.&gt; $10k per acre foot for water?

Last year it was $100 per acre-foot of water.  Now some irrigation districts are charging closer to $1,000.  The drought will end long before it gets to $10k.

You see what people people mean when they say that droughts are man-made, though.  Can you imagine what would have in Colorado if they started selling whatever kind of water reserves you guys have at $100 per acre-foot?


&gt; Did you just compare water rights with slavery?

No, I compared property rights with property rights.  Property rights are granted by state law and cancelled by state law.  You don't seem like the kind of person who deals in subtlety, sorry that I didn't pick an example that was nuanced enough for your exquisite sensibilities.If you have a legitimate noise complaint on your apartment and refuse to talk to the officers because they don't have a warrant, your exercise of your rights isn't going to do anything for you.  The police don't need a search warrant to enter a party if they have any grounds to suspect any illegal activity... and for a student party, there is *always* grounds to suspect underage drinking.

Let's just be clear - the police *do not* need a search warrant when they are called to the scene of an incident.  Their own suspicion of illegal activity is enough. Your urban-legend search warrant BS is just going to get you stuck with a $500 bill for repairing your door on top of a hefty ticket for the noise complaint, which he probably wouldn't even write you if you apologized and turned the music down in the first place. Previously time was organized around monarchs and the year of their reign (so we would say something like "In the first year of the first term of Bill Clinton...")  A few larger chronologies would create long lists of events from multiple chronologies, listing them all together in one chain and giving some fixed references... for example, the Roman historian Livy used "from the foundation of the city [Rome]" as his reference-date.  The *Anno Domini* system became pretty universal in the Christian world because the Christians were trying to set up a unified calendar, and because irregularities in the calendar (like leap years) occur at certain intervals, it's not enough for two cities to agree "this is year seven of the reign of Emperor XYZ", they also had to agree on the fixed number in the calendar-calculating system.  Then it spread over time from 

Other non-Christian cultures adopted that system for pretty much the same reasons they adopted our other systems of measurement... they didn't have any competing system that had greater breadth or stronger universal appeal, and they wanted to use the large amount of historical research that was already presented in that format.It's for the exact same reason *you* thought it was a big deal the first time you heard about it.  The rumor spreads faster than people learn about the reality.When a media outlet that seems perfectly sane and competent when you're happy with the news suddenly seems deranged and extremist when you're not happy with the news, you have to consider the possibility that maybe the problem is the fit between your ideology and reality.&gt; That would be a gift of a case for any attorney. What a joke.

Well, Christmas is coming.  Throw a wild party for teenagers and see what happens!  The perfect gift for that special JD in your life.

&gt; Who said it was a noise complaint?

Look upThe US is vastly larger, so anything you've got in the UK, we probably have five times as much of here, including kooky self-help people.  I've never heard of the three people you mention, but I don't doubt that they make money off of vulnerable people.  There may also be a tacit cultural aspect to this, too - I have probably never hear about those people because I would know that, whatever you did to learn their names, that's not somewhere an educated American would look for a reputable self-help guide.The old idea of American public education is:

1. Every child has a right to a free public education at taxpayer expense

2. All the children in one community or one neighborhood should go to school together.

But this has been breaking apart over the past six decades.  Basically, we started by giving terrible schools more and more money raised from tax payers in other neighborhoods/states, because we thought what made excellent schools excellent was that richer families lived in those neighborhoods and paid more taxes into the local school system.  But at a certain point the money spent per student at terrible schools equalled, then surpassed spending at rich schools, and we realized that the problem was that intelligent, well-behaved, peaceful children from families that value education make it easier for all of their classmates to learn, and slow, undisciplined, violent children from ignorant families make it harder for all their children to learn.

At that point some people began to feel that it was somehow unfair for educated people to try to get their kids into the same public schools as other educated people's kids, so at that point they abandoned half of Principle 2, that children should go to school where they live.  Urban school districts in many places started randomly assigning children to schools all over their city, with the goal of getting educated families' children into all the disaster schools and disruptive children into all the good schools.  The hope was that this would result in better outcome for disadvantaged children... but instead, the major result was that people more and more started taking their kids out of the public school system, because they didn't want them beaten up by illiterates, or whatever.  Right now, 10% of American schoolchildren attend private schools, 4.6% attend a public charter school, and 3% are homeschooled.

At the point where large number of people start pulling their children out of public schools, selfishness kicks in.  Originally, the main impetus for the "school choice" movement was *vouchers*.  The idea was that parents who didn't want to use the public schools would to use whatever amount the government *would have* spent on public education for their child as a rebate on their expensive private school tuition.  If that had been widely permitted, it would have led to an unravelling of public education, since the whole idea of free public schools (or public anything) is for rich people to pay more in taxes to balance out poor people who couldn't afford to pay on their own.  If rich people can take back their contribution and use it to buy something nicer than what local government provides, there won't be money or political support left for a school system that only educates poor children.  -- The original fight over vouchers was mostly won by the people in favor of the American tradition of public schools, but it opened a second front: instead of outright saying that they didn't want to pay tax money for public schools, the supporters put a lot of effort into arguing that the public schools were incompetent for one reason or another, and argued in favor of allowing a new kind of public school that would (a) offer free education to its students but also (b) would get to choose its own students (unlike public schools, which have to educate all the children in a city) and make all of its own decisions about how to run their education program (unlike public schools, which have to obey the local school board and generally bow to political pressure from the public).

The problem with charter schools is that, like private schools would have under the voucher model, they take tax dollars away from the traditional public schools.  Furthermore, teachers' unions don't like them because public schools are unionized and most charter schools are not; the unions see it as an attempt to underpay teachers.  But the fundamental question is, do the charter schools *do a better job educating their students*? And the problem is almost always that the answer is *yes*, the charter-school students do better on tests, *but* the charter schools get the students whose parents care the most about their education (since they need to go through a special process to apply), and they can kick out poor/misbehaved students, so in the end the traditional public schools get stuck with the challenge of educating the worst students and the charter schools educate the most promising students.Follow me, child

and you will hear

of the midnight ride of Paul RevereThink of people dividing into two camps: dummies and connoisseurs.  (For simplicity.) Dummies don't take rating movies very seriously, and they'll give a five to everything they like at all, and will forget to rate anything they don't like.  So the dummies will converge on the ratings site right after they see the movie on opening weekend, and everyone will give it 5 stars.

The connoisseurs, on the other hand, think a lot about which movies are better than other movies, and they are mostly likely to grade them very stingily... saving five stars for the best of the best, and giving even some films they like a lot 3.5, because it is a *good* film, not a great film.  These are also the reviewers who don't give things five stars because they're super excited by it during opening weekend... and they make a point of finding opportunities to see old movies, and ranking them higher.

I give that explanation because it's not just something that happens on Rotten Tomatoes... it happens on *almost all* online rating sites, that huge numbers of highly positive ratings appear right after a new release, with the effect that the most recent releases are nearly always top-ranked. *But* it's also possible that people genuinely think older movies are worse because the production standards were lower.There are differences between learning and evolutionary adaptation.  Learning can destroy natural instincts in a few weeks, or hours.  For example, most people with perfect vision freak out if anything comes near their eye, but everyone with contacts touches their eyes several times a day.  It takes constant practice, but almost any instinct will become weaker in the right environment.

But "fight or flight" is something that is encoded at a very deep level.  It's how animals respond to stressful situation.  This isn't something shared by all humans (major branching 60,000 years ago) or by humans and chimps (branching three million years ago) or even by primates or by mammals.  Whatever kind of dangers an animal might conceivably face in its own special niche, it uses the same neurochemical booster-rockets to zoom into action in dangerous situations.  It would take a long, long time for evolution to wipe out the fight-or-flight reaction in a species, but it would happen if that species saw zero advantage to being hyper-active in dangerous situations.  It's not clear *how* that would happen, though, since presumably a situation that doesn't affect your chances of surviving or of having a family can't be *that* dangerous.

However, more precise manifestations of these instincts can come and go easily.  Different branches of canids have learned not to be afraid of humans over the last 40,000 years, for example.1. A college-wide administrator recycled an email he sent out when he was at a different school, telling students not to wear "offensive" Halloween costumes.  The email was maximally vague, both about what was or wasn't okay, and who had authorized the policy.

2. A bunch of worried students emailed the husband and wife in charge of their residential dormitory, asking for clarifications or expressing frustration or something

3. The wife sent out an email to the residents, saying they had heard lots of worries and that it wasn't a big deal, wear whatever you want but we respectful, Halloween is a holiday for children so try to be carefree about it 

4. Groups of SJWs began following the husband (a Yale professor) in order to surround him and scream at him.  They are demanding apologies for his wife's email and probably lots of other things, too.

That's what was going on, last I heard. If there is more going on since then, I can't help you.I don't think this is the origin of Black Friday, but it is definitely True of *many* businesses that they do most of their business in one season, and that they would be unprofitable without that season, so technically they "run the business at a loss" during those months. This is only True in a technical, accounting sense though.

In business and economics there is an idea called "the margin".  The margin is what happens when you sell *one* more unit.  For example, the *marginal* cost to a restaurant that sells one more burrito is a few cents of groceries... the tortilla, the beans, etc.  If you look at the *margin*, the burrito is extremely profitable, because a five-dollar burrito might only cost fifty cents of ingredients to make.  But the only reason the burrito appears to generate a marginal profit of $4.50 is that the restaurant doesn't hire an extra waitress, an extra busboy, an extra line chef, buy an extra table, just to serve me my one burrito.

In practice, there are *multiple* "margins", so a restaurant won't just buy more groceries during their busiest month: they might also hire more staff, open up the porch, buy more advertising... but however you calculate the *marginal* cost, they will also have a *fixed* cost that never changes.  A restaurant owner might pay a million dollars to buy the land, build the restaurant, get all of the basic equipment in... then he is hypothetically paying a small fraction of that cost every month of the year.

Imagine a business that has fixed costs of $120,000 per year.  That comes out to $10,000 per month.  Maybe for nine months of the year he hires a handful of staff at $5,000 per month, and during those months the business sells $10,000 per month of products.  So if you only look at the *marginal* costs, the business makes $5,000/month, but when you remember to include the *fixed* costs, it looks like the business *loses* $5,000/month.  But remember, the fixed costs are there no matter how little the business sells!  If the owner fired *everyone* for those nine months and sold nothing at all, he would lose *$10,000*/month... the full amount of his fixed costs.  The $10,000 in monthly sales the business makes during its nine bad months add up to $45,000 that go to pay the fixed costs. If he shut down for nine months of the year, then he would have to earn back the *entire* $120,000 in fixed costs (plus all the marginal expenses, like wages) in the three months when the story earns a profit.Probably you are in a media market that covers millions of people.  For some of the people in that media market (like you) these companies are a monopoly, but in other parts of the market, these companies may be forced to compete with others.  In this case the ads aren't aimed at you, but they have no choice but to buy ads that everyone in the media market sees.

Also, are you sure the ads are advertising their rates? Many public utilities are run for the public good and offer services to their clients for the benefit of the clients, rather than for the benefit of the utility.  For example, some utilities offer consultations on how to use gas/energy more efficiently.  Some utilities offer heating aid to the poor during winter months, and would want to advertise their number around now so that eligible families can apply.It's actually quite easy to change your handwriting significantly, but it will still look like "yours".

The main reason is that there are thousands of small, nearly-irrelevant choices that we make when we decide how to draw a shape, or draw two shapes together.  For example, draw a circle on a piece of paper right now.  It's not perfect, of course.  It is wider than it is tall? Taller than it is wide? Did you stop drawing it right before you closed the circle, or did you go a little too far? Is the left side fatter than the right, or vice versa? Are your lines smooth, or do they wobble a little bit? Those are the sort of unconscious "choices" you have when drawing shapes... so when you learn to write, no one will force you to choose one shape over another (because they are mostly irrelevant to reading handwriting), but you will be drawn to some of them for no particular reason and, because you practice writing every day, you end up practicing "your" special mistakes, too, until they become habits that are difficult to break.

Beyond these subtle differences in letters, there are also stylistic differences in how people are *taught* to write letters. Just like there are different fonts for computer scripts, there are different wants to fit together handwritten letters and words.  In some areas, students are taught to make certain letters in ways that are customary locally, but look strange to outsiders.  Students who are taught mostly to use cursive tend to write in a sort of half-cursive when they print their letters, and vice-versa.  These are the sort of changes that are easier to fake or to change with practice, but they are still pretty fixed from person to person.  Children\u2019s handwriting doesn\u2019t look retarded just because children are dim or poorly coordinated; it takes lots and lots of practice to do *anything* with a pencil and paper, especially because a line needs to be drawn quickly and confidently to look \u201cright\u201d, and when you are concentrating on learning to draw something for the first time you draw things slowly and uncertainly.  Trying to write a letter in a way that fixes your habits and substitutes someone else\u2019s habits instead is the exact same way.&gt; It is not the fall that kills you, but the sudden stop at the end. 

This can never be repeated too many times.Eh, I don't really know that it has anything to do with wealth or race, but it could well be.  I just checked Rotten Tomatoes' audience score for *Transformers: Dark of the Moon*, and the audience score was 56% which is too high, but not quite hillbilly high.  "Dummies" was just a name to make the visualizing easier.Ampersand was never a "letter", it was always what is called a "ligature", a combination of two letters that squeezes them into a smaller space, beautifies them, or is just easier to write. Ampersand is the ligature for *Et*, which is how you say "and" in Latin and many Romance languages.  It never stood for a sound the way \u00de stood for *th*.

As for \u00de... it isn't the *only* letter which was once used in England which was later dropped. It was one of the 24 letters in the Futhark (or if you prefer, Fu\u00deark) rune-alphabet, widely used in the Germanic-speaking areas up until the late Middle Ages.  English-speakers started to replace runes with the Latin alphabet as England was Christianized, only keeping the rune-letters that were needed for sounds that don't show up in latin (like \u00de), but over time most literate people, educated on Latin grammar, started using "th" to write the sound, just as the Romans used it to represent the Greek version of \u00de.  As it got less common, people confused \u00de with P, so they started drawing the loop with a sort of upward-tilt, and then they started confusing it with Y.  That confusion probably made it rarer still. The death knell would have been the arrival of printing in the 15th century; at that point it was easier to use "th" or "y" for \u00de rather than to cast lots of special \u00de-font especially for English printers... with the exception of the ligature \u00de^e ! this was actually so common, as a ligature for our English article *the*, that the first English printers apparently thought they couldn't do without it.  Later on, printers made do with y^e and overtime people started pronouncing it as "ye", believing it to be some archaic form of "yours".There is currently $3.1 trillion in *actual currency* in circulation in the USA right now... on top of which, there is another $10 billion or so in dollar-like assets (for example, bank accounts, lines of credits).  $3.1 trillion is 3,100 billions, and that amount has increased by 1,300 billions since 2008.  But the actual amount of money printed is even greater than that! Only 10% of the printing the US does is to add to the money supply... *90%* is just to replace old currency that has gotten worn out from use.

A large, modern economy uses a tremendous amount of currency. The government tries to figure how much currency to print *exactly* in order to maximize economic growth (which is choked off if there is too little money) without leading to pointless inflation (which is what happens when prices go up without tempting anyone to produce more goods to meet that demand).  In the abstract, you can say that the "price" of money is set by supply and demand: if you supply more the price goes down, if you supply less the price goes up.  When the government doesn't supply enough money, people think that owning money is more valuable than using the money to buy goods and services (which is the only reason we have money).  When the government supplies too much, people get more and more worried about how quickly money is losing value and try to spend it as soon as they get it.  But in general the government doesn't control the currency supply by tossing up wads of bills into the air; instead, the simplest tactic is to control the exact amount of its own debt the government owns.  If the government buys $1,000,000,000 in US government debt, the people who used to own that debt now have cash instead, which they move into the economy. If you want to learn more about the precise details of improving the economy by controlling the money supply, you should study macroeconomics.There were certainly Jewish groups who accepted either Jesus or Muhammad as a savior, but it was never *all* of them, and the Jews who became Christian/Muslim, of course, basically stopped being Jews over time.  (You can actually read about this in the New Testament... there were lots of debates among Jesus' followers about whether you had to keep practicing Jewish law in order to be a Christian.  This was a question because originally almost *all* of the Christians were Jews! So of course they were already circumcised, not inclined to eat pork, and so on.  But once there were significant numbers of non-Jewish Christians there were disputes between Christian leaders who wanted the new converts to also start following Jewish customs, and those who said that wasn't necessary.)

So all remaining Jews are Jews who are descended from Jews who didn't fully convert to another religion, whereas those who are descended from Jews who fully converted are generally not counted as Jews.Many words mean whatever you want them to meant, and change over time.  In the period between roughly the 1860s and the 1960s, there were people in America who thought that even though the blacks were no longer free, they could at least be kept below the status of white citizens, and that this separate status should be enforced by any means necessary.  For example, one governor of Louisiana (iirc) said that he would be happy to lynch every black person in the state, if that was what was necessary to maintain white supremacy.  Nasty stuff.  And they were quite serious... and they didn't discriminate when it came to lynchings, either.  When (white) activists from the North came to picket racists organizations or help blacks register to votes, occasionally local white supremacists would just up and murder a few of them.  

Fifty years ago, when people talked about "racists", they meant this kind of thing.  People who didn't put any weight at all on the happiness of blacks in calculating the happiness of the community.  People who wanted blacks to have a legally inferior status to whites.  People who were willing to commit murder to protect that system.

So at that time, being *racist* meant being anti-black in a lot of very fundamental ways.  *Because* people were racists, they opposed reforms to help black people.  Over time, the meaning of racist switched from "being against the basic civil rights that black people demand for their own advantage" to "being against anything that black people demand for their own advantage".  You can see the basic idea... if a racist would dislike a policy because it benefits blacks, then someone who dislikes policies that benefit blacks must be a racist.  The logic is terrible, of course, but in the immediate aftermath of the Civil Rights Act, it might well have been an accurate guess, on average, just because there were so many racists who wanted a return to white supremacy.  (But ultimately in a democracy, *all* groups demand policies that benefit themselves, and most frequently these policies hurt Americans as a whole more than they help, if they help anyone at all.  So it's very normal to like teachers, longshoremen, Armenians, or cattle ranchers just fine, and still oppose that group's demands.)

From that point, as the concept of racism left behind honest-to-god white supremacy and started to focus more on how much you are willing to put black people first in public policy, the concept began to spread again.  The policy debate (like all policy debates) got into the specifics, and that meant that people fighting for pro-black policies defend their demands with claims about the state of the black community, and then their opponents criticized their demands and their claims with different data about the state of the black community.  At this point the idea of "racism" had traveled from the violent defenders of white supremacy, to anyone who was opposed to pro-black policies in general, and now to people who draw attention to any facts about the black community that undermine the rationale of the pro-black policies.  This culminates in the dogma that "there is no such thing as race", and that anyone who tries to look for racial differences is ipso facto a racist.

Does that make it clearer? There is no *difference* between the word/concept "racist" and the intellectual activity of studying the differences between races.  The word "racist" can be used in difference ways, and sometimes it is used to label people who put their own race above other races in evil ways; at other times it can be used to mean "appreciating the differences between the races".There has been very little European immigration to America since immediately after WWII.  Most people who are *currently* fresh off the boat (which is who you would hear the phrase applied to in 2015) are Asian immigrants.  (And they don't actually come via boat, but rather on airplanes, but still: over the Pacific Ocean.) Most other immigrants are arriving via a land route over the southern border.  But when the phrase was coined, it was being used mainly to describe the waves of European immigrants who came through the 19th and the first half of the 20th centuries.People have only understood, in a clear sense, how genetic heredity works since the late 1800s.  There were at that time some political movements that wanted to explore eugenics as a way to improve the human race, and one of the ideas on the table was to encourage people who had bad genes not to have kids.

The main reason why "eugenics" is a dirty word now is that the German Nazi Party was *really* big on eugenics, and like everything else the Nazis did, they attacked the idea with a maximum of cruelty and a minimum of violence.  What gets painted with the Nazi brush is weird... you would get laughed at for saying we should abandon the interstate system because it was modeled on Nazi highways, or that we should abandon our ballistic missiles because they were originally built from Nazi plans with Nazi scientists, but then any time anyone proposes gun control the gun nuts get excited about defending our freedom from Hitler...

That said, there are plenty of eugenic steps we could take that would have a vastly larger effect than zapping away rare genetic diseases. For example, more than half of births are unplanned, so most mothers *are* drinking and *aren't* taking pre-natal vitamins while the baby's neural tube forms.  If people aren't even willing to do that, they aren't going to be happy about *getting rid of* anyone.Biggest problem isn't any one policy, but overall tone-deafness.  A little bit comes out in every single policy, but there's no single smoking gun that is Bernie Sanders' One Terrible Policy.  It's like listening for a foreign accent... how can you tell someone with a faint accent wasn't born here? It's not any one word, it's a clear impression that builds up when you judge him on everything he says: Sander's doesn't understand basic economics.

By the way, I should say I admire him and think that he has carved out a special niche in American politics as a principled outsider.  The problem with outsiders, though, is that they get their special outsider-perspective by reflexively mistrusting authority and listening to all sorts of quacks and crazies.  That makes Sanders a powerful voice on issues that America's political class typical gets wrong... for example, they typically favor the interests of the rich, they get too enthusiastic about foreign military adventures.  But it also means he's not a practical-minded person and - worse - doesn't know how to find advisors who have technical mastery over a subject. 

Secondary issue: all over his policy proposals he is saying he will fix the problems with policy A with a band-aid from policy B. But most of his policies are too far to the left to pass Congress, and his explanation for how he will get them to pass (a massive Congressional majority) is crazy. So almost all of his policies will not pass in their current form, which makes it impossible to say what effect they will have, taken together.

Anyway, let's go through his proposals to give you a taste. Inequality first:

1. He identifies six inequality-themed social problems and says he will solve them without offering any plan for those specific problems. This is a recurring theme: he *identifies problems to solve* rather than offering a policy proposal.  

2. Even in his bullet-point policy proposals, he states For example, he says he will "Stop corporations from sending jobs overseas" and "Make corporations pay their fair share of taxes" without giving any hint as to his plan.  A gigantic traffic light, perhaps?

3. "tax on Wall Street speculators" - I could get behind creative ways to make specific financial tactics that create overall risk, less profitable.  But he seems to want a tax on most financial transactions, suggesting he sees financial markets *as such* as the cause of financial crises, when it is actually when these markets *stop functioning* that you get a crisis.  Making it harder for them to function probably doesn't accomplish anything.

4. Federal minimum wage to $15: this may be the most eccentric thing on his platform.  If you can create a product that people will pay $100 for in an hour, you can earn roughly $100/hr.  If you can create a product that people will pay $50 for in an hour, you can earn roughly $50/hr.  The people who are most vulnerable and need the most help from the Federal government are people who *cannot typically produce $15 in revenue per hour*.  They don't have the skills or the aptitude for really productive roles.  If this were actually passed, it screw over millions of workers, who wouldn't have jobs anymore.  It makes far more sense to help workers by letting someone pay them $10/hr for the work they do, and then giving them the equivalent of an additional $5/hr in Federal benefits.

5. Put 13 million Americans back to work; I'm wobbly on this. The problem is that the time for large Federal infrastructure projects is economic recessions.  We could have used this five years ago, for sure, but politically it wasn't possible. I like that he has the guts for big infrastructure projects, but he's a stopped clock on this one.

6. Reversing trade policies: this is bad.  Trade doesn't cause wage losses, and the job losses it causes are temporary (while both sides rearrange their economic activity to cater to the other country's strengths and weaknesses).  Just because a specific job at a sock-factory in Georgia was lost to China 20 years ago doesn't mean that there is one fewer job in the American economy right now because we import socks, and it doesn't mean we would get that sock-factory or that job back if stopped importing socks.  Overall, abandoning international trade to raise wages would be like deciding you won't buy sandwiches from stores because you want to give your kid a steady job making your sandwiches.  That might be good for him when he's 12, but if you keep it up then eventually he'll be 32, making crappy sandwiches for his parents.

7. Youth jobs.  This policy is too vague to say anything specific, but it's important to realize that young people (who typically have the fewest skills) are the worst hit by minimum wage laws.  He and his advisors don't see any incongruity is saying that *both* lack of jobs for youth *and* the low minimum wage are both huge problems.  People who understand economics understand trade-offs; you have to decide what you care most about.

8. Paycheck Fairness: the "Women earn 78 cents" has been so widely and frequently debunked that mentioning it, let alone supporting legislation to "correct" it, is not a good sign.

9. Free tuition.  As with many of his policies, this doesn't seem in touch with political reality.  Public university tuition is a mess because states can't raise enough taxes to pay for them.  If people won't vote for sufficiently high taxes at the state level to make tuition free, why will they support making it free at the federal level? This certainly isn't the only "How will he pay for that?" policy, but it sticks out because he doesn't seem to realize the problem was *originally* budgetary, so saying "We'll just make it free" doesn't actually address the problem. 

I'll stop there, I doubt you read all of this.  These are all funky policies.  Many of them I would be open-minded about if a Dem proposed 8 straightforward economic policies and then proposed 2 eccentric ones with an acknowledgement that they were a little out-there and an explanation/justification of their position.  But when almost all of his policies are off-base in this way, he just looks naive.&gt; Why can't a UI just "apply" for citizenship?

It's sort of like asking "Why can't someone who stole a car apply for ownership of it?" Once you get to the point where there is no chance of getting the car back from him, yes, it might seem like it would make sense throw in the towel and say "fine, take the car, I hope you enjoy it" instead of forcing him to take it to a chop-shop and sell it for parts.  Buttttttt the problem is, if you do that, then other people of low morals will say "Oh damn, if I get away with stealing a car, I don't have to worry about getting caught or getting rid of it, I can just apply for ownership!" And so then you get even more people stealing cars. Eventually people stop saving up money to buy cars, and go directly to stealing them instead.

Same deal with illegal immigration.  One illegal immigrant is less of a problem if you give him amnesty and documents.  But if you give that one amnesty, nine more come in, saying "Oh it's cool, once we're in they'll forgive us, no one really cares."  And that is not only unfair to the people who patiently wait in line for a visa to immigrate legally, but at a certain point more and more people stop respecting the legal immigration process and start coming illegally.In general, most products aren't under patent.  Anyone can make a shampoo or cereal with a certain chemical formula.  The "brand name" factory puts a lot more money both into research, trying to make a product that works slightly better than everyone else's, and advertising.  But there are other factories that produce almost the same thing with no research or advertising, and they sell their unbranded products to *any* company that wants to offer their own generic shampoo, cereal, whatever.

A store like CVS wants to offer both a brand-name and a generic product so that customers who are more worried about getting a low-quality product can spend more on the brand name, and the customers who are cheap can save by buying generic. Offering these kinds of choices is good for the store (just like a store that sells both Coke and Pepsi can sell more soda, since there are some people who don't really like one of the two brands).  But once CVS had decided to sell generic cereal, they want to let people know that they aren't just offering some sketchy bogus product: a huge corporation has checked out on these factories producing the generic goods, likes the quality, and will refund your money if you aren't happy.Thanks for taking the time to read it.  I want to emphasize that no specific point on Sander's platform that I mentioned is "wrong". You could have an interesting debate about any one of them.  But all of them (and many others that I didn't mention) taken together give the impression he doesn't have a particularly firm grasp of basic economic concepts.Right, people with education visas are another source of people who we couldn't possibly expect to play by the rules we set if we started letting anyone who comes, stay.

(BTW, technically what you want to apply for after studying here is residency, not citizenship... but close enough.)Exactly. It's really weird.  Do you think they intentionally pilfered the *worst* elements of history's *worst* leftist experiment, or did they independently and ignorantly come up with the exact same nonsense?Sad? When you teach people to solve their problems with necklacing, you shouldn't be surprised when they end up necklacing people *you* care about.But if the whole *point* was to capture what the officers guessed the race of the driver to be before having any hard data, then what's the problem? The data-gathering procedure is premised on the assumption that the officers don't always correctly guess someone's race!  Simply posting a dozen pictures of cases where they didn't have any idea of the dude's race when they pulled him over doesn't tell us anything.You seem to be assuming that nature designed us to be satisfied. But it really designed us to survive and reproduce, and that means that it needs to find ways to get us to exert energy to overcome difficult situations.  Think of hunger, for example.  Why is hunger painful? Why is skipping a meal unpleasant? Why is dieting so hard? It seems that our ancestors *must* have been much hungrier, much more often, than we are... so why not let us be satisfied with hunger? Well, the fact that our ancestors spent so much time hungry is the *reason* we need to be motivated with pain and pleasure to fight back against hunger... it was dangerous to us, long ago.

Likewise with social anxiety.  Interacting with other humans is *risky*.  In chimpanzee troops, fights within a group or between groups can change the status of a chimp and seriously affect its wellbeing. To be successful, chimps need to always be worried about maintaining strong relationships with other chimps.  And if their relationships go south, and the poor chimp is mistreated, do they forget it and say "screw you, I'm fine by myself?" No, they get even more stressed out and spend even more time trying to show obedience to the other chimps, because they don't want to be murdered.

People get social stress because rather than having to know 10 other people or 100 other people, they need to interact with thousands of other people.  People get acute social anxiety because modern life habitually recreates situations that were probably socially dangerous for our ancestors.Eggs need to be packed carefully because they are relatively fragile.  So you can't have a heaping pile of eggs and choose the ones you want to put in a bag, like with apples or cherries.  A dozen used to be a typical unit of account for all sorts of different objects... you would typically buy eggs in dozens, rolls of bread in dozens, etc.  A dozen was such a common unit that people who wanted to buy a *huge* amount of something would often buy a dozen dozens, or 144... and the English word which originally meant "a large number", gross, now is used to mean twelve dozen.  The "dozen" was useful, as others say, because if after buying a dozen of something from a vendor you want to split it up into equal portions, it is easily divided into halves, thirds, quarters, or sixths.  To people who didn't necessarily write a lot or do written arithmetic, this was vastly  more useful than buying things in 10s, 100s, or 1000s... which is how we tend to do things today.

Also, you can go through 12 eggs very quickly if you cook or bake a lot, even for just one or two people -- but if you do use the eggs slowly, they'll actually keep for a very long time.Even if they're making it one direction, that doesn't mean they're being dishonest.  Say you live in a city that is 70% white.  You're on a game show or in a psychology experiment or something, and someone says "Behind this door is a randomly chosen person from your city. What race do you think he is?" If 70% of your neighbors are white you're going to guess "white" 100% of the time, because unless you have some other evidence that makes you suspect the hidden dude might be black, asian, hispanic, whatever, "white" is always the likeliest outcome.

Regardless, the premise is that we don't think the troopers are making stops with accurate knowledge of the race of the person they are stopping.  The question they wanted to investigate was whether they were stopping people because they thought they were black.  It goes against all basic principles of statistics to say "The data conforms to my premise (they don't know who they're stopping) but not to my hypothesis (they mostly only stop white people who they think are hispanic/black) so therefore this proves that my hypothesis is True if we adopt the opposite premise."The movie theaters have a limited number of screens they can schedule movies on.  If a popular movie is selling 100 tickets per showing on five screens, then by adding a sixth screen they can sell more tickets... maybe not 100 per showing, because the five screens they already have probably show at the most popular times, but more tickets than the 0-10 they might be selling for a movie that failed.

Another consideration for the studio is advertising.  Normally you need to keep some sort of advertising going to get anyone to come to see a movie.  Once attendance falls below a certain point, the advertising costs more than the studio is making off the movie each week, but if they save money on advertising even fewer people would see the movie, so it enters a sort of death-spiral.Extremist candidates tend to gain support when the social elite has full solidarity on some important issue, so mainstream parties refuse to change the current policy (since political leaders are part of the social elite).  If the elite position is a good one, that works out just fine, and can even be valuable; but if it is a bad or doubtful one, then popular unhappiness with the policy grows and grows until finally popular unhappiness on just one or two issues, by itself, can provide enough support for an extremist politician who is willing to ignore the elite consensus.

In the case of Donald Trump, the issue in question is illegal immigration.  To simplify: the Republican party is run by an alliance of business owners and other rich people.  They like having cheap labor, so they don't exert any pressure to end illegal immigration.  The Dems have a large Hispanic constituency which feels mostly sympathy to illegal immigrants, so they don't exert any pressure to end illegal immigration.  In this sort of situation where both parties are locked into one policy stance, politicians from both parties can quickly start thinking of any alternatives as eccentric, cruel, hard-hearted, unthinkable, etc.  It's nice to have something that you and your enemies agree on.  The problem is that there has been (a) a large influx of migrants, (b) all from basically the same ethnic group, unlikely previous high-immigration episodes in American history, (c) descending on some areas in sufficiently large numbers to change the character of the community, and (d) pressing down the wage for unskilled labor.

If you add up all the people who are worried about one of B, C, or D, you end up with a big group of people.  Once Trump took a controversial (i.e., unacceptable among the social elite) position on immigration, he received that bloc of voters as a lump.  That made him the frontrunner in the GOP race for a while (and I think he is still mostly the frontrunner, if we accept that Carson is too crazy to actually be elected), which gave him a lot of media attention, which acts like free advertising and helped other potential supporters learn about his platform.  If Trump wins the GOP nomination, then he will receive the support of almost all Republicans, even pro-immigration Republicans, because the two parties are far enough apart on most issues that even a quirky Republican is still more acceptable to GOP voters than a mainstream Democrat. Capital is a name for assets that you use for economic activity... for example, a restaurant's big ovens, a railroad's trains, an internet company's server farms.  *Capitalism* refers both to a society where these kinds of assets dominate economic production (an industrial society, as opposed to an agricultural society where production depends on the fertility of the land) and also to a form of economic organization where whoever owns the capital, makes the decisions about what to do with that capital.

*Socialism* and *communism* are both words invented to describe political parties that wanted to push through ambitious reforms for the good of everyone... that is, for the good of their *society* or *community*.  The two terms was also used to describe what kind of system they would have after the reforms were put into effect: a *socialist* (or *communist*) *society*.   Socialism/communism are traditionally portrayed as the opposite of capitalism because they called for the abolitions of some or all private property, especially private ownership of capital (like, factories and things).  However, neither socialism nor communism means anything very specific, other than that communism is generally taken to be a more extreme/complete form of socialism.  The official line of the international Communist movement was that they were the Communist Party, and that the states they controlled (the USSR, the People's Republic of China, Cuba, North Korea, and others) were socialist republics, but when they solved all their economic problems they would become communist.I'm sure you remember at least some obsolete slang.  Remember the tamogatchi? "All that and a bag of chips"? 

Also, remember that slang is largely generational.  Didn't your grandparents occasionally say things that you think are hilariously outdated?  They are just unconsciously using slang terms that they didn't even realize were slang... they know that you don't understand their slang and thought it was ridiculous, so they probably tried to speak in a more timeless vocabulary around you, but with friends they still probably spoke in exactly the same way in the '50s and the '90s. You are still talking to your friends in the same slang from two decades ago, but today's teens don't use the same slang you did.  They don't understand your references, they don't remember a lot of the technology we used then, or the famous people/events.

But I'm not even sure if you are talking about "slang", as most people understand it. Go-go dancers are the pretty girls who a night club pays to dance there - normally on some kind of elevated platform, or on the stage by the DJ.  There are definitely still go-go dancers in American clubs; what do you call them? Soda pop is a regional term, and people who used "pop" in 1950 are mostly still using "pop" today.  If there has been any change, it is because common terms tends to spread over time as people move and get more media exposure, so "soda" *might* be winning the battle against "pop", but "pop" isn't slang... there are still millions of people who use it.What exactly do you  mean, when you say life has become more expensive?

There has been a lot of *inflation*.  In other words, the prices for everything have gone up.  But if the price for a car was $500, and a working man earned $1/week, that doesn't mean that cars were *cheaper*! On the contrary, they were much more expensive; only the wealthy had cars, at first.  A dollar just meant something different back then.  The reason why there is gradually inflation over time is that the effects of slight inflation are basically painless, but if there is *too little* money in the economy, that caused depressions, unemployment, and failed businesses.  From the beginning of human history to around 1800 AD, most countries used a money system that caused prices to fall as often as often as they rose; that meant that, measured in old currencies, prices sometimes stayed very similar over several centuries, *but* there was also practically no economic progress during that whole time.The geographic tradeoff with the minimum wage is that if it covers a bigger area, there will have to be some areas where it is too high or too low (relative to the productivity of workers in that area) but if covers a smaller area, then it just encourages people to move their business right outside the city limit so they can pay lower wages (which is inefficient).  I can't say specifically for Cuomo's plan that it does or doesn't make sense, but having the minimum wage set at the state level isn't a bad idea.&gt; It's my opinion, having graduated college, that GE requirements waste a lot of time.

Are you asking me to explain to you the value of general education requirements, or explain to you why your opinion doesn't matter that much?  I can say this much without further clarification: *if* you believe that you are the most qualified person to make curriculum choices, you need more general education.

&gt; I didn't need to take psych, or sociology

It's impossible for me to say whether your belief that these courses have no value to you is because you had a poor course, or because you did not learn much from it.  But I don't see any particular reason to generalize from your experience to say that *all* math majors learned nothing in their distribution requirements.

&gt; and other students don't need to take 2 semesters of calculus if they are in the humanities. I was a Math Major, and didn't see the need for them.

Do you think calculus is valuable for anything outside pure mathematics? What about algebra? What about statistics?  On the basis of the large number of things that these tools are useful for, (i) do you want to live in a nation controlled by voters who have no understanding of calculus, algebra, and statistics? (ii) do you trust yourself to make a list of areas that these skills *cannot* be useful for?

&gt; (making sure people at least have basic writing skills and do the average adult math)

How do you do that, exactly?  And what counts as "basic"?  If you mean the ability to write one or two sentences, then you simply don't see as much value in written expression skills as most people do.  But if you think that you can improve these skills significantly without testing them in different domains with a great deal of effort, you don't have a good sense of how hard it is to acquire these "basic" skills.

&gt; But in that mindset, could schools review their General Requirements to the point where the average student is only attending school for 3-4 years, instead of the usual 4 and more recently increasing 5 years?

As you say, five years is getting to be more and more usual - not because students are arriving at college with some unquenchable passion for knowledge that can't be satisfied in less than five years, but because they arrive without even the basic reading, writing and arithmetic skills they ought to have learned in high school!  The current problem with American college is not, sadly, that the colleges force their graduates to learn too much, but that they are being swamped by ignorance and let them graduate knowing too little.

&gt; ... those students would have incurred 75% of the debt they would have otherwise, while still being prepared for the "real world". 

If you believe that you arrived at college already able to read, write, analyze, and calculate at the adult level, there is already a well-established system for high school students to take basic classes (like American History, European History, English Literature, foreign languages, Biology, Chemistry, Physics, Calculus, and many other subjects besides) at a level that is equivalent to the difficulty of, say, a community college course.  The majority of universities will let you use passing grades in these courses to finish college in three or 3.5 years.  If you weren't sufficiently prepared at 18 to have passed the minimum number of college-level courses, you can hardly blame your college for wanting to continue to teach you these skills at the next phase in your education.Polygamy was very common throughout the world (either in the form of multiple wives, or the form of one wife and multiple concubines), but it was basically unheard of in ancient European cultures.  (It wasn\u2019t uncommon for men to have extramarital romantic liaisons, but with women who were more like mistresses or prostitutes than concubines.) It\u2019s not clear exactly why, but it seems part of it is the more egalitarian culture these societies had in their early days, such that every man had a plot of land, served in the army, and married a girl when he was secure.  You can\u2019t have men with many wives without having many men with *no* wives, and this is best suited to an economic situation where some people are wealthy and most are servants.  In Old-Testament-style herding cultures, for example, a big chief might have enough sheep, cattle, and camels to support four wives and thirteen children, whereas men at the bottom of the totempole with zero sheep, zero cows, and zero camels can support zero wives and zero children.

As Greek and Roman culture became more unequal an aristocracy did develop, but they still were only allowed one wife (now with the additional restriction that they could only have marry an *aristocratic* woman).  With monogamy so deeply ingrained, emperors who went to unheard-of excesses of personal self-indulgence still tended to marry one woman at a time.  Christianity had a hostility towards sex even from early days and there was no way Christians, once they became a large presence in the Greco-Roman world, were going to attract the contempt of their neighbors by defending Biblical polygamy.  In the early 1500s, when the early Protestant reformers were revisiting *all* Christian rules/practices which lacked Biblical sanction, the reformers did *consider* permitting polygamy (on exactly the grounds you suggest, that it is praised frequently in the Bible and never banned), and at a certain point they were pro-polygamy while they were still very anti-divorce, and one Protestant prince *did* take a second wife.  However, the backlash to this was so severe that the reformers recognized the unpopularity of polygamy and stopped suggesting it be brought back (although it has recurred in heretical sects, most famously Mormonism).Some behavioral traits are based on neurochemistry, and these are fairly easy to breed.  For example, pit bulls are famously ready to lunge at anyone at a moment's notice; but this is probably not a tendency to a particular lunge-attack *behavior*, but a result of a generally higher level of *aggression*, which is regulated by testosterone... the same hormone that *also* gives the pit bulls their brawny musculature.

Some traits may be relatively strong versions of traits observed in other social animals.  For example, it seems crazy that collies and other sheepdogs try to "herd" human beings, even if they've never been near a farm in their life - but they aren't actually *herding*, they're reacting negatively to a member of the pack that isn't in the same location as other members of the pack.  This is a very complex behavior, but if you grant that it can be expressed in wolves, there are probably genes that express it more strongly in some wolves and more weakly in others.Language doesn't actually tend to change at the exact same rate each decade - it may change at the same rate, on average, over thousands of years, but frequently the change is concentrated in a few very short periods.  It's similar to the concept called "punctuated equilibrium" in biological evolution - things stay the same for generations because different forces pushing the language different ways are balanced, but then once change that gets established upsets the balance and causes a cascade of changes.

So you are absolutely right that Chaucer is more different from Shakespeare than Shakespeare from Chaucer; Chaucer lived right before the "Great Vowel Shift".  In English, A E I O U were originally pronounced as follows: the word *bite* pronounced as *beet*, *out* as *oot*, *meet* as *mate*, *boot* as *boat*, *mate* as *mat*.  This didn't happen simultaneously - as each vowel changed, it became too similar to its neighbors which prompted a second round of changes.  There was also a loss of lots of terminal endings, which led to the end of lots of declensions and a simplifying (from our point of view, at least) of English grammar as a result, so no more "Seest Dick runneth. Runnest, Dick, runnest!"

Nonetheless there are lots of differences between Faulkner and Shakespeare, and similarities between Chaucer and Shakespeare, that are papered over by the similarity of the spelling.  Spelling has barely changed since 1600, and changed constantly between 1350 and 1600.The assets weren't liquid.  It's like if you invest $100,000 in a small business you want to start, in some sense you're "worth" $100,000, but if your friend comes to you and asks for a loan of $5,000, you just don't have the money -- even if you've spent $100,000 setting it up, you only get that money back by earning a profit each year, and to get it sooner you need find someone who wants to buy your business.  You have *assets*, but you don't have *money*; your assets aren't *liquid*.

The banks' assets were slightly easier to sell than your one-man cupcake bakery (or whatever) would be, but they weren't *especially* easy to sell, and - what's worse - since all the banks were getting into trouble at the same time, they would have to sell these assets at the exact same time all the other banks wanted to do the same, which would make the assets cheap and worsen the crisis.  So imagine you are feverishly looking for someone to buy your cupcake business and you realize there are four other cupcake bakers in *the same town* who are *also* looking to sell their bakeries... now you know you're screwed.This question is posted every week or two.  This is what I typed last time:

&gt; 2% of Americans are men who have sex with men. 60% of HIV infections are men who have sex with men. If you were only getting blood from men who have sex with men, each donation is 30 times as likely to be infected with HIV, so you would need to use a much more sensitive test to detect the HIV in gay men's blood. Using more sensitive tests has problems; typically they are more expensive, slower, and have more False positives. If the Red Cross used a test that would be appropriate for gay men on all of their blood, they would probably end up throwing out more False positives on straight people's blood than the gay men donated to begin with. It's easier just not to take blood from gay men (and from IV drug users, another high-risk category).

&gt; (Now, why do gay men have higher HIV infection rates? More partners, more partners who are strangers, anal sex acts as a better vector for transmission, and the infected partner is equally capable of infecting future partners.)Basically your question breaks down into two questions: 

1. Why have Eurasian societies always been more developed than sub-saharan African countries? 

2. Among Eurasian countries, why did Western countries make the technological breakthrough into the so-called "modern world" first?

The Eurasia vs. Africa issue is pretty clear.  Eurasia is very large, continuously traversable, and runs East-West.  That meant that Eurasia *as a whole* had more species in it and there more plants and animals that could be domesticated there; then, once they were domesticated, they could bring that crop/livestock into neighboring regions with the same climate, all the way from Portugal to Japan.

Once we have civilizations developing all over Europe on the basis of agriculture, we get growing levels of specialization, concentration of population in towns and cities, and interconnection of different urban centers by trade routes.  That interconnection allowed ideas and technologies, as well as trade goods, to easily spread across Eurasia.  Africa and the Americas started the transition to agriculture thousands of years later, so there was no way they were going to modernize first.  

Within Eurasia, why did Europe zoom up to the finish line from an unpromising starting position? The things other people are saying about having more farmland are the purest kind of nonsense imaginable; there is great farmland all over Eurasia and, for that matter, in tropical regions too.  The most popular theories currently stress the fact that Europe was never really unified politically after 400AD.  The crack-up of the Roman Empire that lead to the Dark Ages was a disaster at the time, but the decentralized feudal world that it created apparently had a ton of advantages in the long run.  Rulers focused their resources on building up their tiny duchies rather than building huge palaces in the capital, a thousand miles away from the farms the tax money came from; any innovator with unpopular ideas could always find an enemy of his enemies who wanted to protect him; there was no supreme power who could wrest control over trade and development away from the merchant classes.

But no one *really* knows for certain.

&gt; I KNOW it's not because of race, I firmly believe that all races are equal. 

It's not *impossible*.  You might *know* it's not because of race, but it's not the ALL CAPS kind of certainty.  Eurasians split off from the other Africans around 70,000 years ago and, except for Ethiopia, there was very little population transfer between Eurasia and other population centers for most of the history of civilization.  70,000 years is short in geological time but populations can be extremely stressed by new environments, and not only was Eurasia a *very* new environment for the African colonists, but *nothing* has been newer than civilization.  For example, cows were domesticated 10,000 years ago; lactase persistence, which allows Europeans to drink milk, first appeared around 7,000 years ago (give or take); in 2015 80% of people with primarily European ancestry have the gene and practically no one with sub-saharan or SE Asian ancestry does.  We really have no idea of what the extent of the genetic differences between different races is.No one celebrated Hanukkah very seriously until the last fifty years.  It was primarily a cultural holiday that gained popularity so that Jews could have a not-Christmas-Christmas during the winter.  Conversely, the central Jewish holiday is Passover, and every year there is a whole smorgasbord of Christian observances in the Passover season, leading up to Easter.

For all the rest - at a very early point in Christian history, when the Christians were still primarily a minor Jewish cult, the Christian leaders had an argument about what, exactly to do with non-Jewish converts to Christianity... did they have to be Jews before they could become Christians? Did they need to be circumcised, did they need to keep kosher, did they need to mimic Jewish tradition in all other respects? The reaction of the Christian leaders to this challenge was to draw a very firm line between *Jewish culture* and *divine law*.  No one had to conform to Jewish culture to obey the laws that God had set down for all human beings, and Christian leaders started to deliberately break Jewish law in order to socialize with the people they wanted to convert more easily.Conservative means right-wing and, usually, a supporter of the Republican Party.  Conservatives like things "the way they used to be", like maybe around 1890.  They tend to be conservative on social issues, generally lean towards free markets and free trade, and are rabidly anti-tax (or as some would say, anti-poor).  Conservatives tend to be militaristic and those who aren't are typically isolationists for reasons of national self-interest rather than humanitarian scruples.

Liberals are pro-liberty in the sense both of "freedom from oppression" and "freedom from personal interference"; they are usually Democratic.  Liberals like the status quo or want to further expand freedom to do whatever you feel like on a large number of social issues.  They can go either way on free markets and free trade (with special sympathies for unions), although there are very few Americans who are strong proponents of nationalization/state-run industries.  If liberals don't want to raise taxes, it is because of economic or political expediency; in principle they aren't committed to any particular level of taxation but are always happy to have more funds for public works, public education, welfare programs, and other government interventions.  Liberals generally aren't as militaristic as conservatives but there are enough who are, or are at least willing to use the military to solve international problems when it's convenient, to keep bipartisan support for the military very high; the Democrats who are pacifists tend to be so on humanitarian grounds and still think the US should play a role in making the world a better place.

The hostility is mostly an illusion.  On a personal level conservatives and liberals get along just fine.  Indeed, given the political differences between older and younger Americans and between men and women, there are a good chunk of liberal children with conservative parents and conservative men married to liberal women.  But different sorts of choices (like where to live, what career to pursue, what church to join, what hobbies to explore) ends up sorting liberals and conservatives into echo chambers where most liberals hear only liberal views and most conservatives only hear conservative views.  That creates the impression that the other side must be some loony fringe, like the people who believe in UFOs... when in fact the country is practically evenly divided.1. The claims that Jesus had a wife nearly always start from the premise that *it is extremely unlikely that a Jewish religious teacher would not have a wife*. To assert that *some* Essenes had wives doesn't change the fact that they were an ascetic order with negative attitudes towards sex and marriage.

2. It's really *not* clear... and the fact that you linked me to a page that does not have a *single word in Greek* suggests you may not be familiar with the issues?  Aramaic and Hebrew did not have words for "cousin" as distinct from brother.  Much of the NT was clearly originally in Aramaic (for example, puns that are lost in Greek but obvious in Aramaic).  Whatever Aramaic accounts were translated into Greek would have had to translate the non-specific Aramaic word for brother/cousin into the non-specific Greek word.  At least two people identified as *adelphoi* of Jesus are identified as the children of his aunt and uncle in different passages of the NT.  It's really impossible to know at this point.&gt;However you're not saying that one race is better than the other when it comes to things such as intelligence right?

You mean genetic determinants of intelligence? No, I'm not.  I'm saying that you seem to think it is, metaphysically speaking, *impossible*, whereas in fact it's very clear that the most obvious differences in intelligence.... say, between an octopus and a sea slug... are caused by differences in their genome.  Any particular observable, statistical difference you pick out between races *could* be genetic, and in a large number of cases (mostly related to diseases) we already know that they *are* genetic. The reason we don't explain intelligence gaps that way is because we have so many other explanations to choose from.Right, but it's not like there were brigades of infantrymen being shipped directly from the Western Front to Ireland to fight in the "war".  It was a conflict between Ireland's police force and an outlawed secessionist organization that declared independence after winning local elections.Right, and the political/social/cultural/religious recognition of a bond between a man and a woman is what they were calling *marriage*.  And recognition of that bond between one man and multiple women is what OP calls *polygamy*.  And I'm not sure that it's actually True that monogamous elites keep up with polygamous elites; certainly it's False at the very top, it seems unlikely in the top 10%, and it's clearly falsified by the historically high rates of marriage for non-elite men in monogamous societies.

&gt; just like most other cultures

Actually no, 70% of cultures are polygamousOkay, that's fair.  But even then, all you can really say is that Eurasia has lots of farmland that is great *for the crops that can be domesticated in Eurasia*.  North America and Southern Africa have great farmland for Eurasian crops that were not historically available to the American Indians and the San hunter-gatherers. And Southeast Asia has great crops for tropical African farmland, they just didn't reach Africa until 9,000 years after the first cities were founded in the Middle East.I think this may be something like an optative/jussive expression.  You know how at coronations people say "Long live the king!" and in church people say "God be with you" and when after mentioning a tragedy you say "Heaven forbid that should happen here", and so on? Do you notice that in an indicative statement it would be "The king lives...", "God is with...", "Heaven forbids..."?  So it sounds sort of like we are given orders about how long the king should live, but it's actually a way of speaking that originally used the *subjunctive* mood to express wishes and hopes.  However, in the second-person there is no difference now between the conjugation for subjunctive and imperative, so *grammatically* we are inclined to think of it as an imperative, even though *semantically* I think everyone understands that it is a wish (and actually has a sort of submissive feel, since it is used so often by inferiors to superiors).Most change, at least when you look at tiny scales, is linear.  If you change the cause, X, by a small amount, you change the outcome, Y, by some amount.  If you change X by a smaller amount, Y changes even less.  If you change X just a tiny amount, Y changes still less.  Basically as you make tinier and tinier changes in the cause, you get tinier changes in the effect, leveling off towards nothing.

But some changes aren't like that.  Let's say you flip a light switch a million times: result, the light is off.  Let's say you try flipping the light switch two million times: result, the light is off.  But now let's experiment with flipping the switch 1,999,999 times, 1,999,998 times... every time we make a small change, we get the opposite result.  Light on, light off, light on... there is no linear convergence towards the same result.  After N flips, you are always a whisker away from getting the opposite result if you had switched the light one more time or one fewer.

Some natural systems have this property of having tipping-points everywhere, where a small change in X can actually produce a *huge* change in Y, even on very small scales.  These are called non-linear (because you can't draw a line estimating the impact of a small change) or chaotic (because you can't predict what is going to happen) phenomena.

The butterfly effect is the hypothesis that a tiny cause (like a butterfly flapping it's wings) could have huge effects if natural systems are typically non-linear everywhere.  It figures in thought experiments about time-travel because writers often imagine that an improbably small change has a large effect.You're welcome.  I'm sure a scholar of Old English or Middle English could easily tell you more.No, it's a public institution that, for moronic historical reasons, is partially run presidential appointees and partially run by private-sector appointees.  The president appoints seven Governors to the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (one of whom is the Chairman of the Board).  Then there are twelve regional Federal Reserve Banks; local bank presidents elect three Directors to the Board of each of these banks, local business leaders elect three more Directors, and the last three tend to be in the non-profit sector or academia, chosen I-know-not-how.  These nine Directors elect a President for their own local Federal Reserve Bank; there are twelve bank Presidents total.

(Byzantine, isn't it?) 

The real action comes from the Federal Open Market Committee, which has twelve members: all seven Governors of the Fed, the President of the New York Fed (always) and four other Presidents (rotating through the other eleven banks with one-year terms).  Now, in theory the seven Governors who are appointed by the President can always outvote the five Presidents who are appointed, ultimately, by local banking and business interests in their region.  But in practice ...

This system was *originally* designed for a period when the big conflicts were regional: Midwestern farmers, bankers, industrialists, workers, doctors and whatever else all had one set of interests and New York etc etc etc all had another set of interests, and populists wanted a system that would give equal weight to the interests of different regions.  But over time we've gotten to the point where American workers in all regions have one set of interests, and American capitalists in all regions and sectors have another, and this semi-feudal system (which will never be abolished because it *does* still give disproportionate influence to under-populated cow states) just serves to push Federal Reserve policy to the right.You're talking about the people who think their dogs are differently-furred human beings?It's a damn dog.  The ASPCA was a great innovation for the 1800s, but at the point where we are prosecuting people for taping up their traps, the pendulum has swung too far.  So maybe the dog dies, so what? Being a fucking moron isn't a crime.  A dog is not a baby.  If you are feeding your dog a diet that is dangerous, if you are muzzling your dog in a way that is dangerous, if you are keeping your dog in a space that is dangerous hot or cold or wet or dry, you may be a moron but it's not like the public has some duty to swoop in and safeguard the "interests" of the dog.Animal cruelty is one bad things, and animal fetishism is another.  A dog is a dog.  The only reason we eat pigs and not dogs is that they don't taste good.  This is getting to be a few steps away from arresting people who forget to water their plants.&gt; When the national average is fat as shit, don't use that relative standard. 

Exactly.  This is why past a certain point, contempt is not just natural, but serves a useful purpose.  When people sink into addictions and vices (be it alcoholism, narcotics, or whatever else) they and their friends tend to drag one another deeper into the addiction together.  And they tend to self-segregate, with people who avoid the addiction leaving the social group and people who are eager and willing swapping in to replace them.  Your natural defense against acting like an idiot is that your friends and family will set an example for you, make their attitudes towards idiots clear, and lightly tease you if you're being dumb.  But when all of you are being idiots together as though idiocy were a team sport, you float off into outer space together.
I'm sorry you're at a stage where you are feeling insecure.  I hope you know that most people admire someone who is on the road to recovery far more than they would admire someone who never got fat in the first place.  

But you should also recognize that part of your dissatisfaction with your progress comes from how quickly you are making progress.  Like you say, your self-esteem has skyrocketed - that's what you would expect.  And I'm sure your energy has skyrocketed, too.  Can you imagine walking around all day, every day, with an 80lb backpack on? I'll bet you aren't even sure whether you could do it.  Your self-defense mechanisms tried to convince you, when you were super-obese, that you weren't *that* fat, and you tricked yourself into partially believing it.  Now you have more realistic views, so you have gone from thinking "I'm not *that* fat" to "I'm still pretty fat"... negative progress! (I'm sure you understand this is a metaphor and you probably think many different things about your weight at different times.)  But even though this doesn't feel great, this realistic perspective on reality is one of the most valuable things you've gained - your self-deception was undoubtedly a heavier burden to carry around  with you all day than the 80 lbs of mere mass.I don't think that's actually True.  The Framingham study shows that fat spreads like an infectious disease, and the more closely connected you are to someone who becomes obese, the more likely you are to "catch" it from them.  The reading of this result that is most compatible with other studies (which rule out crackpot ideas like, eg, obesity is caused by an unidentifiable virus) is that social stigma and social acceptance are the strongest factors controlling obesity, and that once people no longer feel ashamed, *bam*.

Psych 101 doesn't teach anything about fat-shaming *specifically*, which I hope you know.  It teaches three relevant things:

1.  Social proof is incredibly powerful.  I'm sure you've seen videos of experimental accomplices standing backwards in elevators, causing their unwitting victims to turn around as well.  You assume that it makes sense to act like other people.  What everyone does can't be bad, and what everyone despises can't be good.

2.  Addiction can't be broken incrementally with half-measures.  It requires a large leap and a simultaneous change in many different aspects of one's lifestyle.  

3.  This is probably what you are referring to - positive reinforcement is *vastly* more important than negative reinforcement.  *This refers to behaviors, not end results*.  Praising a kid for solving a math problem correctly works better than chiding him for making a mistake.  But! *This does not imply that praising him for being incompetent at math, in general, works better than chiding him for being bad at math.*  A mistake is something like having a second piece of pie at dinner.  Being obese isn't a mistake - it's the result of many, many mistakes.A public transportation system (unless London's is run very unusually) is not a profit-maximizing business that sets its policies in order to get the maximum return on investment.  Your right to privacy in the subway is approximately the same as right to privacy on a public sidewalk or in a public park.  You can't vote down unpleasant pamphleteering in a subway station anymore than you can vote it down on a crowded sidewalk.And moreover, who cares if it affects them personally? Most political speech is driven more by altruism than selfishness... in many cases the *most* selfish thing to do is not waste time on public issues at all.And I am telling you that a dog is not so different from a plant.  Intentionally harming your plant through stupidity isn't as bad as intentionally harming your dog through stupidity, because dogs have central nervous systems.  But prosecuting the owner for managing either a dog or a plant in a risky way, in the absence of intentional sadism, is simply authoritarian.There are lots of things that other people do that I wouldn't do.  That doesn't make them crimes.  If I had time to waste I could spend the rest of the day watching YouTube videos of morons doing moronic things and, generally, damaging their personal possessions in the process. None of them should have to show up in court for stupidity.

&gt; But hey not like dogs feel pain right?

Animal pain really isn't a matter of public concern unless it takes callousness to the level of sadism. That's why they are called animal *cruelty* laws, not animal comfort laws.  And unless you have never used a medical product that was tested on a mammal (not to mention being a cotton-loving, tofu-munching vegan) you really can't pretend that you disagree.Sure, and cats as well, but plenty of cultures also eat rodents, insects, amphibians, etc.  My understanding was that dog and cat are unusual flavors, like rabbit or elk, and are delicacies because they are unusual more than because they are tasty.  People who say they "like elk" are still going to eat pork sausage every week and elk sausage a few times a year, because elk sausage tastes weird.I'm sorry so many people have downvoted you, because your comment really does fall under "there are no stupid questions", and it's good that you posted it.

Terrorism is not just random violence - it is a political tactic of accomplishing one's ends by inspiring terror in opponents and bystanders.  (It originally referred to the entirely legal executions carried out after the French Revolution, the goal of which was openly stated: to inspire terror in the hearts of people who were corrupt or treasonous, and lead them to become virtuous because the alternative was too horrifying to think about.)  This means that threats and intimidation which they terrorists never intended to carry out are not *just* bluffs - they successfully help create the atmosphere of uncertainty, anxiety and terror that is the goal of a terrorist campaign.

Think of terrorists as like the mafia.  Do the mafia need to follow through on all their threats to be the mafia? Do they need to even follow through on 1/100 of their threats? No, not really, because if you terrorize just a few guys no one else wants to mess around.  Once people are scared, you don't even need to make a *specific* threat.  You take their dog for a couple hours, and then bring it back to them unharmed.  You compliment their beautiful family, and don't even have to add "... it would be a shame if anything happened to them." 

So yes, a terrorist threat than you don't actually have the means to carry out is still terrorism.  You aren't allowed to contribute to a campaign of bullying and intimidation without consequences just because you're impotent.As usual, WS said it best:

&gt; The evil that men do lives after them; 

&gt;The good is oft interred with their bones... You know, there is *real* sociology out there.  Don't be scared, when you look out into the wide world of books, to pick one up just because it was written by a sociologistIt's just how human beings are wired.  78% of American murder victims were male last year.  (And 90% of murderers, as well.) Likewise, with all respect to shibboleths, if he had threatened to rape 16 whites, would specifying a gender really be necessary to clarify his intentions?This study is purely bullshit.  They looked at 26 brain regions, and then tried to find who had all 26 regions as predicted for their sex, and set the upper bound at 8%.

*All 26 regions.* Are these psychologists cynical or just laughably ignorant?

If you assume that a "male" brain regions means that 90% of men have the male version but only 10% of women, and vice-versa, then the chance of a random man having *two* randomly chosen brain regions that are *both* male is less than 90% - specifically, it's 90% of 90% (because even if he has a masculine trait in Region 1, there is still only a 90% chance in the second region), or 81%.  And if you asked how often three randomly chosen brain regions would be all-male, the answer is lower, and four is lower still...

... and what is the chance that *26 different brain regions*, each of which have a 90% change of showing "masculine" traits in a man, are *all* masculine, with no exceptions? 0.90^26 = 0.08 *Eight percent.*

This is the purest form of clickbait bullshit.  You might as well say that no child looks like its parents because the chance of it inheriting 26 different traits from its parents, even if it has a 90% chance of inheriting each of the 26 traits, is still only 8%.  

(To be precise, the number that gives a 0,08 chance of expressing all of 26 different traits is 0,974. Here is how you solve that kind of equation:)

&gt; x^26 = 0.08

&gt; ln(x^26 ) = ln 0.08

&gt; 26lnx = ln 0.08

&gt; ln x = (ln 0.08)/26

&gt; e^lnx = e^({ln0.08}/26)It's even worse than that.  This study is purely an abuse of statistics.  The upper bound they give (8%) implies that a man has a 90.7% chance of having each of the masculine brain characteristics (and vice versa).  All they are saying is that when you raise any probability, no matter how high, to the 26^th power, you get a much lower probability.  Most people learn this in eighth grade, but enough forget, or don't want to remember, to spread idiocy like this.  

And more than merely masculinize/feminizing brain growth, testosterone affects brain function directly.&gt; "With our current technology and tools, we cant find a way that male and female brains are physically different"

No, it's even worse than that.  They are saying something more like "We've found 26 brain regions where, if you look just at that region's physical features, 90% of men have the masculine version and 90% of women have the feminine version.  But if you look at *all 26 regions at the same time*, the chance that any particular person has all 26 regions the same is 90% x 90% x ... = 0.90^26 = 0.08, or 8%."

This is the most misleading way to state results that could be imagined. If 8% of men have a trait and 92% don't, it doesn't look like that trait could be specifically masculine.  But the number of men who have 25, or 24, or 23, or 22, or 21 of these masculine traits will actually be quite high.  Obesity is clearly contagious, by the epidemiological definition of contagion.  It is not a "transmittable" (communicable?) disease in the sense that it is caused by a microbe that moves from host to host.  The conclusion that obesity is contagious is most certainly one endorsed by the study's authors.

&gt; Social Proof - Sorry that doesn't really apply to food consumption.

This is the most ridiculous claim that I have heard in a long time.  What is *more* sensitive to what one's friends are doing than what one is willing to eat?  Maybe clothing choices and accent, but that's about it.

 &gt; Obesity is usually not a cause of negative self valuation but rather a symptom.

That's quite False.  On the contrary, obese people generally underestimate the costs of obesity and the seriousness of their own obesity.  Rationalization and defensive biases are one of the most familiar phenomena in all psychology.  To claim that challenging these biases reinforces a negative self-value is beyond strange.  This is why classing obesity with alcoholism is productive: can you imagine telling an alcoholic's family that having an intervention and explaining how his behavior is hurting himself would be "positive reinforcement of a negative self-value"?Either animal pain is important in the way human pain is, or it isn't.  I could say that one day you'll learn the value of being principled instead of flinging out bullshit to cover your own prejudices... but actually, I doubt you will.  You like your dog, I get it.  Don't tape your dog's jaws shut.  And don't try to justify police action from mere animal pain, as though the officers were trying to stop an assault.And your mental abilities are at about the first grade level (or, charitably, you are sleepy/high/indifferent).  X is not Y doesn't imply that Not-X is Y.  Marsupials aren't primates, that doesn't mean non-marsupials *are* primates.And if you don't use any medical treatments tested on animals or use consumer products made out of animals, then your position is, at least, consistent; which I can respect even if you're wrong.  If you agree that animals are sub-human and animal pain is great when it serves some purpose, but you want the police state to micromanage dog owners to make sure that the level of pain permitted is acceptable to you, then you are just an authoritarian.&gt; Rhyne said the dog was examined by animal control officers and was found to be clean and well-nourished. Authorities did not find any injuries to the dog's muzzle.

Given that there was no permanent damage, I find it very easy to believe.  People are good at identifying necessary consequences of their actions but bad at identifying unlikely but unacceptable risks.  Lots of pet owners do things with their pet that, though well-intentioned, *do* lead to injuries; they certainly aren't cruel, just really stupid.Okay, again, dogs don't have rights.  You may be thinking of human beings, those monkey-ish creatures that walk on two legs and argue on the internet.I haven't deleted any of my comments - it may be hidden because ten or more members of the I-wuv-my-puppy club have downvoted it, but there will be a little note saying "click to show hidden comment".  Try to think a little more before making False accusations.It can be both.  The SJW scientist says "Only 8% of men or women have traits that are strongly identified with men or women in all of the regions we studied." The SJW writer says "Only 8% of men or women have 'masculine' or 'feminine' brain traits!"  The SJW editor decides the headline should be "There are no physical differences between male and female brains!!!!" Then the wild SJWs parrot that headline forever after.A right is a moral value.  If you go to North Korea you can be tortured, beaten, forced to confess to crimes you never imagined, and then summarily executed - but you still have rights, and we know North Korea is a terrible regime because they violate these human rights enthusiastically.  Your dog will never have rights, no matter how much you cuddle with her or pet her, no matter how many tricks you teach her.  It may be that, unless you can convince yourself that your dog loves you, there is no one in the world who loves you - but dogs still do not have rights.  Motorists run over dogs, policemen shoot suspects' dogs, medical researchers vivisect dogs, animal control centers exterminate dogs -- all without consequences or shame, because dogs don't have rights.

It may be that in the future you can be put in jail for letting your dog go outside without socks to keep his widdle pawsies toasty on a cold winter day.  Hopefully not, but maybe.  And even then, dogs would have no rights.We have animal abuse laws to encourage people to be humane.  Even if animal pain has no special significance, someone who decides to break an animals leg just to see a living creature writhe in pain is still a sadist.  No one likes sadists.  The primary justification of the laws is to target people who are cruel, not to protect animal rights or end animal suffering.  (Some animal welfare laws have other purposes as well - preventing the spread of diseases, preventing animal violence, etc.)  It's similar to the laws against child pornography - even if they are not hurting anyone or financing the abuse of children, they are still pedophiles.  We don't want witchhunts to find people with perverse urges who *never* act on these in *any* form, but letting someone practice sadism or pedophilia openly is just begging them to commit crimes against human beings.Okay, so you are arguing on the same side a bunch of people who use "Report" as "Super-Downvote", they report the comment until it get auto-deleted, and you are feeling morally superior about that?  I'm genuinely curious.  Are you proud that these are the people who agree with you? Because if I say X and everyone else who says X wants to silence disagreement, I start to worry.

But while I wait for your answer, here is the comment that your buddies didn't want anyone to see:

&gt; Doing something "humanely" refers to the effect it has on the doer, not on the one who is treated humanely or inhumanely. Again: a dog is not a baby. Treating a dog as a punching bag perverts a human being in one way, treating a dog as a big furry baby perverts a human being in another way.
There are lots of people who are stupid, and lots of people who have stupid days.  In this same thread, I said that causing animals pain was *not always* wrong, so someone else immediately replied saying that I think that causing animals pain was *never* wrong - I do not think that person is *literally* mentally retarded, I just think he or she had a mindfart.

But stupidity is not a crime.And as I've said before, if you eat only tofu, wear only cotton, and only take homeopathic remedies when you're sick, I admire your consistency and dedication to your principles even while I think you are very wrong.  If you, like most people, are comfortable with the huge number of ways in which we openly acknowledge that animals live and die, play and suffer, at the will of and for the benefit of humans, then it's fine to support laws against animal cruelty but mistaken to imagine that these laws can be justified by reference to *the animal's* rights.  When someone makes a counter-argument, and you feel a sting of shame and can't think of any way to respond, that is not what people mean by an "insult".Because we normally *say* letters rather than pronouncing them and write them out as, say, XYZ rather than Ex Why Zee, it isn't hard for variant letter pronunciations to develop and this was especially True for Z, which wasn't in use in Latin during most of the classical period, barely used thereafter.  There is an English spelling primer from 1677 which spells the letter out as Z-E-E", so this was probably a variant circulating for a long time. (There were other, weirder variants, as there were in other European languages.)

It became established in America because Noah Webster liked it, and wrote the immensely popular song "ABCD" to teach children the alphabet, which ends triumphantly with "WX, Y and *Zee*; now I know my AB *Cee*'s, next time won't you sing with *me*?"

Why did Noah Webster like it?  According to his dictionary:

&gt; Z, the last letter of the English Alphabet, is a sibilant articulation, and is merely a vocal S. It bears the same relation to s, as v does to f. With us it has not a compound sound, nor is it a double consonant, as in the Italian and German. It is as simple in its sound as S.

&gt; As a numeral, z stands for 2000, and with a dash over it, z for 2, 000, 000. It is pronounced zee.  

His idea seems to be Eff/Ess are flipped (fee/see) and then voiced (Vee/Zee) to give each letter's partner.  This is a cute idea, but mostly wasted because I don't think most grade-school teachers know much phonology.Cats are felines, dogs are canids.  The ancestor species interacted differently - wolves run in packs, wildcats are solitary and quite territorial.  We can use selective breeding to bring out the precise mix of genetic traits that we found already present when we domesticated the first wildcats and the first dogs, and we can amplify any lucky mutations that have arisen since than, but we can't turn a dog into a cat or a cat into a dog without genetic engineering.Basically, all probabilities are numbers between 0 and 1.  When you multiply a number between 0 and 1 times itself, you get a lower number.  No matter how high the probability is to start with, if you multiply it by itself a sufficient number of times, it will become a very low number.

Asking "what is the probability that at least two people have the same birthday?" is the complement to asking "what is the probability that *no* person in the room has the same birthday as *any* other person in the room?"  In other words, there are only two alternatives; either everyone has a unique birthday that they don't share with anyone else, or some (at least two) people don't have unique birthdays.  Whenever you are asking about the probability of everyone getting the *same* result, there is only one way for that to happen - you need to get the same result N times, were N is the number of people.  The probability multiplied by itself N times will be small if N is large enough; so if N is large enough, the chance of everyone getting the same result is low, and the chance of someone getting a "different" result is high.  (Remember that here, "same" means "has a unique birthday" and "different' means "doesn't have a unique birthday.") 

Now, if you were asking "What is the probability that all 23 people in the room were born on some day *other than* Christmas?", each person only has a 1/365 chance of being born on Christmas, so the answer is (364/365)^23 = 0.939, 93.9%.  To get a 50% chance that *someone* was born on Christmas, you need more like 250 people.  

But here is where the problem throws in a second twist -- you have a growing target.  The chance that the second person was born on the same day as the first person would be 1/365.  But the chance that the third guy was born on the same day as one of the first two is *twice as large*, 2/365.  The chance that the twelfth guy was born on the same day as one of the first eleven is about 3% (11/365) and the chance that the last guy was born on the same day as one of the first 22 is 22/365, about 6%.  Now obviously (364/365)^23 is very different from (343/365)^23 (94% versus 24%) and unsurprisingly when you calculate out a product of 23 factors moving from 365/365 to 343/365, the answer falls somewhere between them.The abstract of the study, published in the New England Journal of Medicine, freely available online:

&gt; The prevalence of obesity has increased substantially over the past 30 years. We performed a quantitative analysis of the nature and extent of the person-to-person spread of obesity as a possible factor contributing to the obesity epidemic.

The conclusion:

&gt; Our study suggests that obesity may spread in social networks in a quantifiable and discernable pattern that depends on the nature of social ties... our observations suggest an important role for a process involving the induction and person-to-person spread of obesity... Network phenomena might be exploited to spread positive health behaviors, in part because people's perceptions of their own risk of illness may depend on the people around them. Smoking- and alcohol-cessation programs and weight-loss interventions that provide peer support \u2014 that is, that modify the person's social network \u2014 are more successful than those that do not. People are connected, and so their health is connected.

From an interview with the authors:

&gt; \u201cIt\u2019s not that obese or non-obese people simply find other similar people to hang out with,\u201d said Christakis, a physician and a professor in Harvard Medical School\u2019s department of health care policy. \u201cRather, there is a direct, causal relationship.\u201d

&gt; \u201cWhat appears to be happening is that a person becoming obese most likely causes a change of norms about what counts as an appropriate body size. People come to think that it is okay to be bigger since those around them are bigger, and this sensibility spreads,\u201d said Christakis.

&gt; \u201cThis is about people's ideas about their bodies and their health,\u201d Fowler said. \u201cConsciously or unconsciously, people look to others when they are deciding how much to eat, how much to exercise and how much weight is too much.\u201d

&gt; \u201cIt\u2019s important to remember,\u201d Fowler said, \u201cthat we\u2019ve not only shown that obesity is contagious but that thinness is contagious.\u201d 

What people call "common sense" is their own pre-formed judgments and biases.  Prejudices and biases aren't in themselves, bad.  It's impossible to operate without prejudices and biases, we need them to filter and sort information. But you should try being less confident and more curious.Are you saying that you understand f(x), f'(x), f''(x) notation, but mess up when you have to integrate or differentiate with the d/dx notation?  Or is it some more abstract issue you have?

The original reason why we had f'(x) and dy/dx as two ways to express the same idea was that Newton and Leibniz independently figured out calculus.

The reason we keep both around is that f'(x) is cleaner, but dy/dx is much more useful.  Two main reasons:

1.  You've memorized a bunch of shortcuts for differentiating polynomials, exponents, trigonometric functions, and so on, I'm sure.  But when you are not just applying the shortcuts directly, but proving things directly or using multiple shortcuts in a coordinated way, it's really important to remember with respect to which unit you are differentiating/integrating.

2. Let's say we have a function f(x, y, z).  Call it the electrical force on a charged particle as it moves through some kind of three dimensional field.  X, Y, and Z are left-right, up-down, back-forward.  What does f'(x, y, z) mean? Not much.  To know the rate of change of the force as the particle moves through the field, you need to ask "as the particle moves *which way* through the field?" df(.)/dx, df(.)/dy and df(.)/dz all have a clear meaning - the change as you move right, up, or back. It could be that moving one way increases the field, but moving the other way decreases it.  The d/dx notation helps keep that clear.Sorry, not actually how it works... if you compared losing fat by maintaining a calorie deficit to losing fat by liposuction, liposuction does a much better job with appetite suppression because it actually removes fat cells from your body.  The main signaling pathway your body uses is: "are my fat cells at full capacity, half-full, nearly empty, or what?" When your fat cells are full and you keep eating, you grow new fat cells, but depleting your energy stores doesn't kill the fat cells, it only empties them out. 

So (fictional numbers) someone at 15% body fat (normal for a guy) who had never been fat might have fat cells that were 75% full and sending appetite-suppression signals, but a formerly-obese guy at 15% body fat might have all that fat stored in five times as many fat cells, so they are only 15% full and they are sending appetite-stimulation signals.

Long story short, no, that's not whyGiven that you say they "look as good as our celebrities" I'm guessing what you are seeing is one of two things:

1. Currently 1/3 of Americans are obese and another 1/3 are overweight.  That was actually rather rare in the past.  Celebrities (people who appear on camera for a living) tend to have the resources and the motive to put a lot of effort into looking good, so they have much lower rates of obesity than the general population, which is part of why you think celebrities look better than normal people.

2. The other part is social class. Every era has subtle cues.  You know when you see how someone is dressed whether they are classy or trashy.  Mostly this comes down to how expensive clothes are.  When a type of clothing that is considered very beautiful in one era because cheap to make, everyone can wear it, and it's boring - so then people who can afford to, buy some *other* kind of beautiful clothing that is still expensive and rare, and the boring clothes get demoted another rung, down to "trashy".  -- The long and short of it is, you can easily find people who you think are dressed in ugly clothes on the sidewalk today, but if you go to a totally foreign country, *everything* looks exotic to you.  Not only are you not *more* impressed by the nicest clothes, you often can't tell which clothes are supposed to be nicest. And a different generation is just as foreign as a different continent.

I think you understand the basic idea, but some other things to consider:

What is the difference between poetic license, exaggeration, overstatement, and lying? For example, you say lying is "impractical" (why? you can get things by lying), "illogical" (what is the logical contradiction involved in a proposition like "John knew it was raining, and John said it had stopped raining"?), and "difficult" (how could it be, when "It just stopped raining" is equally easy to *say* whether it is raining or not?)  You said lying was those three things -- and clearly it's not -- but I don't think you were *wrong* to say those things.  I see what you were trying to get across.  You had to say something that wasn't strictly True to get your point across.  

In fact, *very often* we need to say things that aren't strictly True.  You say that inventing lying would be a "taxing mental task".  What? When is the last time a mental task *taxed* anyone? Are there mental tasks over at the IRS? What do mental tasks want money for, and who gave them the legal authority to tax us? -- You might say "Oh, well may *once upon a time* taxation only meant rulers collecting money, but people have used it my way so often that by now, it's part of the definition." And that's the point: at one point, describing a mental task as "taxing" was *100%* incompatible with the meaning of tax, it was completely unTrue to say a mental task was taxing, but people not only *understood* the first person who used it that way, they liked it so much that they kept using it until it doesn't even seem like a metaphor anymore.

Now, you can mislead people with lying - and with overstatement and exaggeration too, of course.  Arguably the *main purpose* of exaggeration is to mislead people.  But that isn't a separate power unique to False statements.  You can mislead people with True statements, too, by using them in misleading ways.  For example, if someone asks "Did you check the pressure in my oxygen tank?" before going scuba diving, and you say "Yes, I did"... not mentioning that the tank is empty, because you want him to drown.  Obviously this is cruel and immoral, but it's immoral because it's *deceptive*, not to mention harmful, rather than because the statement is True or False.

Note that any system that lets you put things together in a certain way gives you the options to do things that are, in various ways, "wrong" from the point of view of what the system is supposed to do.  For example, the 24-letter roman alphabet lets me spell all the words in the English language.  It also lets me spell words like *Geisteswissenshaften* or *sukiyaki* which aren't English at all, and things like *asoifuaoisdfu* and *rtdxclkw* which aren't even words.  Mathematical notation lets me write out natural numbers like 898235, rational numbers like 331/71, equations like 345=5x+2y^2 , and also False statements like 10=1+1, and gibberish like 24..X+43/!=+34{ ... but the problem is, it's hard enough to find a system that is flexible enough to let you do all the things that are "right" without worrying about the (necessary) consequence that someone could choose to use the system in a deliberately stupid way.  (And even if you could prevent this... how could *you* know in advance which uses of the system are True and False, useful or useless? Are you sure that "10=1+1" is a mistake?)I think in general, men are shamed more.  The view is that the woman was stupid, maybe even pathetic, but the man is callous or possibly downright evil.

But I guess it depends partly on what you mean by "contributing to an unwanted pregnancy".  I'm reading that mostly as, "conceiving, and possibly giving birth to a baby under circumstances where the child isn't wanted."  The reason the man is shamed under those circumstances is that his "contribution" is typically to pretend he cares about the woman until she gets pregnant, then to run.

But in a situation where, say, two strangers from different countries meet on vacation in a third country and have sex, then of course the woman should know they'll be on different continents by the time she misses her period, so she can't really expect that they have a future together or that there was some chance he would be there to face the consequences with her.  In that case, since it's her uterus, the risks are bigger for her, so she shouldn't stupid. -- Likewise for someone she meets at a show whose name she can't remember the next day, etc. etc.

Likewise, when illegitimacy gets past a certain point in lower-class communities, it is no longer very accurate for a woman to expect that if she has an unexpected baby her partner will want to support the child (much less marry); and as this expectation grows weaker, her neighbors are less likely to think that he actively misled her, and more likely to think she should have known to be more careful; and that make fathering illegitimate children less shameful, which means more men do it, which makes it even more inaccurate for a woman to expect her partner to stick with her if she gets pregnant; and so the cycle intensifies.  If *that* is what you are asking about, that's the answer. &gt; However, Conservatives are strongly in support of the death penalty

They understand the biblical commandment translated as "thou shalt not kill" or "thou shalt not murder" to refer to the taking of *innocent* life.  Once you break a law, you're screwed (and indeed, the same set of commandments that include "thou shalt not kill" include commandments like "thou shalt not suffer a witch to live").

&gt; Jesus' teachings revolved around our obligation to the least fortunate

Yes, but it's hard to construct a coherent social program around the posthumous collected sayings of an apocryphal Jud\u00e6an guru.  He says to feed the starving, but he also says that it's better to live in poverty than in comfort.  He says give all your possessions to the poor if you want to follow him, but he also says that using expensive cosmetic products to give him a luxurious foot-massage is a good use of resources.  

He does *not* say whether Social Security benefit growth should be indexed to cost of living or core inflation.  He does not say whether the optimal tax system should use a sales tax, an income tax, a capital gains tax, or some mix of all three.  The extent of his commentary on tax policy is limited to asserting that taxpayers are not *necessarily* damned to hell for collecting taxes (provided they repent).  In fact... he doesn't appear to say anything about what sorts of political policies his followers should support.

&gt; the poor, 

Christians disagree amongst themselves about what policies actually help the poor, whether those should be government policies or left in private hands, what degree of help the poor need (remember the beatitudes?), what *exactly* makes the poor worthy of aid (for example, should we help poor people who refuse to work more or less than we help poor people who work for low wages?), whether people should have to deal with the consequences of their own choices, and many other controversial issues... just like atheists do.

&gt; prostitutes, adulterers, single mothers

"You shouldn't throw rocks at prostitutes until their skulls fracture and their brains spill out" isn't the same as saying that his teachings revolve around our obligations to sluts.

&gt; social outcasts

In a Jud\u00e6o-Roman society, the social outcasts are people who don't live up to Jewish and Roman standards.  In a Christian society, they're people who don't live up to Christian standards.  I don't think this claim is completely misguided, but to expect Christianity to define itself by embracing sin.5 points to Gryffindor!I think it's easier to define depth and complexity for board games, for reasons that I'll explain, and then extend it to video games.

Depth would be how many levels of skill there are in a game, where a "level of skill" means something like, a person at a higher level can beat a person one level lower 2/3 of the time, 3/4 of the time, something like that, where the lowest level means "knows all the rules to the game, and nothing else" and the highest level is the highest obtained by humans after lots of playing and study. In the most shallow game, no player ever gets good enough to beat a first-time player more than 50% of the time.

"Complexity" would be the amount of time it takes to (a) learn all the rules, (b) and be able to apply them comfortably in the game, as well as (c) visualize how the rules will be applied on hypothetical future turns while making choices for the current turn.  In the simplest games you can learn the rules in a few minutes, apply them well after 5 or 10 minutes of playing, and visualize how they apply in future moves soon after that.  In more complex games, actually understanding all the rules that go into determining how game states are resolved could potentially take hundreds of hours of study.

The classic examples of high depth, low complexity are chess and go. Compared to tic-tac-toe or snakes-and-ladders, the rules take a bit longer to go through, but they are short (only 8 for go, I think) and after that there are huge numbers of skill levels you can advance through as you get a deeper and deeper sense for the game.

The classic examples of low depth, high complexity are things like war-simulation games... think Europa Universalis, but played on a big hex map, with the players applying all the rules, generating all the random events, tracking all the statistics themselves.

Now... I do believe that if depth and complexity mean anything at all in video games, they mean exactly what depth and complexity mean for *games in general*: the amount of effort required to be the best player in the world, minus the amount of effort required to learn the actual rules of how the game works.  In other words, you can't generate "depth" or skill levels just by making a game so stupidly complicated that some people only understand 1% of the rules, some people only understand 4% of the rules, and so on up to the point that someone who only understands half of the rules considers himself an expert because he is regularly crushing the people who don't understand anything at all.  But there are two wrinkles:

1.  Video games are much more kinetic than games in the pure sense.  Getting good at Starcraft has similarities to getting good at soccer, or darts, or piano; but I don't think that physical coordination translates well into the depth/complexity distinction.  If someone plays Just Dance!!! a lot and gets really really good at it because they are conditioned to the music, they are more coordinated, they even have better endurance after all that exercise... that still doesn't make the game deep.  

2.  Video games can be vastly more complicated than traditional games in terms of their rules, because the actual rules are handled by the computer at processor speed and the human can, if he wants, play the game without having any idea what the rules are.  We would still like to say that while you are learning raw facts about a game, you are learning *how to play the game*, not how to play *well*.  But it's harder to draw the distinction because no one playing a typical computer game understands the rules at anything like the level of familiarity that would allow them to resolve the game outcome themselves, so it's harder to make a distinction between someone with good strategic insight and someone who has a more accurate knowledge of facts about the game.Because radicals don't really believe in truth or reality the way you or I do.  The way *I* determine whether Muslim violence or anti-Muslim violence is a bigger problem is count up the incidents, evaluate them by severity and cause, compare them to the size of the pool of potential attackers, and then think about the cost/difficulty of further reducing the rate.  Whether Muslim violence or anti-Muslim violence is a "bigger" problem is purely a function of what I learn about the world.  But radicals already know the answer - they don't understand that other people use facts about the world to identify problems and non-problems, they just see the effects that the facts have on people's behavior and think "Oh, so to motivate people to hate group X, I need to fake an attack by group X on group Y."Again, great examples: "you *always* get caught".  Really? *Always*? Is that a lie, exaggeration, metaphor, or mistake? Certainly some people get away with lies.

Is it easier to remember the truth? Is it easier to remember "Pi equals 3.14159265" or "Pi equals 3"? Both are unTrue, but the first one is closer to the truth and harder to remember.  People always say: the truth is complicated.  The truth isn't *always* complicated, but you can make your lie as simple as you want.The technical term for this is "ecological succession".  It would happen in stages.  Weeds would come up in no time at all, as you can see whenever an abandoned lot is left alone; then bigger and bigger bushes would crowd out the weeds, then trees would start to grow and crowd out the bushes.  Basically each type of plant growth creates the conditions for the next, but exactly how the pattern would go depends on local climate and plant life.The funny thing is how he conjugated his verbs.

&gt;Chief Gaudett and Assistant Chief Nardozzi doesn't want them here

&gt;The Chief promise us the White people, he doesn't belong here

&gt;The Chief and Assistant Chief wants you out of here....Can you follow this argument?

1. The super-huge giraffe is a giraffe that is larger than anything else you can think of.

2. Something that exists is larger than something that doesn't exist... things that are only possible don't take up any space at all.

3.  When we think about the super-huge giraffe, we must be thinking about an *existing* giraffe, because it is easier to think of things that are larger than something that *doesn't* exist, but we said that it's *impossible* to think of something that is larger than the super-huge giraffe.

4.  When he think about something that exists, that thing isn't merely present in our thoughts: it exists in reality.

5. Therefore, the super-huge giraffe exists.

If you follow the logic of these five steps, you understand the logic (such as it is) of Anselm&gt; Whenever (putin's) russia anounces stuff like this, remember that russia has a GDP smaller than Italy. So if you can imagine an italian moon base (with inflatable Berlusconis?), i think then you can take those russian plans for serious. Otherwise, don't bet your money on it.

Thank you for posting this - it really can't be said often enough, people are *so* stupid about Russia because they are used to being intimidated by "the Communists".
Internet access used to be primarily over the phone lines.  You didn't need a router or a cable installation like you do now, you just needed a computer program that would tell your computer's built-in modem how to dial the correct phone number to connect to the AOL server.It's interesting to figure out where the mistake is, though. :)Resources are included in GDP.  If you look at a measure of annual expenditure in which resource depletion is counted as a debit rather than a credit, Italy looks even better.

&gt; GDP is not a real thing any more then the abstract practice of using money.

And space stations aren't a real thing any more than the abstract practice of solving partial differential equations.

&gt; By the way, if you spread this idea without my express written consent I will sue you back into the stone age.

If I could use your "idea" without other people thinking I was mentally retarded, I would copy-paste it ten times a dayIn criminal enterprises, the entire system of criminal exchange and criminal fraud/violence/theft are integrally connected, but it's very easy for higher-ups to appropriate the "cleanest" jobs in the system for themselves.  So at the very bottom you have addicts who need to rob, scam, burglarize, and con in order to get money to buy drugs; above them you have their dealers, who only occasionally need to kill a deadbeat customer or an expansionist rival; above them you have a captain whose only involvement is managing large drug shipments and distributing them to his underlings for sale; and above *him* the head or heads of the whole operation will try to avoid ever laying eyes on the drugs, and their only tangible involvement will be in making financial arrangements to launder tainted money.  But in a certain sense the whole system is like a sort of Wal-mart of crime where the CEO is getting a bunch of drones to work around the clock for him, getting money through theft and fraud with a little assault thrown in for funsies, and then pays them their minimum wage in their drug of choice.  Saying you the CEO and the floor managers shouldn't have criminal records because they haven't done anything serious is grotesque.

I get what you are saying - you like drug dealers, some of your best friends are drug dealers, maybe you've sold drugs once or twice yourself, and you want drug dealers to be treated as though they had never committed a crime.  But it wouldn't be productive.Greece went through a scientific/cultural explosion approximately 2600 years ago.  600BC to 300BC (with special reference to the period 450BC to 350BC) was the "Golden Age" of Greece. This was the period during which Greek culture was primarily limited to mainland Greece, the Greek islands in the Mediterranean and \u00c6gean Seas, the western coast of Asia Minor, Sicily, and southern Italy, and in that region, the political organization of the Greeks was in the form of small, autonomous, and basically democratic city-states.  The traditional explanation is that this organization gave the inhabitants of those city-states huge intellectual freedom, both in terms of the freedom and equality accorded to native-born citizens of each city-state, the independence of each city-state from oppressive foreign powers, and the ability of intellectuals to move to other city-states in pursuit of the most congenial intellectual environment.

The core period (450BC and 350BC) is bookended by the failed Persian attempt to conquer Greece, and the successful Greco-Macedonian attempt to conquer Persia and its empire.  Before 450BC, the Greeks and especially the Greeks in Asia Minor were threatened by Persian power; after 450BC, the Persians were never a real threat again.  But after 350BC, the Greek city-states were having serious trouble remaining independent from *each other*, and during this period the King of Macedon (think of Macedonia as Greece's Canada) went through a series of alliances, wars, peace treaties, and then more alliances and wars that ended with him the acknowledged leader of Greece; then his son conquered all of the Middle East, and by 300 BC the age of independent Greek city-states in Greece was over, and the age of large Greek kingdoms was beginning.

This next period, the Hellenistic age, basically lasted from 300BC to 650 AD.  Intellectual progress during this period was slow but steady.  Scientific progress *did not stop*! Greeks in 1AD knew far more than they knew in 300 BC, and Greeks in 300AD knew far more than they knew in 1AD.  However, the rate of progress was never again quite as impressive as it had been during the "Classical" period, even through by now the "Greek-speaking world" included all of Greece, Asia Minor, Syria, and Egypt, and was in constant communication with the Roman world as well.  

The Greek-speaking world passed over from Greek kings to Roman consuls in the period between 100BC and 50BC, and then from Roman consuls to Roman emperors, but for most of the inhabitants this was, if anything, a positive change.  Starting at around 300AD, various factors led to a decay in the overall framework of the Roman Empire, and while this decay wasn't felt directly in the eastern, Greek-speaking half of the empire (which in some ways benefitted as the main capital moved to Constantinople and imperial business started to be done purely in Greek), cultural productivity slowed as the empire as a whole became less productive, less coordinated, and more splintered.

The final hammer fell around 650AD.  At the beginning of the century the followers of Muhammad had forcibly unified the tribes of Arabia, a semi-barbaric area that had never been under Roman control, and then immediately after his death they began moving on the Roman/Byzantine and Persian/Parthian empires, which were themselves politically exhausted from long wars with each other.  The intellectual networks of the Greek-speaking world were largely destroyed, books were burned, scholarly institutions disbanded.  The loss was not total, and in the next 100-200 years some Islamic thinkers studied under the remaining Christian scholars before those intellectual lineages died out completely, but that was the end of Greek science.It's not really dangerous at all not to refrigerate them, but it does help them keep longer.  E.g. when I go shopping I frequently will buy 36 eggs at a time.  Will this last us two weeks or two months? Depends on how many omelets we have; better to refrigerate them.  Since Americans tend to buy more eggs and have bigger refrigerators, there is no reason not to.In general filmmakers don't consider influence by previous films, or completely different genres, to be a bad thing.  Look at the films that were based on Kurosawa alone - some of these are considered to be very, very good films in their own right!

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Remakes_of_films_by_Akira_Kurosawa

House of Cards is a remake; The Blue Lagoon is a remake; The Birdcage is a *fantastically* popular remake (and quite frankly, much better than the original); Some Like it Hot is an *iconic* remake; The Parent Trap (hardly a classic, but well-known) is a remake; many horror films (The Ring, Let the Right One In, Diabolique) are remakes...Externality just means that a good has effects other than the effect on the buyer and the effect on the seller.

A standard externality is something like pollution from a factory.  In a classic case, the smokestacks from a candy factory in Boston were ruining the clothes at a laundry business next door, so there was a suit.

A network externality arises when multiple people use a network; like each person who uses Facebook makes Facebook more useful for all the other people.  If no one used it, you would never use it.  Or reddit; each person who answers questions on ELI5 makes it more useful to you.  If no one answered questions here, you would never ask them here.

Regional externalities are externalities that affect an entire region.  For example, every percentage of residents with a BA degree (or even better, a professional degree) causes the average wages of *all* residents in that region (including both those who have degrees, and those who don't) to rise.  So that would be a regional externality.  The geography of trade can also fall under this - when Google hires more programmers in the Bay Area, or Genzyme hires more biologists in Boston, that creates a pool of talent that other tech/biotech companies can rely on in that area.

The people who believe in the Illuminati do not *merely* believe that they are in control of world government, controlling our minds, etc. etc. etc., they *also* believe that they are actual Satanists  (people who perform religious rituals to worship Satan).

Belief in Satan-worship goes back a long way in Christian societies.  The Knights Templar (a religious order founded to facilitate the Crusades which continued to function as a banking organization even after all the crusader states were defeated) were subverted in a sudden persecution that accused them of being a satanic organization.  Later on Protestant reformers accused the Pope and his cardinals of being secret Satanists.  All over Europe, millions of individual  suspects were accused of witchcraft and burnt during witch-hunting scares.  During the Enlightenment the reformers accused the Catholic clergy of Satanism and the clergy turned right around and accused the Masonic lodges that the Enlighteners used to spread their ideas of being Masonic temples.  The association of powerful people with secret societies (especially Masonic lodges) and those secret societies with Satanism persists to this day.Handwriting style is formed during penmanship practice in grade-school homework assignments.  Girls are not just more fastidious about their penmanship homework, they are notably more fastidious about all graded assignments in grade school than boys are.  There are lots of different explanations for why this is... more obedient, stronger identification with their (usually female) teachers, more ability to focus on repetitive tasks for a long period of time... but I don't think it is conclusively known.There are two steps in the explanation: the first step is well understood, the second step has candidate explanations but no one knows for sure.

All explanations come to an end somewhere.  Whatever you want to know, you can always ask "why" about the answer.  In this case, we can go two steps down the road before the uncertainty makes it difficult to go further.Essentially, one of the main defenses that young children have against sexual abuse is that they think it's weird and startling.  That's why child abusers famously "groom" their victims by exposing them to dirty jokes, casual nudity, pornography, sexually explicit discussions, before finally (having accomplished their goal of making sex seem normal, and convincing the victim that only a baby would resist) molesting/raping the child who has been groomed.  It's difficult to give children a large amount of sexual information without also raising their susceptibility to sexual pressure from others, at least in a modern society where we *do* expect a younger person to seamlessly transition into sexual relationships when he or she "feels ready for it".

In primitive societies there is typically no expectation of privacy and children are often exposed to far more nudity and sex - for example, most peasants have one-room huts and the parents have sex in the same room (or even on the same bed) where their children sleep.  But in such societies, there is also less autonomy granted to young adults, so they aren't responsible for making their own decisions about sexual experimentation in adolescence.  They are exposed to lots of information about adult sexual practices along with explicit rules about when they will be accounted adults and permitted to have a sexual partner.Primarily because the genes for baldness are X-linked.  For 23 of the 24 chromosome pairs, everyone has two copies of each chromosome.  If one gene is making too little or too much of a certain protein, you have a normal copy on the other gene that can partially compensate. But for the X chromosome, men only have one copy, from their mothers.He was unpopular on both sides of the political spectrum when he left office, so he wasn't (as with Reagan or Clinton) a litmus test of whether you were right-leaning or left-leaning: no one was really enthusiastic about him.  Over time as he continued to do international work he became accepted as a sort of elder-statesman, and as that happened people grudgingly admitted that many of the things that made him unpopular 35 years ago were either not his fault, or incredibly petty.&gt; If you never teach a child about drugs, they are much more likely to be peer pressured into using drugs.

That's actually False. They've shown empirically that the DARE ("Just Say No") program raised drug use during a period of falling drug use (nationally), probably because it taught kids how to use drugs or made them curious about drugs they otherwise would have been ill-informed about.  If you have children and you want to teach them the ins and outs of sex before puberty, no one will stop you; but if you decide to teach someone else's children the ins and outs of sex, don't expect much sympathy.You have no idea what happened, neither do I, so let's assume the teacher and principal know what they're doing.  This has been pushed in the media by the boy's mother, so of course all the information the journalists have makes him look like an adorable little angel with an adorable little crush, but real life isn\u2019t Prairie Home Companion. It's pretty standard when a student is put on a forced leave of absence to insist that he work rather than continue his studies elsewhere.  In other words, you can't dodge your leave of absence (whether they want you to take break for health reasons, as a punishment, or something else) by carrying on at another university.  It's reasonable enough when the leave of absence itself is reasonable, but when the leave of absence is mean-spirited to begin with the additional requirement is grotesque.Not only his right to free speech (which should be protected even if it was a private university on a private island on a private planet, if the school has any academic integrity) but his ninth amendment privacy rights.  How did a private messaging service end up sharing the identity of a private person for anonymously making an insulting comment? Was there a warrant for a gratuitous insult?9 year olds are not angels.  Children can be sweet and adorable, and they can also be horrible little monsters.  Children can and do sexually abuse other children.  As a matter of fact the 9 year-old probably would *not* be labelled as a sexual offender even if he raped his "crush" - generally, children can do whatever they want and escape any legal penalties before the age of 13.  But that doesn't mean there is anything wrong with impressing him with the gravity of what he is doing wrong, or showing both him and the girl that when she says stop, everyone will stand behind her.

&gt; If this kid had somehow knowingly assaulted her or abused her

I suspect, actually, that we wouldn't.  When a 9 year-old is abused you don't talk to journalists about it.(a) It doesn't really matter.  Child-on-child sexual abuse is nothing to laugh about. (b) A lot.  Depending on demographics, there are certainly kids going through puberty already at 9 years old.  (Clearly you didn't go to a public elementary school in the inner city, and good for you.) It's not worth my time to find you data broken down year-by-year, but if you look at the DOJ's juvenile crime summary you'll see that under-15s are responsible for 29% of juvenile *arrests* overall, but 47% of sex-offence arrests (second-highest category for under-15s, after arson) and 36% of forcible rapes.  

(And remember that is *arrests*.  Obviously part of the lower overall arrest rate for kids is that they break the law less, and part is that the younger you are, the less likely you'll ever be arrested for a crime.  A nine year-old is going to get put on time-out for things that would land an 18 year-old in prison.)

Moreover, this kid isn't going to paw at his "crush" until the end of the year and then become a model citizen over the summer.Your point was that giving children accurate information about how to do things makes them less likely to do them.  An example you provided (and rightly so, I think) of the same principle was elementary-school drug education programs.  It's frankly dishonest to start by saying that childhood exposure to drug information *supports* your case, and then when confronts with evidence of the opposite say *that* supports your case.  You don't need to change your mind, but if you don't find it embarrassing I can't imagine how you form beliefs about anything.  

&gt; However, giving kids an honest, realistic understanding of drugs is definitely effective.

At increasing their usage of those drugs, with the effect most pronounced in the drugs that had the lowest rate of abuse prior to the education campaign.  This is pretty well understood.  It's why they stopped teaching DARE nearly twenty years ago in most districts.

&gt; teaching abstinence is highly ineffective

That's not what "protecting children from the topic of sex" means.  You can force teenagers to unroll condoms onto bananas to make sure they can do it without tearing the condom without teaching children anything about sex beyond basic anatomy.  When people are talking about abstinence-only vs. comprehensive sex education they are talking about something that happens at an age where sex is no longer taboo.This is a non-story. If you go to the bottom you can see that the entire state-wide increase can be accounted for by the increase in Wayne County alone.  This is chapter 7,432 in the meltdown of Detroit, that's all.

However, the writer did provide a beautiful model of he-said, she-said journalism, providing equal time to actual information from the state director of Planned Parenthood and a smokescreen from the director of a pressure group.Most genetic material (for viruses, bacteria, and organisms) is stored as DNA and then copied over into proteins with the aid of RNA.  DNA and RNA are just two different kinds of nucleic acid, similarly to how sucrose and lactose are two different types of sugar. DNA is more stable.  Most RNA-viruses just translate their RNA directly into proteins once they enter a cell, but retroviruses go "backwards" a step: they start by getting the cell they've invaded to make DNA copies of the viral RNA, and then that DNA takes over the cell.  So they combine some features of RNA viruses with some features of DNA viruses.Many people have many reasons why they are for or against marriage, or certain kinds of marriage, but the basic reason is this:

1. People have sex for fun

2. People who have sex for fun have kids unexpectedly, and the people who are *least* responsible, and thus least qualified to raise a kid, are also least responsible with birth control, and thus most likely to have an unexpected pregnancy.

3.  Among people who have unexpected kids and who are struggling to take care of them, the mother more-or-less has to stick around for the birth (unless she aborts, there's no other way to get the damn thing out of her), but the father often has only a casual connection to the mother and little interest in the kid.  So he can try to disappear.

4. Raising kids takes time, money, and emotional energy, and when a single mother tries to raise her child(ren) herself without the full-time support of a second person, the children do much worse in a broad variety of ways.  Then when they grow up, those neglected kids are our fellow citizen.

So encouraging marriage is largely an attempt to get people to raise children as a couple, rather than having children before marriage and then splitting up.

&gt;  incentives like tax benefits

But this isn't really about supporting marriage.  In general, one person who earns $100,000 pays more than twice as much in taxes as a person who earns $50,000.  This is called *progressive taxation*; the idea is that rich people benefit more from society but need the money less, so they should pay to keep it going. Another way of saying this: two people who each earn $50,000 pay less in taxes, total, then one guy who earns $100,000.  

The problem with this is that if those two people who earn $50,000 are *married* to one another then how rich/poor they are isn't affected by whether the husband and wife each earn $50,000, or the wife earns $100,000 and her husband raises the kids, or one earns $25k and the other $75k.  If you apply the progressive taxation to them separately, then what you are basically saying is "we want each of you to earn half the income and do half of the work of running the household and raising kids", but in practice that's the opposite of what we want.  Normally it's more efficient for one parent to focus on a career and the other to be available to solve family issues full-time.They have some of the most renowned *classicists* in the world, and further Oxford has been a center of classical studies for centuries, so it attracts a talented and enthusiastic body of students.We aren't "looking around" in our sleep, but we are using parts of our brains that normally process visual information in some way or another, and that results in messages being sent via the nerves to the eyes.

We know that something important to cognitive function is happening during REM sleep, probably something that is linked to "moving" (?) memories from short-term memory to long-term memory; we can tell that much from sleep-studies where the experimenters don't let the subjects enter REM sleep and then they see what happens. (Answer: their cognitive function declines by as much as if they were drunk, their memories suffer, etc.)  But *precisely* why REM happens, how it functions, and what is going on in visual processing isn't understood, so likewise the exact explanation of the rapid eye-movements themselves can't be known.The US spends $13,500 per capita on social programs. Any first-world country could easily afford to given its citizens a 800 EUR/mo basic income.  However, in the case of Finland (as I understand it, at least) the basic income is intended to replace most other public benefits.

It's sort of like how the US started giving people food stamps as opposed to handing out food directly, then replaced food stamps with SNAP, and then SNAP with EBT cards.  The logical progression is to replace all in-kind benefits with cash, and to give the same cash benefit to everyone so that it doesn't fade out when a poor family becomes slightly-less-poor.There is no reason for viruses to do anything; they are molecules.  Obviously there are some pros and cons as a method of viral replication (otherwise natural selection would have stamped out all the retroviruses).... and that's why I find the fact that the college is punishing someone for an anonymous comment more distressing than the free speech issue (which is still shameful, for a college).  If there was no crime, under whose legal authority did they discover the identity of the commenter? Were the police involved? Did the messaging application divulge his identity voluntarily?The article says that he admitted making the comment when he was called to a meeting with the dean the day before he was suspended; clearly they knew that he was the author of the comment before scheduling the meeting.I mean that bundling together different requirements into a suspension can be logical when you use the suspension logically, and vile and bizarre if you use it arbitrarily.The pattern doesn't come from *one* particle, it emerges when you tally the results of sending many particles through, one at a time.

Physical waves (acoustic, oceanographic, seismic) are macro-phenomena with a micro-explanation; we understand that you see constructive and destructive interference because what we observe as a wave is actually made up of lots of tiny particles that propagate the wave through space.  The probability distribution of an elementary particle's being in a certain place at a certain time is a wave, but there is no micro-explanation in terms of yet-smaller-particles.

It's sort of like how quantum particles' effects are, in many respects, perfectly modeled by rules about the conservation of linear momentum or the conservation of angular momentum that we're familiar with from the macro-behavior of billiard balls and bicycle wheels.  The only hiccup is that we can understand the behavior of balls and wheels in terms of the micro-behavior of their particles... and subatomic particles can't be explained that way, even though they follow similar patterns.ywSNAP benefits used to be distributed on a card just for SNAP after the physical food "stamps" and before the unified EBT cards, correct?I just looked it up and there are some states (Delaware being the first alphabetically, I didn't look at the full list) which *still* don't combine TANF and other benefits with the SNAP benefit.  I don't know when the first states started putting all benefits on the same card, probably before 2008. But thanks for mentioning it.The answer has some fancy biological name, but the concept is simple: if every woman averages 2 kids, then someone who has a daughter is going to average 2 grandkids per daughter.  How many grandkids will you average per son? Barring exotic cloning technologies, the *total* number children women have in a generation is going to be the same as the *total* number of children men have in that generation.  So if you know the female average, it's easy to figure out the male average.  If there are *exactly as many* fertile adult men as fertile adult women, the average number of children per man will be exactly the same (2) and the average number of grandchildren per baby boy will also be the same (2).  If there are more men then women, the average children per man will be lower, and the average grandchildren per baby boy will be lower.  If there are more women than men, vice-versa.

Now, the upshot of this is that if there were more adult women than adult men in every generation, then anyone who had a mutation that made him/her more likely to have boys would end up having *way more* grandchildren, and that mutation would spread through the population until *so* many people were having "extra" boys that the adult ratio was 50:50 again.  And contrarywise, if there were more women than men, the mutant parents who had girls would have more grandchildren, and their mutation would spread through the gene pool until so many girls were being born that the adult ratio returned to 50:50.

So in sum, the human birth rate has already adjusted to the fact that young men tend to kill each other over the course of millions of years of evolution.  If you look at the statistics you'll see that there are more boys than girls at birth by 7%, but in our fertile years (15-64 on this link) there are 1% *fewer* men than women.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_sex_ratioThe mule is the historical name for the horse/donkey hybrid.  That cross is, under normal circumstances, almost always horse dam/donkey sire because mares are large enough for a mule, but jennies aren't necessarily large enough for a hinny.  (Mares are also herd animals and less, well, mulish about who they're crossed with.)  When animal breeders tried the opposite cross they gave it a new name, which is a common practice for sterile hybrids (like the lyger and the tigon).Change the frame somewhat.  There is lower-level reading and upper-level reading, and lower-level math and upper-level math.

Someone who can't do math well enough to play football, write in the tip on a restaurant bill, or figure out how much he should be paying to fill up his gas tank would be roundly mocked if he explained that he "doesn't like math".  People would think he was egregiously stupid, and worse for not being ashamed of it.  But someone who doesn't understand confidence intervals, doesn't do math puzzles for fun, and can't understand what on earth calculus would have to do with *anything* gets a lot of sympathy, because everyone reaches, at *some* point, a level in math that they find difficult, and most people reach a point where they are too discouraged to go further, so in general when someone else admits they think a certain level of math is too hard and probably not that valuable anyway, other people are *glad* that they've found someone as ignorant as they are... or at least, they're tolerant because they know what it feels like to be frustrated.

Likewise for reading.  Someone who reads so poorly that he can't read the headlines of a newspaper, can't read a children's novel like Harry Potter, can't read a three-sentence comment on reddit without misunderstanding it will get mocked for being ignorant.  But the same people who will mock that guy for being ignorant are themselves bored senseless by Kant, Proust, Freud, and other complex writing, and they are more likely to mock someone who *does* both really enjoy and really put a lot of effort into understanding complex written ideas than to be mocked by someone like that themselves.It's not wholly irrelevant. Performers (athletes, musicians, actors, whatever) deserve about as much respect from us as sandwich artisans, but because of the world stage that they get, people end up exaggerating their value to the world out of sheer brand loyalty.

I'm not saying that Minaj shouldn't have the right to bail child-molesters out of jail, but it's good to have evidence that she's just a garden variety rich-person so that I can remember I don't need to listen to blather about her. &gt; but the fact that parents who are more likely to have books around are more likely to be smarter and better parents

Or, honestly, just have better genes.  Both adoption studies in general and twin studies in particular support the conclusion that once the "smarter parents" have made an embryo, they've done a large part of the good parenting they have to do.  I understand that everyone wants to believe that if one tiny little detail of their childhood had been changed  they could have been Einsteins, but it is really unnecessarily self-celebratory for smart people to pretend that their smart kids are the result of superior parenting techniques.It's not just about procuring food.  My family wasn't exactly *poor*, or at least not by the time I was 10 or so, but both my parents were  stressed, sleep-deprived, and over-worked, so the expectation was that we would all make our own breakfasts.  But we didn\u2019t know how to do anything more complicated than pour milk on cereal, and often I didn\u2019t even have time for that.

The majority of the children-hungry-in-school problem is about that kind of thing, not failure to procure the food.You're thinking of IQ tests that were designed around 1905.  Those were the tests farm kids would do better on because they had questions like "piglets are to sows as goslings are to..." A modern IQ test is a bunch of geometric shapes with no cultural references, and in fact no words. [Like these.](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/e/ec/Raven_Matrix.svg/378px-Raven_Matrix.svg.png)It's a hell of a lot easier to measure it directly than to approximate it with a wealth, education, and occupation.  What would you think of someone who told you someone was dumb, and then justified it by pointing to his wealth, education, and occupation?

Also:

1. It's impossible to study things like the connection between wealth and intelligence (are the kids going to selective schools actually smart, or are they just the children of wealthy parents?) if you insist on using wealth as a proxy for what you want to distinguish from wealth.

2. IQ tests are almost certainly better validated than whatever proxy for reading achievement they used.Did you read the book? It doesn\u2019t look great, but I\u2019m quite sure that Kaufman knows all these facts.  If I said \u201cg-loaded\u201d, would you know what that meant?&gt; We attempt to adjudicate between these theories using data on academic performance from 42 national samples with 200,144 cases from OECD's PISA.

As for this:

&gt; Wealth of your own/income of your own is a different measurement than familiar wealth.

Yes, and the correlation between personal wealth and parental wealth is a different correlation from the one between personal wealth and parental intelligence, and between personal intelligence and parental wealth, and between personal intelligence and parental intelligence.&gt; Way more than people who struggle with grammar or spelling.

Spend more time on reddit.  

More seriously, if you are talking about the difficulty people have with multiplying a number by 0.18, I would say that isn't actually equivalent to "Cat, c-a-t, cat" but more comparable to the terrible trouble people have with things like the difference between "All Ps are Q" and "All Qs are P", or with *post hoc ergo propter hoc*; something basic that comes up all the time that people will get angry about if you call them on it.

(That said, we may just know different people. The people who struggle to do x0.18 are hypothetical to me.  Are these people you know?)Partly it is based on pre-existing biases, stereotypes, and associations that make some views very easy for different media outlets to sell to their audiences.  For example, crying people are vulnerable and need to be protected; soldiers are strong and heroic; and on and on and on.

Part of it is based in the sort of on-going saga of the media narrative.  When the NYC/DC media first encountered the Clintons, they were the redneck governor and first lady of a redneck state.  That started out a narrative that they were crass and unrefined, etc etc etc, and then the Clintons took all that baggage with them, plus new baggage that got interpreted in light of the old baggage, all the way to the end of Bill Clinton's first term; then Hillary took all that to her run for NY Senate; then all her baggage up to that point went into her first run for president.... So if a leading-democratic-candidate says XYZ in 2015, XYZ doesn't just mean XYZ!  The media wants to tell a whole fairy tale about what XYZ means, and in order to do that they need to know whether it was Hillary (with all her history) or Bernie (with his own history as an independent and a socialist) who said it, because the fairy tale they make up will depend on what they think will be believable; and what's believable? Whatever fits as the next chapter.

Furthermore, different media have their own ideologies.  The ideology is based, first of all, on the ideology of the owner and/or the executive editor, and on the consensus among the journalists at that company that grows out of the hiring decisions the editors make; second, on the ideology of the target audience, which will generally be more likely to read/listen/watch if the journalists make the news entertaining to someone of that ideology; third, on the ideology of American social elites in general, since journalists (whether personally rich or poor) do their best to schmooze with the rich and powerful and end up absorbing their attitudes towards national issues nine times out of ten.Just in case the other guy's explanation wasn't 100% clear:

HERC2 controls whether you have brown eyes or light eyes

gey controles whether a light-eyed person has green eyes or blue eyes.

If we call HERC2 genes for brown eyes H and gey genes for green eyes G:

1. You have either bbGG or bbGg

2. Your wife has either BbGG, BbGg, or Bbgg&gt; I don't get whaling at all though. The meat isn't that unique (I've had it in Norway), harvesting it is flipping dangerous and expensive, and they don't have the numbers to make it sustainable for large portions of the population.

The US only made plans to provide Japanese civilians with 1200 kcalories per day during the occupation.  They ended up expanding their diets.  I don't think that it's a lot to ask to let them have their damn whale meat.  The minkes are hardly endangered.
People who don't know much about biology are sentimental about all mammals.  Killing a blue whale or a humpback whale for snack-time would be a shame, but just because they are in the same *order* doesn't mean that minke whales are that interesting.The idea of an *I*ntelligence *Q*uotient or general intelligence factor is to identify the underlying mental ability (if any) that explains correlations across a wide range of cognitive functions and academic abilities.  They find the factor in question with factor analysis -- figuring out what results are correlated with what other results and figuring which portions co-vary and thus are likely to have a single explanation.  Once you have found your factor, you can precisely quantify how much each test or measure of success is explained by that factor, and you can also design new tests that will be explained by that test to some high amount.

An aptitude test with a high g-loading (what most people mean by "IQ test", although there are many non-IQ mental abilities you can test) would be one that tried to measure g *and only g*, rather than having questions that would depend on the subject's English proficiency, knowledge of calculus, breadth of knowledge, level of education, etc.

(A simple explanation of factor analysis: if you had a lot of statistics about cars, including size and mass, you would find the biggest cars are nearly always heavy, and the heavy cars are nearly always big.  That makes it unduly difficult to learn anything from the statistics: you would want factor analysis to pick out an underlying factor, like "bulk", that would account for *almost all of* mass and size, and would also account for a significant part of other variables like fuel efficiency and rollover rate, as well.)You're welcome.This depends on how exactly you are measuring stability.

If you randomly tackle a man and a woman, then by pure probability the man will probably be taller and heavier, and the impetus will accelerate him less because Force = mass X acceleration. Double the mass and you cut the acceleration in half.

If you are judging by someone's ability to, say, stand on one leg, or to hold a plank for a certain period, women's smaller size and lower weight is an advantage (since when you are holding *yourself* stable, you need to develop muscles that will overcome the force gravity exerts on your body mass), but the most stable people (in this sense) are people who develop very strong muscles, which is easier for men.Some countries, like Russia, Norway, Saudi Arabia, and Venezuela, are large net exporters of oil products.  Their national income is tied to high oil prices.

In most other countries, you may be confused by the *opposite* relationship.  Most economic activity requires energy, and fossil fuels are a major source of energy; when the economy shrinks, energy demand shrinks, so oil demand shrinks, so the price of oil falls.Basically, the interest rate on government debt is just a tool that modern states use to control whether people are saving money as cash or investing it in the economy.  Think of the ideal interest rate as the solution to a system of equations: is it 8%? 2%? Who knows, all we can say is that it's the number that gives us low unemployment and moderate inflation.  If inflation is too high, then you need to raise the rates; if unemployment is too high, then you need to lower the rates.

So this all works beautifully, *so long as the solution to the equation is a number above zero*.  The reason why it is traditionally said that interest rates "can't go below zero" is that at that point, you can just withdraw the cash from a bond/bank account and keep it in a safe deposit box.  Brazil is a big country, you know.  The murder rate in all but the four or five least safe Brazilian cities is comparable to the murder rate in Detroit, Baltimore, St. Louis, New Orleans, etc.  It's just that while those cities represent the worst of American urban blight, almost all Brazilians live in that kind of city.  When you multiply the crime rate of, say, Newark NJ times millions of Brazilians, you end up with a huge number of murders.&gt;  "we have to do better, guys,"

I've had long conversations with black people who quite sincerely believe that there is no crime problem in black communities, and that the FBI stats on crime are purely made up to make blacks look bad; that white people who don't want their children in dysfunctional inner city schools are just *don't like black people*, that there is nothing wrong with the schools themselves; that there are no negative values taught or perpetuated by any black media figures or entertainers; that the strong preference of black Americans for living in black neighborhoods couldn't possibly explain segregation; as well as many other silly things that don't directly hinge on the blame game.

This is why it gets on the news when someone like Bill Cosby (! tu quoque) says that black people need to take responsibility for their own problems: because it really *isn't* a common view among blacks.  Or if it is, American blacks do an awful good job circling the wagons...Are you talking about actual rules taught in style guides (\u00e0 la what you can and can't end a phrase with) or would any sort of casual misconception do? French sees hypercorrection in liaisons and in the use of the subjunctive, but no one is teaching people to do this (they are just trying to mimic features of standard French that aren't in their idiolect)I was going over some notes I made a while ago, and that inspired some questions loosely grouped around an interest in proto-Indo-European:

1. Have there been any developments in Indo-European studies in the last year? Specifically, last I heard the best and most recent evidence about PIE was still the evidence collected in David Anthony's book, and I read about the terrible statistical tree model published in *Nature* or something; anything new since then?

2. Is there a sense of how often/how frequently two daughter languages with little interaction will undergo the same changes just because they inherited unstable features from the parent languages? In other words, if one daughter language went through some sound change or grammatical change in a part of the language that was still shared between the two languages, would that be evidence that there is strong pressure for the same change to take place in the other language?

3. Everyone speaks about language drift primarily under the assumption that you unconsciously end up speaking like your neighbors, leading to areal features and Sprachb\u00fcnde.  I have certainly seen people talk about particular cliques or classes speaking in affected ways, but are there cases of anti-areal features where language change is apparently motivated by the desire *not to* sound like one's neighbors?

4.  Are there any firm rules or detailed principles with respect to what sorts of features can be areal and which must be genetic? Linguists always provide example of relatively recent shared vocabulary, but it isn't clear to me that grammar and phonology are any harder to share.Can you provide an example?

The US has seen a fairly polarizing race-based political movement emerge in the past year.  I don't know if that is the kind of thing you are talking about, but everything that touches on race is now salient in a way that it wasn't five years ago.I don't think it has anything to do with Reddit. It's just a feature of English that has been faddish in the past generation or two that didn't make it into your language textbook.

The basic use of it is as follows.  I can hedge a claim by re-stating the claim and then contrasting it with some mitigating factor:

&gt; *On the one hand,* terrorism is always bad; *but on the other hand*, it's not like anyone was paying attention to their grievances before they resorted to violence.

Alternatively, I can state the claim that I want to defend in an absolute form first, before backtracking to clarify *exactly* what I mean.

&gt; I feel some sympathy for the terrorists.  *I don't mean* that terrorism isn't bad, but it's not like anyone was paying attention to their grievances before they resorted to violence.

Or, if the context is clear, you can jump directly to your point, while implying that you are offering a precise explanation of a view that might be misunderstood in it's strong form:

&gt; I mean, it's not like anyone was paying attention to their grievances before they resorted to violence.

But because this phrase has the general effect of weakening the claim and expressing uncertainty/acknowledging disagreement, people have started to use it promiscuously as a replacement for other insecure filler (like "I think," "I feel like," "Maybe"...)

&gt; Do you want to go to Mexican tonight?

&gt; I mean, I would rather have Japanese...The main value of a currency is that the supply of the currency allows a country to calibrate its rates of inflation and unemployment.  Agreed? In order to control inflation and unemployment by managing supply of the currency, a country *needs to control its own currency*.  Any country can choose to do business in the currency of a foreign country, but then they lose control of their monetary policy and they can get hammered by depressions (because there is too little currency for their country's needs) or inflation (because there is too much currency).Are you aware it's pronounced like "Coke"?Yes.  The House of Saud is a *huge* family of princes and princesses who are not all *billionaires*, but it is a very large group of wealthy people by the standards of everyday life, and the most powerful members of the royal family are very wealthy independently, in addition to controlling public spending via their political influence.  So they are the state, and the wealthy, and the royalty, all at once.

The main issue is financial support of extremists clergy in Saudi Arabia, and the construction and funding of mosques that tend to have radical leaders in non-Islamic countries; that is an official policy of the state.  But many wealthy Saudis also *independently* support Islamic organizations which funnel money to extremists. Economies all work the same way - people work to generate goods and services, other people buy those goods and services from them with money they've earned through their own wages.

I don't know what "conservatives are saying".  The most persistent conservative whine is that the national debt is too large, which manifests a poor understanding of what the national debt is and why it matters.  But if you have a more specific accusation in mind I can reply more specifically.  In general, the US economy is doing quite well right now - so well that the Federal Reserve is probably more concerned with inflation than unemployment and may cut rates soon, causing a quick, short recession.It's just physics and chemistry.  It's not inane, it's cutting edge science.  The only real problem is that it's too hard for ELI5.

Thanks, that's quite interesting.  It reminds me of the datum (hypothesis?) that the children of New York immigrants enunciated their consonants more strongly to avoid sounding like their parents.
Well, there are three different problems: the clades they came up, the chronology they build out of those clades, and the geographic interpretation of the whole tree.  

The geographic interpretation is what is, broadly speaking, inexplicably dumb, and *might* be something that makes sense for organisms (you assume an organism flourishes in a certain region if and only if it is well adapted to the local biome) but not for languages, although I'm inclined to think it may be equally misguided for organisms (e.g., the survival of Australian monotremes surely has nothing to do with Australia being the monotreme *Urheimat*).

But the problems with the clades and the chronology have nothing to do with languages being tools.  It's just terrible methodology designed by people who apparently know nothing about language.Did you understand the stackexchange link /u/homeboi808 provided? I can try a more ELI5ish explanation, but it would be gratuitous if you already get it.Interesting point! You are definitely right, but remember there are three relative rates:

1.  Randomly selected gay/bi men are 30x more likely to have a new HIV infection than randomly selected people in general.

2. A randomly selected person is 2.3x more likely to have a new infection than a randomly selected person who doesn't have sex with men.

3.  A randomly selected gay/bi person is 70x more likely to have a new infection than a randomly selected person who doesn't have sex with men. (Rate 1 times Rate 2.)

Do you see that if you imagine a world where you only get blood from gay men, the rate of HIV contamination would be 30 times as high as a world where you got blood from everyone, not 70 times as high? But I can definitely see why you interpreted my thought experiment the way you did.

The exact numbers don't really matter; what I think is difficult for most people to understand is that *all tests for hidden quantities*, like a test to detect HIV in donated blood, are *statistical* tests, and *have False positives and False negatives*.  Whether you are worried more about having too many False positives, or too many False negatives, *depends on what the True rate of the trait is in the population*.  There would still be blood donation in a country with  much higher HIV infection rates, we would just have more accidental infections through blood transfusion (False negatives) and more discarded blood (False positives), or else a much more expensive testing process. But because we can simply ask people who have gay sex and use IV drugs *not to donate*, limiting ourselves to donations from safer sources, we don't need to deal with those problems.The ancient world had a well developed system of oratory, which included not only a careful analysis of different techniques for creating expressions and structuring an entire speech, but also rules for things like what kind of voice to use and what to do with your hands and what facial expressions to make while talking.  You still see this today: some politicians are mocked for their excessive use of their favorite oratorical gestures.  For example, President Clinton would stick his thumb just a half inch above his fist and shake it up and down to emphasize his points... a technique that goes back two thousand years.

You can see a simple diagram [here](http://www.romanmysteries.com/sites/romanmysteries.com/files/cms_images/gesturesoftheorator.jpg) and a longer list [here](https://www.york.ac.uk/media/music/nemaconference/rooley/fig2c.png) - I can't speak for the exact accuracy of the research behind either list, but the general idea gets across.  The gesture you link to is used for teaching, in particular "isn't this amazing?!" (Think of Bill Nye the Science Guy with his eyes bugging out in shock.)It's X-linked.  All recessive/extreme traits are more common in men because *if* the trait is controlled/affected by a gene on the X chromosome, a woman will have two X-chromosomes and is less likely to get *two* rare genes which have the same effect.  Like if, in a population, 1 person in a 10 carries the gene, 1 out of 10 men will have the trait, and only 1 out of 100 women.  If 1 person out of 100 carries the gene, 1 out of 100 men will have the trait, but only 1 out of 10,000 women.

This leads to the interesting consequence that in closely-related species, if any hybrid offspring is possible at all it is usually the female (with male embryos dying) and if any fertile hybrid offspring is possible it is also usually the female that can have children (with male hybrids being sterile).  But only in mammals, with our XX/XY gender system! In birds, where males are ZZ and females are ZW, it's the reverse.It's great that you understand that part of human technological progress is using resources more efficiently.  (Most people have the opposite worry: they think that at some point economic growth has to stop or we will "run out" of resources, or that technological efficiency has to stop or we will "run out" of jobs for people to do.) 

But you may suffer from something of the opposite problem.  Normally we measure efficiency in terms of *hours of human work* it takes to produce a product.  This has the downside, as you clearly understand, that labor is only one of many inputs into production, and there are many ways to use less labor that simply involve throwing some other resource at the problem, instead.  For example, having a million monkeys spend a million years writing a novel would be a very efficient use of *human labor*, but it would be a very inefficient use of chimpanzees.  Likewise, you can replace human work with energy, machines, natural resources, and other inputs; but doubling your production by quadrupling your use of *every input except labor* isn't actually being more efficient!

That is why there is a measure of efficiency called *total factor productivity*.  When China experience a growth in worker-productivity per hour, typically that is because the average worker is using more resources than he did last year; more education, more machinery, more energy, more steel.  But advanced countries have typically run up against the limits of that way of expanding.  We can try to measure it

But this is still a measure of *efficiency per hour of human labor*.  It can get very high, but it can never get as high as you want it to be.  If we did not need *any* additional input *besides* labor to produce any quantity of goods, then total factor productivity would be infinite.  The problem is that you don't just want to measure how much additional input is needed relative to labor to produce the finished product, you want to measure how close we are to not needing any additional output at all.  And there is no way to do that, because there is no way to quantify the different inputs in terms of each other.  Which is more input-y, a gram of lithium or a barrel of oil?  Which is more input-y, a ton of iron ore or a ton of copper ore? As we move from production techniques that have low total factor productivity to high total factor productivity, we can compare the old inputs to the new inputs.  It's not *easy*, but we can do it because ultimately we are concerned about the hours of labor put in and the value of the goods produced, so we just need to reduce the inputs to these common factors.  But there is no way to compare the different inputs *directly* to one another to determine whether we are using "more" or "less".

So you have two options: (1) take total factor productivity as the closest measure to what you want, (2) study math and statistics and the problems inherent in economic measurement and try to figure it out yourself.If you need your legs protected for environmental reasons, and you need to work, trousers/pants are the only way.  You can't ride a horse in a dress, you can't farm in a dress.  In tropical climates a loincloth may be a good substitute for pants, but dresses are too confining.  Robes were relatively common for noblemen, clerics, scholars and businessmen in the European middle ages, because they didn't actually need to be doing work, or at least not all the time, but the style of looking like a cavalry officer all the time came down from above, and the style of looking like a farmer/craftsman all the time came up from below, and in the end no men continued to wear robes.Because we tend to describe that as squeaky or shrill instead, or say that someone's voice broke.  No one has any idea.  But "when it has been growing for 3-4 years in a healthy human being" is a good guess.  There is only indirect evidence for self-consciousness in other primates and strong evidence that other mammals (for example, squirrels) are not conscious at all, as we understand it.Electrical attraction is affected by much more than total numbers of protons and electrons.  For example, you may know that in a H2O molecule, the electrons are more strongly attracted to the oxygen and spend a bit more time near it, creating a dipole (and hydrogen bonds between adjacent molecules).  And in fact, when an H2O molecule spontaneously splits up into a H molecule and an OH molecules, normally the OH molecule gets custody of all the baby electrons in the divorce, leaving an OH- and a H+ ion floating in the water.  Do these have an attraction to one another, do they tend to re-unite and become neutral again? Of course!  But at the same time OH- and H+ are re-uniting, H2O molecules elsewhere are splitting.  Because there are *vastly* more H2O molecules, they are always producing new charged ions, even though it is unlikely, and the total level of OH- and H+ comes to rest at an equilibrium between the rate of divorce and the rate of creation.

That basically happens with *all* substances.  If you put two different substances next to one another, they come into contact and share electrons, and when you split them apart again, sometimes the shared electron stays with the molecule that is chemically more attractive to the electron (equivalent to the OH-) instead of the one that has the right number of protons (equivalent to H+).  It doesn't have to happen *every* time, it just has to happen more often than not.I don't think I can swing an ELI5 answer, sorry. (Even to the limited extent that I can actually claim to have any insight.) But you've asked a very interesting and controversial question that people investigate in many different ways - for example, does the language you think in affect how or what you think?  Which language to bilingual people think in? To what extent does not being able to communicate affect your ability to think? Unfortunately, these aren't really things we can easily investigate with experiments.Negative integers are the complete answer to the question, for two natural numbers (zero, one, two, three...) which we will call X and Y, "What is the number Z such that X plus Z equals Y?"  For example, Z such that 5+z=9 is 4.  That's simple enough.  But Z such that 9+z=5... what's that? Unless we can say, "-4", there is no answer.

As you probably guessed, this whole "What is the number Z such that X plus Z equals Y?" business is just another name for *subtraction*. You can't subtract unless you have negative numbers.  I mean, you *can*, but there is no way to give a general rule for what it means, because you would only be allowed to subtract little numbers from big numbers.

*Any* time you might want to ask "What is the number Z such that X plus Z equals Y?", you can end up dealing with negative numbers.  "If I have a hundred dollars and I pay a $300 bill, how much will I have left?" -$200, i.e. a $200 debt.  "If you are going to college three months after you graduated high school and four months after you broke up with your girlfriend, how long were you with your girlfriend after graduation?" -1 month, i.e. you broke up one month *before* you graduated.  If you need to subtract, about half of the time it's a negative integer.This isn't unique for military ranks. Italian for "column" is *colonello* or something like this. So the Italians called a man who was in command of a column something like "colonello".  As this got passed from Italian mercenaries to Spanish and French mercenaries it was corrupted to "coronello".  What the English mercenaries heard, by the time it got to them, was *kernel*.  But what the officers wrote, influenced by how other Europeans spelled it going back to the Renaissance, was *colonel*, since the Italian had an L in it. -- You have something similar going on with *sergeant*, pronounced *sarjent* or *sarjunt*, although there you see a better match.  Likewise with *boatswain* (pronounced bosun, an English compound word using the obsolete *swain*) a young man, and ensign (ensen). 

Similar with *lieutenant*.  The Latin roots are *locus* (place) and *tenere* (hold).  How does *lieu* come out of *locus*? It's not clear, but the other Romance languages have something like *lugo* or *luogo* and it seems that the old *g* sounds softened over time and then disappeared in Modern French.  At some time between pronouncing a G and losing the sound entirely, it softened to F as a halfway move.  This may seem strange, but think of *tough* - it is spelled that way because there was once a g-sound there, which was then softened to a rough (!) g-sound like what you hear in *loch* or *chutzpah*, and finally we ended up with an f-sound.

England and France are neighbors, and were politically entangled all the way back to the Norman conquest. The word *lieutenant* goes back to the middle ages, and the English rank-and-file apparently picked it up from the French at a time when some of the French still pronounced it this way.  It survived even though the spelling was generally kept close to the current French pronunciation.Most rich people only keep a tiny amount of their wealth as *money*.  Most of it invested in future economic activities, either directly or indirectly (through financial assets like stocks and bonds).  The point of these assets is that they produce more valuable goods (which translate into income for the investor) in the future.  Then you get the negative sides of the drug without the benefits, and it's time to talk to your doctor about switching to a different drug.Exchange rates aren't a pissing match, they exist to calibrate the price levels in the two countries to allow trade.  Look at some goods that Europe exports to the US, and that the US exports to Europe.  Most of these could be produced in the other continent, right? Why do we ship them over the ocean, then? Because even though one continent *can* make the same good that it imports from the other, it can't make goods of the *same quality at the same price*.

If European producers get more efficient faster than American producers, then yes: it will be easier and easier for them to export goods to America, and hard for Americans to export goods to Europe.  That means that lots of European exporters will have dollars, but few American exporters will have euros, and the exchange rate will weaken the US$ until trade is stable again; but if European efficiency keeps growing steadily over time, the US$ will have to keep weakening.

However, that is relatively unlikely.The underlying story is this:

1. Within an integrated community, it is ideal to have a relatively high level of homogeneity.  You need to practice similar customs, speak a similar language, share similar values with most of the people you see in daily life... and this requirement only gets stronger in modern society (I can explain why if this seems counter-intuitive to you).

2. Within a modern state, it is ideal to have a relatively high level of integration between nearby areas, so that they can gain from large-scale cooperation across the entire region, fund large-scale public works projects, and have relatively few expensive borders to fund/guard.  

Now, this obviously means that the ideal location for a modern state is a large region where there is a high level of homogeneity across the entire region.  But historically, this is not typical.  Pre-colonial Africa was not an ideal location for modern states.  The issue is not so much that the *current* borders are not ideal as that no ideal borders exist that would describe large nation states; the only borders which would enclose semi-homogenous communities would look like a mosaic of tiny little statelets.  Sometimes this *manifests itself* as friction between states at their borders, because frequently two neighbors have equally good claims to the border region. But as you note, it also manifests itself as separatism, civil war, and ethnic strife *within* countries.  If you cut each country in half, then there would still be ethnic strife within the equally unnatural borders of the new country; a sort of micro-version of the larger problem when Egypt gave up Sudan, then Sudan gave up Darfur, now Darfur is having its own internal strife.  But in the case of these separatists, splitting Egypt from Sudan still leaves Egypt as a large, relatively homogenous state.  It is, as you say, a case of deciding a border doesn't work, and redrawing it the right way.  There are no "right" borders in much of Africa, at least not one that would leave us with medium-sized states.

These issues are clearest in Africa.  The Middle East is more complicated.  I don't think any of Egypt's problems can be blamed on colonial borders (unless you are going to call Palestine a "border" problem and blame all of Egypt's problems on it), or Saudi's problems, Libya's problems, Algeria's problems.  The Lebanon-Syria-Iraq area has a homogeneity problem, although not an impossible one.  There, the problem is partly how national politics interacts with international politics.  For example, could you carve a Kurdish homeland out of northern Iraq? Yes, but the Kurds in Syria, Turkey, and Iran could use it as a base for political operations in their own attempts to gain autonomy, so there is a huge amount of regional pressure against that.  Could you carve a Shia homeland out of southern Iraq? Yes, but it would be a natural ideological ally for Shia Iran, and neither Iran\u2019s regional neighbors nor secular Iraqis are excited about that.Because it's easy to measure how efficiently one thing can do another thing (for example, how efficiently human can produce goods, or how efficiently a car can travel a certain distance, or how efficiently a bridge can bear stresses) but meaningless otherwise.  That's how it matters. You're welcome.  That is a good description of sound change.There are at least three big stimulants, I'm sure a psychiatrist would know of more.  Most likely they would try different drugs.I don't think anyone is *afraid* of the growing Chinese economy.  A richer China is a more productive China and more peaceful China, and everyone will benefit more from China's markets when they are buying more and selling more.   Plus, at this point China is a free-rider on Western media and patents, and in the future China will have just as much money to invest in films and R&amp;D as the West, which we will benefit from.

I don't know exactly who you think is keeping China from ascending economically.  The only country that has done more than the US to promote growth in China is Japan (which invested billions of dollars in China in the 1980s, after Deng decided to orient the country away from collective industry after the Cultural Revolution).

Did you have any specific examples in mind?China is not especially hostile to the United States.  Their economy is heavily dependent on exports to the US and investment from American companies.  They have policy disputes on a number of issues (human rights in China, China's claim to Taiwan, China's claim to the entire South China Sea), but no real hostility.People have provided a good basic explanation of evolution-in-little-steps: first you start to jump, then you develop to jump better and better, then you start gliding, then you give yourself a little extra "pow" while you're gliding, and suddenly you have wings.

What they haven't mentioned is that for the *vast majority* of land-based mammals, *flying* is not hard.  Staying on the ground is hard.  To us, air (and water, for that matter) seems to be very weak compared to the force of gravity.  But that is very misleading.  When you are very tiny, air/water act more like a rapidly-moving syrup.  A tiny insect will automatically take off when it is hit by a stiff wind.  It *has to* fly.  It has no way to prevent itself from flying.  Given that it has to fly, it is going to develop a shape that allows it to control *which way* it flies pretty quickly.C is a constant.  You use it to make the equation come out correctly.  The miracle is that the same constants appear over and over again in so many equations.  The units don't matter.

(mass X distance^2 / time^2 ) = (mass) X (distance/time)^2

Choose any units you like, and it will work exactly the same way.  Maybe you don't realize that a joule is defined as 1 kgm^2 /s^2 ?In most of the Middle East, the borders are fine.  The Israel-Palestine problem you know about.  The issues in Lebanon, Syria, and Iraq are too complicated by other issues and agendas to make predictions about whether new borders will be drawn and how much they would help.

In most of *Africa*, as I have tried to convey, there are few large, relatively homogenous regions whose boundaries which would make natural borders for nation-states if we were to come back to borderless Africa and try to draw national borders from scratch.  You just get a sliding scale of trade-offs where, in order to get very high levels of homogeneity, you would end up with states that were too small to function; but to get potentially effective states, you get unworkable diversity.

Look at this map: http://www.muturzikin.com/cartesafrique/imagesafrique/afriquecentrale.png

Realize three things: (1) these are just language-regions, and don't reflect other borders which may be related to ethnicity, culture, religion, etc., (2) these reflect majority languages; a map at a smaller scale would show similar tiny pockets of foreign languages inside the small pockets that show up on these maps, and (3) in some cases the boundaries you are looking at describe a language *family* not a single language that is intelligible to all speakers.

Well, okay.  It is not the fact that the Chinese economy is *growing* so much as the fact that it *hasn't grown yet*.  

China is a poor country where nearly all laborers are, by American standards, unskilled or semi-skilled.  In a highly advanced country (like America), if you made an enormous wall around the country and forbade trade, then the unskilled workers would benefit from the fact that they are bargaining with (a) highly productive skilled workers and  (b) very wealth industrialists for goods and services. That gives unskilled laborers a ton of negotiating power, relative to a poor country where each doctor has vastly more unskilled workers who need professional medical help, where a factory owner has vastly more applicants to work at each factory.  

When you tear down that wall and suddenly you have rich countries trading with poor countries, the less-skilled workers get hurt because suddenly the highly skilled US workers, the very wealthy US industrialists, and the poor, unskilled Chinese workers can engage in economic exchange that is beneficial to all three groups, but hurts unskilled American workers.

That's a stupid version, but I think it captures the soul of it.  Do you understand now?  In particular you should see that if China were already rich, it wouldn't be a problem at all for unskilled workers.  (If China were *richer* than the US, it would help unskilled workers a lot and "hurt" everyone else.)  In fact, to a large extent China is *already* too rich for China-US trade to hurt unskilled American workers; that is why China has been manipulating foreign exchange rates (to make China seem "artificially poor" to people buying Chinese goods, you might say) and why more and more trade is moving from China to even poorer countries like Vietnam.Exactly.  You get the principle, but not the conclusion.  Existing facilities aren't adequate for vets because we can't hire enough doctors at the rates we're willing to pay.  Alarmist: "OMG tell vets they can see any doctor they want as soon as they want! The doctors will send the government a bill!" Well, that would be ridiculously expensive.  Reply: "Well, say we'll only reimburse the doctors at Medicaid rates!" Okay, great... then no doctor will want to see them.  Reply: "Well, *make* any doctor who takes Medicaid give them the same treatment he gives his Medicaid patients!" Okay, and that isn't really a very high standard of care.  How much psychiatric counseling do you think *Medicaid* pays for? "Well, fine... let's hire a bunch doctors... who will agree to see veterans all day and give them the same level of care people get at the VA... but get paid the same as if they were only seeing Medicaid patients!" Okay, great, and what do you think a VA hospital *is*, exactly?&gt; the VA is still paying out hundreds of millions in bonuses this year

The Dept. of Veteran's affairs spends $100 billion/yr taking care of 25 million veterans.  $142 million ("hundreds"?) is 1/1000 of its budget or about six bucks per veteran.  I know it boggles your mind to think about it, but *maybe* a hospital that is supposed to serve millions of people over a very long period of time costs a *lot* of money, and the cost overruns when things get shitty are a little worse than when you are building a deck in your backyard.  And maybe, just maybe, if you want competent management you complain about how *little* you are paying to attract talent, not how *much*.Eh, the ideologies of the left-wing terrorist groups in the '60s and '70s were basically identical.That is the main thing that is fanning these protests... the difference between how much media coverage an exciting, profitable lie gets, and how little the sordid, boring correction gets.Have you ever lived in a black area?One big economy is made up of lots of little people who make their own decisions about how many hours to work, at what jobs, whether to hire people to work for them and for how much, and whether to sell what they own or use the money they have to buy new things.  If you add up all the decisions that all the people make, you get totals for the whole economy.People who are related look the same because they have similar genes, and in particular when they have unusual genes (relative to their neighbors) they tend to have the *same* unusual genes.  But that kind of family relatedness is a really tiny number of genes - like, in 1 out of a 1000 genes you have a different gene than your neighbors, and in 1/2 of those you will be different in the same way as a close relative (mom, dad, full sibling).  

But you have like 100,000 genes overall, split into 46 chromosomes.  People with Downs Syndrome have *47* chromosomes, and it is always the same chromosome that they have an extra copy of (22).  So they have something like 1,000 extra genes.  In a sense they are more related than most families, if you define relatedness in terms of genetic similarity.Newton was a *crazily* smart guy, but it's important to remember he didn't whip up calculus out of thin air.  The whole reason he and Leibniz were able to invent calculus at almost exactly the same time is that they were both fiddling around with Fermat's approach to summing infinite theories, which itself was based ultimately on Greek geometric theories that were working towards something like infinitesimals.There are many, many more formulae today than back then, you just haven't learned them yet.There is no special reason why Ethiopia would be a good place to be a human being, let alone why it would be a good place to build a civilized society.  We evolved there, that's all.

The Middle East historically experienced what is happening in West Africa today: population starts to expand unchecked, human beings spread out across available fertile land, then start to overfarm/overgraze marginal land that has weak soil.  They also used irrigation in an unsustainable way (leading their most fertile soil to become saltier and saltier over time) and cut down forests that were both economically and ecologically vital.  That led to desertification.Basically, there is a lot of confusion about the Holocaust.  Many people are told, growing up, that people were burnt alive in ovens, but in fact the famous ovens were used to cremate bodies.  Of people who are aware that the killings in concentration camps were mostly done by other means, still most people believe most deaths in the camps were by execution, when in fact most died of malnutrition or typhus.  Many people think the camps were built to house Jews, when they were originally built in the 1930s for socialists; many people repeat crazy absolute numbers of dead, or believe that these were the majority of civilians who died in WWII, or even the majority of all deaths.  

Because of this, and the fact that questioning the Holocaust is illegal in much of Europe (including all the countries where it could be researched), many conspiracy-minded people spiral off from "Everything you think you know about the Holocaust is wrong!" into "... and there is a conspiracy to keep you from learning the truth, who knows what it really is?" This is classic for conspiracy theorists - they don't deny the existence of all the evidence and authorities against them, they simply claim that it is all generated by a conspiracy to suppress the truth.  Unfortunately, unlike the NASA conspiracy theories or the WTC conspiracy theories, it really *is* illegal to be skeptical about the Holocaust in many countries, which gives their rantings just enough plausibility that they never disappear.They have momentum... does that make you happy?&gt; I wonder if people would still have hated Hitler without the holocaust.


Certainly it made a difference.  For one thing, the Allies were hardly saints\u2026 we melted millions of civilians in terror-bombing campaigns, the USA and the USSR had many of their own citizens in concentration camps, we killed 10 million Germans after the surrender, thousands of French were lynched by the resistance after D-Day, the national borders drawn at Versailles were retroactively justified with ethnic cleansing, and the Soviets in particular were brutal as occupying powers and brutal as imperial overlords for the next fifty years.  When it gets into the historical version of "I know you are but what am I?", it's usually hard to find moral clarity.  If the Nazis hadn\u2019t out-done themselves time and time again to find ways to make themselves hateful, the \u201cmere\u201d fact that they were fascists who took power by murdering their opponents and subverting democracy, and then embarked on a relentless campaign of territorial expansion... well, that *probably* wouldn\u2019t have been enough, by itself, to make Hitler look worse than Stalin and Mao.Right.  I mean, it can even be more insidious than that.  In any normal scholarly research where you are investigating whether X or Y and the answer is probably closer to Y, some of the initial evidence for Y turns out to be shoddy/faked/misinterpreted later on, whereas new evidence for Y shows up later on.  

Normal people see this as researchers groping towards the truth... two steps forward, one step back, and all that.  Conspiracy theorists see the former case (old evidence starts to look weak) as "their story is so weak that even the masterminds behind the conspiracy are starting to admit that part of it is wrong", but they see the latter case (old counter-evidence is corrected) as "twenty years ago they were openly admitting the truth, now they are trying to rewrite history to shore up their lies".  As well as the first draft for more fundamental versions of the formulae that were elaborated later.What exactly do you take to be the problem with dividing a circle into thirds? What is wrong with having a repeating decimal?  

Whether numerical representations have terminating (finite digits) or non-terminating (infinite digits) forms is (often) a function of how we chose to represent them.  If I say \u201cdivide by 3\u201d, then what I am asking you to do apparently requires only one digit.  If I say \u201cmultiply by 0.333\u2026.\u201d, apparently it requires an infinite number of digits.  But it is the exact same arithmetic operation; one is no easier or harder than the other.  And \u2014 moreover \u2014 we don\u2019t *need* to write these numbers in base-10.  Why not use base-3? Then we would say \u201cDivide by 10\u201d or \u201cmultiply by 0.10,\u201d which are both numbers that can be represented in a finite number of digits.  Conversely, some digits that would have finite representations in base-10 will be infinite in base-3: off the top of by head, I believe base-10\u2019s 1/10 (i.e., 0.1) becomes 0.0101010101\u2026 in base-3.

But even then \u2014 why care about whether the decimal representations are finite or infinite at all? For example, another way to express 1/3 of the perimeter of a circle is 2(pi)/3 radians.  Pi, you probably know, is infinite: it starts 3.14159265\u2026 and then carries on forever without ever repeating or terminating.  But you can also prove that there is *no way* to write it as a fraction of two whole numbers (which also means not as repeating decimal), and not even any way to write it as a fraction involving square roots (or any other kind of root).  But even so... it's a perfectly good way to measure out 1/3 of the perimeter, or 1/3 of the interior angle of a circle.
In general humans are sloppy thinkers.  There are three different ways you can interpret a generalization like "Members of group A are more likely to be X."

1. If you are a member of group A, then you are X.

2. If you are a member of group A, then there is a probability p1 of you being X which is greater than probability p2 of someone who is outside of A being X.

3. If you take a *randomly selected* member of group A, then there is a probability p1 of you being X which is greater than probability p2 of someone who is outside of A being X.

Here, Interpretation Three is the most sophisticated option, Interpretation Two is a sloppier option which may be a good shortcut much of the time, and Interpretation One is for children and idiots.  But no one can completely remove any of the three interpretations from their brain.  Very thoughtful people will think 99% in terms of #2 and #3, even if they are in Group A, and very stupid people will think 99% in terms of #1, even if they've never met someone in Group A and have no emotional investment at all.  

But people who are balanced in between, and can be intelligent at their best but are usually at their worst.... :)  The lizard part of their brain that handles insults, anger, and picking fights goes 100% in on claiming that what the other person *means* with his generalization is #1, so it's an insult and it calls for a counter-attack.  So the lizard slaps around the thoughtful cerebrum to wake it up.  Lizard: "Hey! Hey! He just called you an X! Tell him how stupid he is!" Cerebrum: "Um, um... okay! *Hey, you!* Don't you know that only randomly selected members of A are more likely to be X?" Lizard: "Yeah, so suck it, idiot!"

Obviously this involves a terrible inconsistency, but humans are capable of much stranger inconsistencies when personal pride is on the line.I imagine it's because every country calls Germany something different, so you might as well call them what they call themselves (since G, T, A, and N would all be equally incomprehensible), whereas most other languages call Finland Finland, not just English.

But of course, the Swiss often get their *C*onfederation of *H*elvetica abbreviation, even though Swiss/Suisse/Schwyz/Svizzera is all pretty similar.

Anyway, this interested me enough that I googled it, and in fact all of the EU countries *do* get abbreviations based on the ISO in their official language, but Finland has two official languages and two official names. (I assume *Republiken Finnland* is Swedish.)The first comment says:

&gt; To complicate matters, your perception of the fading of a "darker" color will be more acute - it has more distance to fade. Red is a relatively dark color.

This is True, and overlaps with another issue. Not only is it *possible* for red to be dark, it is really *only* dark (or it isn't red).  A medium-dark blue also has a long way to fade, but when the process is gradual it still looks blue and you may not realize *how* faded it is until you compare it to a photo or a brand-new version of the same item.  When a "red" fades, most people perceive the new, less-saturated hue as pink or magenta, which is a different color entirely.Three sorts of reasons.

First, when people give the ordinary reasons why markets *should* set the price, they slip in a lot of assumptions that aren't always met in practice. They assume there are lots of buyers and sellers; they assume buyers and sellers both have everything they need to know about what they are selling; they assume when a buyer and seller agree to a sale, they only affect themselves; they assume that everyone agrees about who owns what and there is no risk of having what you own taken away from you; they assume the cost of bargain between buyers and sellers is small relative to the value of what they sell. They assume other things as well.

Obviously these conditions are rarely met 100%, and sometimes they are barely met in any form.  When they conditions are only partly-met, it may make sense to let the price vary according to supply and demand, but give it a "push" in a certain direction (for example, a tax or a subsidy).  When the conditions aren't met at all, a market-driven price may be useless.

Second, sometimes goals that *could* be compatible with market prices, in an ideal world, happen to be politically or logistically difficult to change *without* price controls.  For example, forcing farmers to sell food cheaply is a terrible way to help the poor get enough to eat, but sometimes government are too weak or incompetent to put together a more effective policy.

Third, none of the arguments about the prices of goods, measured in currency, really apply to the price of currency itself (measured in other currencies, or in baskets of goods/the price level).  The government always controls the money supply.  The considerations when choosing whether the currency should float freely as part of overall monetary policy are complex.Think of it as a lover's quarrel.  England and France are right next to each other, obviously, and before railroads and highways the Channel actually did more to *bind them together* than separate them - transportation was faster, safer, and cheaper by water.

Going back to the 800s or 900s, the "Danes" and the "Normans" (i.e., Vikings who settled in England and the Vikings who settled in France) were pretty well connected by political alliances and marriage.  Then because the Anglo-Saxon nobility and the Danish nobility were alternately scheming with each other and against each other, they ended up intermarried, and soon enough the Dukes of Normandy were related to the Kings of England... which was the excuse for the penultimate successful sea invasion of Britain, by William the Conqueror.  Now William and his heirs are Kings of England but also, as Dukes of Normandy, one of the most powerful men in France.  So of course *that* gets complicated and, with clever marriages, eventually the English kings directly control more land in France than the King of France himself.  Later the pendulum swings the opposite way, France becomes powerful, and England tries to steer a middle course between France and Spain; but soon English industry and sea power were allowing them to punch above their weight, and the French become the second-rate power, trying to steer a middle course.  That led France and England into an alliance against Germany, but now instead of the bad feelings that wars cause, they got the bad feelings that *alliances* cause - who sacrificed more for whom, who is making unreasonable demands, who was to blame for the defeats and who takes credit for victories.

Meanwhile scholars, saints, scientists, and poets are hopping back and forth across the channel.  English Common Law was conducted in French for centuries (and we still to this day, in America, open formal proceedings with *Oyez, oyez*), and eventually the French returned the favor and declared the English judicial system the best in the world.  French rationalism inspired English empricism, English empiricism inspired the French Enlightenment, which in turn inspired radical reformers in Britain and America.  For a long time English/French bilingualism was de rigueur in English-speaking education and nearly as common in France, and the great works of English and French literature are nearly all based on one another.  But as you can imagine, this sort of proximity causes xenophobic reactions from time to time - if T.S. Eliot is the great poet of his generation and you think he's an overrated blowhard, when Eliot says that Baudelaire, Rimbaud, and Mallarm\u00e9 are the great poets of the 19^th century you'll petulantly declare that they're the *worst* poets...Don't forget the importance of ideology.  People get so cynical... they assume, so as not to be gullible, that institutions *only* do the right thing because otherwise it's bad PR, and that behind every reasonable policy there are sinister motives lurking.  In fact, many academics *are* leftists who are deeply committed to social justice, and even if they disagree with the protestors in principle, at least at first, it is easier for them to decide "I'm racist, I need to apologize" than to say "These protestors are spoiled brats with no appreciation of or aptitude for the life of the mind; they need a good talking-to, and if that doesn't work maybe affirmative action needs to be reconsidered."

Have you ever been the target of this kind of mob violence? It can be very intimidating and very difficult to speak the truth.  You very quickly try to find ways to compromise or tell little white lies to not antagonize them, and then when they inform you that's not good enough and they're still going to surround you and yell at you, you compromise again and again until you are a long, long way from where you started.

Anyway, different universities have "caved" in different ways.  In many cases the administrators who are most supportive are practically part of the protest themselves.  The coach at Mizzou is there to represent the interests of his team, and he felt he had to approve of whatever his team wanted.  I believe the dean who congratulated violent protestors at Dartmouth was essentially the dean in charge of minority issues... again, she's there to represent their interests, of course she congratulates them.ERs are insanely expensive.  For routine things, your doctor often can't help you, especially not in the time it takes to get an appointment - it's stupid to waste your time and the doctor's time for, say, a broken pinky toe, since all you can do is wait for it to get better. You might as well read that online.

Also, many people don't like the advice their doctor gave them, or are afraid of the advice they suspect their doctor will give them, so they want to become an amateur doctor and find a diagnosis they like better.  No one wants to find out they're fat and need to lose weight, they would prefer to have some rare, difficult syndrome.  The Communist parties of the world were in favor of a *goal* that most people agree was good (improving the welfare of the working classes) and they pursued it with a whole range of policies (revolutions, subversion, coups, purges, mass starvation, guerrilla warfare, state control of the economy, and totalitarianism in general) that really did not work at all.  But so long as we all (almost all?) agree that the *ultimate end* was good, there will be a whole continuum of people who have different opinions about whether specific communist leaders and communist parties were well-intentioned, unlucky, misguided, too ruthless, misunderstood... or just flat-out evil.  And it is always open to people to say that when X did Y, he wasn't acting on communist principles, he was *betraying* communism!

But the *Nazis'* ultimate goal was the marginalization of inf